CROMWELL.
BOOK II. CONTINUED.
A 2
CHAPTER VI.
Were he my kinsman, brother, or my son,
It should be thus with himhe must die to-morrow.
Measure for Measure
.
The outmost crowd have heard a sound
Like horse's hoof on harden'd ground.
Nearer it came, and yet more near,
The very headsmen paused to hear.
Scott's
Rokeby
.
It
was already past the middle of the night
which followed the tremendous conflict upon
Marston
Moor, yet many a light was glancing through
the casements of the adjoining village, in which
the cavalry of the victorious army had taken up its
quarters. Strange and discordant noises echoed
among the low-browed cottagesthe stamp and
scream of vicious chargers, the clash of arms, the
din of the artillery wagons groaning and creaking
over the ill-made roads, the moans and outcries of
the wounded wretches, waked to fresh agonies by
the rough motion of the carts which bore them
from the field, watering the dust beneath their
wheels with human goreand yet, though every
house and shed was occupied by the rude soldiery,
there mingled not one tone of riot or debauchery
with the accustomed sounds that indicate the
presence
of an armed multitude. All grave and stern
the sentinels stalked their appointed rounds, or, if
they broke the silence of their watch, it was but
by the humming of some pious canticle; while
ever and anon the louder accents of some military
preacher rose upon the ear, or the deep chorus of
a distant hymn. No wassailings prevailed about
the watchfiresno songs of profane triumph were
bellowed from the hostelries wherein the men were
billetedno yells of savage laughter nor female
shrieks broke forth to tell of warlike license; in
short, the aspect of the hamlet was rather that of
some immense conventicle of armed enthusiasts,
than of the nightly quarter of a triumphant host
fresh from the shock, the rapture, and the glory of
the battle.
Before one dwelling, of pretensions somewhat
greater than its neighbours, having a little
courtyard
with a low stone wall before it, and a
grotesquely
sculptured porch of native sandstone,
there sat two mounted privates of the ironsides,
one on each side the gate, so still and motionless
that, but for the occasional tossing of their
chargers'
heads or whisk of their long tails, they might
have passed for lifeless statues. The pale beams
of the moon slept placidly upon their morions and
breastplates, while the bright scarlet of their
doublets
was mellowed by the partial light into a
dimmer
and more sober hue. Within the court two
more of the same sturdy corps walked to and fro,
with ported carbines, crossing each other at brief
intervals, the red sparks of their lighted matches
showing their readiness for instant service. Within
the house all were at rest save in one chamber,
opening directly from the narrow hall or passage,
whence might be heard, even without the walls, a
heavy and irregular footstep clanging with military
spurs upon the flagstones which composed the
cottage
floor, and now and then the suppressed
murmur
of a voice communing, as it seemed, with the
deep thoughts of the speaker. It was a large,
low-roofed
,
and stone-paved room, with heavy rafters,
and a huge open chimney of black oak, dingy and
mantled with the smoke of ages. A wide low
window
,
divided into many lattices by massive
free-stone
mullions, with a long settle of carved
wainscoting
beneath it, occupied the whole of one side,
while opposite to it, and at right angles to the
hearth, another seat, of similar materials but
superior
workmanship, with a high panelled back and
elbows, was disposed so as to shield the occupants
from the keen blasts that found their way in winter
through many a crevice of the time-shaken walls.
Over this antique piece of furniture a scarlet
dragoon
cloak was flung at random, with a
broad-brimmed
and high-crowned hat of dark gray felt
hooked on one of the knobs which decorated its
extremities, while from the other hung a buff belt
with a long iron-hilted tuck. Upon a table close
before the hearth, on which a dozen fast-decaying
brands silently smouldered, stood, with its wick
tall and unsnuffed, a solitary lamp, casting a feeble
and uncertain light about the room, which served,
however, to display a brace of horseman's heavy
pistols, an open map, a telescope, a worn and
greasy Bible, and a leader's truncheon lying beside
it on the board, as well as a confused assemblage
of steel armour piled in a large armed chair, and
glancing with obscure reflections from the shadow
of a distant corner. It was, however, the inmate
of the chamber that lent its chief attraction to the
scenea strong-built and stern-featured man, clad
in a military suit of buff, such as was then worn
under the corslet and thigh-pieces of the cavalry;
his cumbersome jackboots were still about his legs,
garnished with spurs as when he left the saddle,
though all his other armour had been doffed in
consequence of recent wounds, as it would seem
from many a speck and splash of dingy crimson
on the leathern cassock, and from his left arm
bound up by a silken sling. It was the leader of
the ironsides. There was a wild, unnatural
expression
on his grim features as he passed and
repassed
the light, and a strange glare in his deep-set
eye almost like that of the insane. He muttered,
at times, in audible and articulate sounds, but
mostly in a half-uttered, inward key, striding the
while with heavy but uneven steps, now fast, now
slow, across the echoing floor; his hands were now
crossed firmly on his breast, now tossed aloft as if
they brandished the war-weapon, and now they
griped each other with so stern a pressure that the
blood started from beneath his nails. It might be
that the fever of his wounds had terminated for the
moment on his brain; it might be that a darker fit
than common of his fanatic hypochondriasm had
occupied his mind; but on this night the wise and
crafty conqueror of Rupert resembled rather the
mysterious
energumenos
, the possessed,
fiend-tortured
maniac of holy writ, than the cool,
self-controlling
,
scientific leader he had that day approved
himself.
King?king? at last he exclaimed, audibly,
pausing from his uneasy walk, with an expression
of uncertainty and even terror distinctly marked in
every feature; didst thou say king? No, no!
not king! Avaunt, Baalzebul! Get thee behind
me, Sathanas! It said not `king!' that solemn
and tremendous shape, that drew the curtains of
my boyish couch at the unhallowed hour of mid
night`The greatest one in England, but not
king!'
[1]
[1]
It is notorious that a story was in existence among the
contemporaries
of Cromwell, long before his attainment even of high
military
rank, to the effect that he had been awakened from his sleep,
when a boy, by a mysterious shape, which told him he should be
the
greatest man in England
, not, however, using the word
king
.
Ho! have I foiled thee there? Haha!
well art thou called the prince of liarsget thee
behind me! tempt me no more! Away, foul
slave! By the Lord's help, I spit at and defy
thee! He took two or three turns across the
room more quickly than before, and, again pausing,
cried, A trick of fantasy? Who saith it was
unrealhave we not ears to hear and eyes to see?
and shall we not believe what we do hear and see?
Did not a spirit pass before the face of Job, that
the hair of his flesh stood up? Stood it not still,
yet he could not discern the form thereof? Was
there not silence, and he heard a voice? And
came it not to pass so likewise unto me, and much
more also? AgainDid not the evil-minded Saul
call up, through her at Endor, the living spirit of
the departed prophet, that it did prophecy to him?
And yet againDid not the Roman Brutus,
idolater
although he was and heathen, hold converse
with the shadow of his kingly victim, that was his
evil genius at Philippi? And may not II, that
was written down before the world beganI, that
have been predestinate of old to execute the wrath
of the Most Highest, and press the wine-press of
his vengeancemay not I, too, commune with
disimbodied
ministers that walk in the night-season?
Go to! go to! I heard its mighty accents as I
started from my slumber, and they yet tingle in my
fleshly ears`Arouse thee, thou that shalt be first
in England!' But notit said
not
king!
Again he took a short and hurried turn through the
apartmentAnd if it had, he cried, in higher
tonesand if it had said king! Be there not
lying spiritsbe there not temptersbe there not
false prophets? Had it said king, then had I
roused myself indeed! Then had I striven with
the Evil One that he had fled me! for to the putting
down, not to the raising up of tyrants was I called
not that to me men should bow down the knee, and
wallow in the dust, and cry `Hail, monarch!' but
that, throughout this goodly realm of England, there
should be innocence, and righteousness, and peace,
and liberty, and truth for ever! He paused again
in his soliloquy, and, as he paused, the challenge
of a distant sentinel rang sharp and clear through
the still nightthe clatter of a horse's hoofs
another
challengeand anothera bustle in the
courtyard, and the sound of several feet hurrying
toward the door. With the first faint alarm the
general was himself again; he passed his hand
across his eyes, and drew a deep sigh, as if to
ease his breast; then, turning to the table hastily,
he trimmed the waning lamp, and, seating himself,
instantly resumed the studies whence he had
probably
been hurried by the ferment of his distempered
spirits.
The outer door was opened, and several persons,
after a moment's parley with the sentinel on duty,
entered the house. A heavy hand rapped quickly
on the door, followed by a blunt voiceThe
captain
of the watch to speak with General
Cromwell
.
Enter the captain of the watch, cried Oliver;
and as the well-known face of an approved and
trusty comrade met his eyeWhat now, good
Kingsland, he exclaimed; how goes it with the
host?
All thanks be to the Giver of all mercies,
well! replied the officer; but here is one
without
yea,
even one from the stronghold of the
malignants
seeking
to parley with you.
One from the town of Yorkha? answered
Cromwell, with the speed of thought; admit him
speedily
Nay, not from York, returned, the other,
nor is it any
he
. Of verity it is a damsel, yea,
and a damsel decked with the comelinesstruly, I
say, with the loveliness of the flesh!
Tush! tell not me of comeliness! cried
Oliver
,
very sharply; of God's truth, Ahaziah
Kingsland
,
thou art a fool thus to disturb my meditations
for a most frail and painted potsherda Delilah. I
warrant mea Rechabyea, and a painted
Jezabel
a
harlot from the camp of the Egyptians.
Cast her forth straightway! leave me, I say
begone
!
It is not so, replied the other, sturdilyit is
not so, an you will hear me out. It is maiden of
repute; she rode up to our outpost on the western
road with three stout serving-men, seeking the
captain of the night, and, verily, when I was brought
to her, she claimed to speak with General
Cromwell
touching the young man Edgar Ardenne
Whom, of a truth, my spirit loveth. Admit
her, and that, too, without tarrying; and bid them
fetch in fuel, for lo! the fire hath burnt low while
I did watch and pray, and the night air is chill,
though it be summerand lights and wine, I say,
and creature comforts, such as may fit the tender
and the delicate of women!
The words were yet upon the lips of Cromwell
when a tall female figure, marked by that
indescribable
yet not to be mistaken air of grace which is
seen rarely but in persons conscious of the
possession
of high station and pre-eminent endowments,
was ushered into the dim-lighted chamber. The
coarse, dark-coloured riding-cloak, wrapped closely
round her form, could not entirely conceal the
elegant
proportions which it was evidently intended
to disguise; and still less could the wide-leafed
hat of country straw, tied closely down upon the
cheeks by a silk kerchief, mask the aristocratic
mould of the fair features, or hide the rich
luxuriance
of the light-brown hair, which hung, uncurled
and damp with the night-dews, far down upon her
shoulders. A slight bustle occurred while the
general
,
with his attendant officers, tendered her in
dumb show the courlesies demanded by her
apparent
rank, and yet more by her isolated and
defenceless
situation; but, with an air of quiet
dignity
,
she waved off their civilities, and expressed,
more by her manner than her words, a wish to be
left alone with the far-dreaded leader of the
Independents
.
Meanwhile more logs had been heaped
on the hearth, and now threw up a flickering and
lively glow, which, added to the lustre of some
three or four fresh lights, diffused itself into the
farthest angles of the room. The serving-men and
his subordinates withdrew, Oliver sternly ordering
them to hold themselves aloof, and pray to be
delivered
from the sin of eavesdropping. Then,
without
any affectation, or display of fear or of
embarrassment
,
the lady dropped her mantle, and stood
forth revealed in all the bright and beautiful
proportions
of Sibyl Ardenne. Her face was pale as
death, yet it was firm and perfectly composed;
there was no flutter of her pulse, no tremour of
her frame, no doubt or hesitation in the clear cold
glance of her expressive eyeall was calm,
self-confiding
,
resolute, and fearless.
I have come hither, she said, without waiting
to be first addressed, in a voice slow and
passionless
,
yet exquisitely musical, I have come hither,
Vol. II.B
General Cromwell, in a fashion men will deem
unmaidenly, and women bold unto effrontery. I
have come hither under the shade of night, alone,
save with the company of menials, unto the
foeman
of my family, my king, my country! yet
dare not, even in your most inward soul, to deem
me light or frail. I have come, I say, hither,
casting
aside all prejudice, all fear, and all reserve
detying the opinion of the worldincurring the
contempt, the hatred, and, perhaps, the curse of
those I hold most dear. Yet have I come, upheld
by mine own conscience, and firm in the resolve
to hinder a foul crime. All other means have
failedtears, arguments, entreaties! Allall! I
say, save this. Get you, then, instantly, she went
on, rising as she spoke into strong energy, to
horse! To horse! to horse! if you would save
your friend, your fellow-soldier, your preserver
alas! that he was suchif you would save Edgar
Ardenne! He is a captive to the cavaliers,
sentenced
to die at daybreak.
To die! vehemently interrupted Cromwell
to die! they dare notno, for their souls they
dare not! Did they but harm one hair of him, I
would hang fifty of their best and noblest higher
than ever Haman swung in the free airs of heaven!
Sentenced, she continued, quietly, and
without
heeding the interruption, to die to-morrow!
Yet he may still be rescued if you will it so.
Prisoner to a small body of the retreating cavaliers,
he will be shot at daybreak if not released this
night; nor can he be released save by your strict
obedience to my bidding! Obey me, and to-night
you rescue him who would have died to save you!
Despise my warning, and to-morrow you may,
perchance
avenge
him.
With a fixed, scrutinizing glance, the general
gazed upon her features while she spoke as though
he would peruse her soul. And who, he said,
at length, and who are you that speak thus
resolutely
,
act thus boldly, in behalf of him who is the
foeman of your tribeeven the stout and valiant
Ardenne?
It matters not, she answered, steadily, it
matters not who I may be, or what. It matters
only that you subscribe to my conditions, and get
you straight to horse.
Thus far it matters only, answered Cromwell,
that, an I know you not, yea, and, moreover,
know your motives likewise, I stir not, horse nor
man! There be enow of dames and damoiselles
among you who would deem falsehood very
righteous
truth, if so ye might entrap one who
although
himself he saith ithath been and will be
a keen instrument, yea, a two-edged sword, to
work destruction on the sons of Belial!
Not so, not so! she broke upon his speech
with striking energy, not so, by all my hopes of
Heaven! Such may be thy creed, to do ill that
good may come of it; but II would not stoop to
falsehood were it to buy the lives of thousands such
as thou art. My aim, my only aim, is to preserve
the young from a most cruel and heart-rending
doomto save the aged from a most deadly crime.
I amknow it, and use the knowledge as you list
I am the niece of your friend's sire.
Ha! Mistress Sibyl Ardenneis it so?
muttered
the general, musingly. The brother's
daughter of that perverse and bloody-minded old
malignant, whose right hand is crimsoncrimson
with the persecution of the saints! Verily this is
a sure and trusty witness! And so you would
preserve the youtha valiant youth he is, and I
do say itstout of heart, strong of hand, tender of
conscienceyea, a burning and a shining light to
men. And so thou wouldst preserve him, and
wouldst wed with himha! is it not so?and
win him to the faction of the man Charles Stuart!
preserve his life so to destroy his soul! Is it
not so? Ha! have I read your heart?
You have
not
, she answered, with calm
dignity
,
you have
not
read it; nor can you so much
as conjecture or imagine the motives or the thoughts
of such as I, more than you can comprehend the
sacred truths which you misquote, perverting them
to your own ruin. Know, General Cromwell, that,
not to be the empress of the universenot to
restore
my sovereign to his lawful thronemy
country
to its ancient peace, would I espouse the man
who, whether from misapprehended duty or from
wilful wrong, can band himself with persons like
to theelending himself a willing tool to be
played
off by rebels to their monarchtraitors to their
country, andalas! that I should live to say it
vile hypocrites before their God! It is for this
for this that I would have him live, that
he
may
not lack season for repentance; and that his
miserable
father may be spared the sin of slaying his
own son!
His father! shouted Cromwell, excited now
beyond all self-restraint, his father! In God's
name, speak out, maiden! His father! Merciful
Lord! what meanest thou?
He is a captive to Sir Henry Ardenne, she
replied; made captive in the very action of
defending
him, and doomed by him to perish, as a rebel
and a traitor, with the first break of dawn!
Where lie these cavaliers? What be their
numbers? Speak!
Promise me, then, she said, with infinite
composure, promise me, as you are a gentleman,
a soldier, and a Christian, that, save to rescue
Edgar
Ardenne, you will not turn the tidings I shall
give you to your own gain or to King Charles's
detriment. Promise before the Lord, and by your
hopes of an hereafter, that you will shed no drop
of blood which is not absolutely needful to his
safety; and more, that, he once safe, you will strike
no blow farther, but return straightway to this spot,
molesting no man, nor taking any note of their
position
or proceedings against whom I shall lead you,
for twelve hours' space.
Tushtush! it may not be. Say quickly
where they lie, and what their numbers, so shall we
save your lover; but dally not, I pray you, lest we
may be too late to rescue.
Promise! she answered, steadily.
Dally not, maidenI say dally not,
Cromwell
repeated, very sternly, else shall the blood
of him thou lovest, and not this only, but the guilt
of that insane old homicide rest on
your
head, who
mightst have saved them, but wouldst not.
Promise, or not a word from me. Promise, or
I go hence, and Heaven befriend whom thou
desertest
to destruction.
It may not be, I sayit may not be! he cried,
gnashing his teeth, and stamping violently on the
floor, in a fierce paroxysm of unbridled rage.
Speak quickly, girl, and truly, or instantly I cast
thee into bonds. Without there, ho! a guard and
fetters!
Promise, or you may tear me limb from limb
ay, draw me with wild horses, yet shalt thou
nothing learn. Promise, and I tell all.
The guard rushed ingrim, gloomy-looking
fanatics
,
to whom their leader's merest nod was law
yet she was silent as the grave; and the dark
zealot paused in deep perplexity. His brow was
B 2
stormy as a winter's midnight; his eye cold, hard,
and pitiless; his teeth compressed so firmly that
his very lips were white as ashes; and his hands
clinched, yet quivering with emotion. While he
yet doubted, a slow solemn sound came floating
down the night wind to his excited ears; it was
the village clock striking the second hour past
midnight
.
Three hours more, she said, in a low,
mournful
voice, three hours more, and nothing will
remain
of him you
call
your friend except a little
blood-stained clay, which you mayor may not
avenge!
The muscles of the general's mouth worked
violently
,
his clinched hand gradually opened, the
expression
of his eye grew softer.
Noble heartnoble heart! he muttered;
well hath the prophet spoken, `a virtuous woman
is beyond the price of rubies.' Then, raising his
voice, he said, distinctly and aloud, Before the
Lord, my Judge and my Redeemer, and by my
hopes of grace, I promise thee. It shall be done
as thou wouldst have it. How many, and where
lie they?
Three hundred horsein the small town of
Wetherby on Wharfe.
Sound trumpetsboot and saddle! Mine own
first ironsides to horse; let them all carry petronels.
Despatch! despatch! Saddle me Thunder for the
field; I will myself to horse! Find me three
trusty guides, that know each yard of country for
ten miles around! For life! for life! no
tarrying
!
Forth rushed the subalterns; the trumpets
flourished
,
piercingly shrill and stirring; then came the
clash of arms, the trampling of quick feet, the
glare of torches, the din of confused voices, the
pawing and the snort of chargers, and all the
thrilling
sounds and sights of an alarum at the dead of
night.
One more word, maiden, he exclaimed, while
fastening the rivets of his corslet with an impatient
hand; where hold they him in ward?
In the courthouse, she answered, hard by
the market-place, and nigh the river-bank. And
now forget you have beheld meforget it, and
farewell!
Naynay, he said, not so. You go not
hence save with our escort. Too much risk have
you run to-night already.
No, she replied, I must be home before you.
I lodge not in the town, and I may well be missed.
I must be home before you, else will all fail.
Nay, thou art right in all things, Cromwell
answered, and as thou willest it shall be.
Kingsland
,
conduct the maiden in all honour to her own
attendants. Lady, he added, taking her by the
hand, with a benevolent expression lighting his
gloomy features, lady, thou art a goodly and a
glorious creature, and this night hast thou done a
deed worthy the noblest of earth's daughters. A
soldier's blessing, although he be not of thy faith
nor of thy faction, cannot disgrace or harm thee.
The God of Israel bless thee, then, and guide thy
feet aright, and give thee peace, and happiness, and
understanding. Farewell, and doubt not that I
will deal with thee righteously; for if I fail thee to
transgress my promise, may He whom I profess
to servewith frailty, it is true, and fainting, yet
with sincere heart-zealdo unto me so likewise
at mine utmost need, and much more also!
He let fall her hand as suddenly as he had
taken
it, and, as if half ashamed of the emotion he
had shown, abruptly turned away and scanned the
map which lay upon the table with intense
scrutiny
;
while Sibyl, wondering at the singular
emotion
and unexpected conduct of the hated
Independent
,
silently left the house, to hurry homeward
with an easier heart than she had carried to the
quarters of the Puritans.
Before half an hour had elapsed, five hundred
chosen horsemen were under arms and in the
saddle
the
very flower of Cromwell's finest cavalry
and he himself, despite his wounds, his arm yet
hanging in a sling, mounted and at their head.
After a short and hurried conversation with the
guides, he gave the word to march, and led them
at a rapid trot along the moonlight roads, none
knowing, save himself, the object or direction of
their route. When they had ridden some six miles
upon their way, he halted suddenly; Is there not
hereabout, he said, looking toward the guide, who
rode beside his rein, a path whereby to reach the
Wharfe, and ford it here, some mile or so below
the town?
A half mile farther, answered the countryman,
a lane turns off to the left down to the Flint-mill
ford, two miles below the bridge.
Ho! Captain Goodenough, cried Oliver,
take thou this fellow to the rear, and, as we pass
the lane, turn down it with the last troop; tarry
not on thy way, but cross the river, and keep the
right bank up until thou be within two gunshots
of the bridge; there halt till that thou hear my
trumpets, and then charge! over the bridgeinto
the townand strike straight for the market-place!
If that ye be discovered ere ye hear me, delay not,
but dash straightway in. If that your guide
deceive
you, shoot him upon the instant. Be
cautious
and be quickaway!
On they went, quickening still their pace, and,
as they passed the lane, the troop appointed to the
duty wheeled off, steadily, but without slackening
its pace, and hurried on its route.
Another mile was passed, and once again the
general halted; Kingsland and Pearson, he
cried, move to the front; I would hold counsel
with ye; and bring the other guides; then, as his
officers arrived, there be, he said, two other
roads, besides this which we follow, that enter
Wetherby this side the river  the great North
road from Boroughbridge, and one from
Knaresborough
yet farther to the west. Goodenough
holds the bridge, and I will keep this route. You
two must ride across the country till that ye reach
these roads. Feel your way down them, each one
as nearly as he may unto their outposts; and, when
ye hear my trumpets, charge, as I said before, and
cut your way straight for the market-place. Kill
no more than ye must, and make no prisoners.
Keep your men well together, and be steady.
Send back your guides to me, each with an
orderly
,
when ye have reached the roads. Ye have
but a scant hour to do it, but that is time enow an
ye employ it diligently. By then the moon will
set, and we shall have it dark and misty. Be
wary, and success is certain. God speed ye,
gentlemen
.
Away!
And off they rode across the open fields, which
stretched, at that time, without fences or enclosures,
except a few small drains, for many miles over that
fertile district. An hour passed slowly over, and
the moon sank, as Cromwell had predicted, into a
heavy bed of clouds, yet he moved not. His men
were drawn up, all dismountedbut each trooper
by his horsein a small piece of marshy woodland,
open to the road, where they could not have been
discovered by a chance passenger. The morning
grew not lighter yet, for a small drizzling rain
began
to fall, with a dense fog, rendering objects
scarcely visible at ten feet distant. Another half
hour passed, and yet no tidings.
Mount, ho! and blow your matches, exclaimed
Cromwell, breaking the silence, which had so long
remained uninterrupted by any human sound or
whisper. We must fall on, else shall we be too
latetrusting to fortune and the favour of the Lord
that our friends be at their posts. Wheel to the
left, ho! Forwardtrot! and he put his horse at
once into his swiftest pace. Just as he moved his
men the clang of hoofs came rattling up the stony
road; it was the guide from Pearson, with an
orderly
.
All's well, he cried; stout Captain
Pearson hath gained the farther road; Kingsland
must needs be at his post; and lo! here comes his
messenger.
Forward, then! forward! shouted Cromwell,
for lo! there breaks the morning. Forward, and
when the outposts challenge us, sound trumpets and
shout cheerily! And on they went, clattering at a
furious pace along the broken roads; and now they
almost reached the town, the lights of which they
might see feebly twinkling through the
mistwreaths
.
An awful sound broke on their ears,
heard fearfully distinct above the din of hoofs and
clash of spur and scabbardit was the first note
of the death-bell!
Gallop! ho! gallop! Cromwell shrieked out,
in piercing tones, that thrilled to every heart,
plunging
his spurs up to the rowel-heads into his
charger's
side; but his command reached other ears
than those of his stout followers.
Stand, ho! challenged a drowsy sentinel,
whom they had wellnigh passed unnoticed, despite
the clatter of their march; stand, or I shoot!
and, at the selfsame point of time, his musket was
discharged; but its report was drowned by the
heart-thrilling flourish of the trumpets and the
repeated
warery of the charging zealots. On every
side the trumpets of the general were answered
by the simultaneous shouts of the three bands he
had detached, by the quick clatter of their horses'
hoofs, and the sharp ringing volleys of their
carbines
.
On every side the outposts were cut down,
and the town entered sword in hand. The
death-bell
ceased to tollthe ringers had deserted it in
terror. The bugles pealed, and the drums beat to
arms, but it was all too late. The few who were
on foot were instantly cut down; others came
rushing
from their quarters half attired, with lighted
torches and unbelted brands, only to gaze in mute
and unresisting terror on the complete success of
the assailantsonly to see four gallant troops of
horse, wheeling from opposite directions and in
resistless
numbers into the market-place!to hear
the clang of axe and hammer upon the prison-gates,
mixed with the deafening huzzas of the triumphant
Puritans!to mark, by the red glare of many a
flambeau suddenly kindled by the troopers, their
captive borne in triumph from the cellwhich he
had never dreamed of quitting but for the place of
executionmounted upon a ready charger, and
girt round by a ring of swords that set the very
hope of rescue at defiance! One short note of the
bugle, and every torch expired as suddenly as it
had been illumed. Another, and the strangers fell
into column with the speed of thought, and, filing
off at a hard trot, were out of sight so rapidly, that,
but for the dismantled gates, the empty dungeon,
the decaying brands that smouldered on the ground,
and the few scattered bodies outstretched upon the
miry pavement never to rise again, all that had
passed might have been almost deemed a wild and
baseless dream.
CHAPTER VII.
Perseverance, dear my lord,
Keeps honour brightto have done is to hang
Quite out of fashion, like a rusty mail
In monumental mockery.
Troilus and Cressida
.
The
terrible campaign of '44 had ended; not,
indeed
,
with that total overthrow of Charles and
absolute
dispersion of his party which might well
have been looked for after the complete route of
the finest army he had ever been enabled to
collect
upon Long Marston Moor, and which would
probably have followed had all the generals of the
commonwealth been equalsin spirit, energy, and
firm devotion to their causeof the true victors on
that bloody day, Fairfax and Cromwell. But, in
truth, during the years which had elapsed since the
uplifting of the royal standard, the aspect of affairs
in England had been changed greatly for the worse,
and men's opinions had undergone, if possible, a
greater alteration. Each party, as is the natural
consequence of opposition, whether in argument or
armed strife, had but become more desperately
wedded to its own principles or prejudices. The
king, though he had gained no single step toward
a general result of conquest or pacification, was
more resolved than ever to come to no terms, save
such as he could never reasonably even hope to
gain, with his rebellious subjects. The people,
meanwhile, were becoming weary of the war, and
all the miseries that follow in its train; and seeing
that there was no hope that Charles would ever
listen either to prudence or to reason until reduced
to infinite extremities, were daily, hourly
increasing
in their animosity to him, and in their
readiness
to urge on and promote, by every method in
their power, the interest of his enemies. The
nobles
,
on the other hand, those even who had been
the first and the most zealous to proclaim
themselves
adherents to the parliament and constitution
the first to buckle on the arms of legalized and
just rebellionperceived at length that, through
the self-destructive obstinacy of the king, the civil
strife could have no end save in the downfall of the
monarchy, and consequent suppression of all
aristocratic
privilege. They relaxed then their efforts
fought, if they fought at all, with feeble and
uncertain
spirit, as doubtful whether conquest or
defeat
to them would prove the greater evil; and
would, had they possessed the absolute control,
have suffered the war to go out, as it were, for very
lack of aliment. Among the royalists, immediately
upon the issue of that bloody field, the gallant
Newcastle, justly incensed at Rupert's furious and
unmannered rashness, by which, indeed, the whole
North had been set at stake and lost in one pitched
battle, had thrown aside his arms, and crossed the
seas to gratify, if it might be, in happier realms, his
taste for those accomplishments and arts of peace
which were far more congenial to his improved and
courtly intellect than the rude din of camps and
foughten fields. The prince, without so much as
an attempt to rally his dispersed and shattered
forces, fled with all speed toward Chester, while
York, relieved in vain, surrendered in a few days
to the conquerors of Marston. Better success,
however, than could have been expected, fell to the
cavaliers in other portions of the realm. Charles,
who, a few days previous to the defeat of his rash
Vol. II.C
nephew, had worsted Waller at Cropredy bridge,
now following up his slight advantage by a
vigorous
and able movement into Cornwall, pressed
upon Essex with such skill and perseverance, that
the general of the parliament was forced to make
a most precipitate escape by sea. Hopeless of
bringing off his army, he went on board with a few
officers, having first sent away his horse, under
command
of Balfour, to cut their way as best they might
to Londonan end which, owing to the shameful
revelry of Goring, who suffered them, although
forewarned
even of the hour when the sortie would be
made, to pass his lines unchallenged, he most
successfully
accomplishedand leaving all his infantry,
artillery, and baggage, under Skippon, to take the
best terms of surrender they might gain from the
king's policy or mercy. A second desperate drawn
battle followed before Newbury, wherein, as they
had done in every action, Cromwell's undaunted
squadrons carried all before them in that part of the
field where they engaged; although at other points
the headlong valour of the cavaliers retrieved the
day, and gained the doubtful credit of a balanced
fight, owing, as it was said, to Manchester's
uncertain
if not dishonest policy in absolutely
prohibiting
the leader of the ironsides from making one more
charge on the retiring royalists, when, as that
officer
asserted, a complete victory must have
undoubtedly
been won by such a movement. After
this fruitless struggle, relieving the beleaguered
posts of Donnington and Basing House, the king
once more took up his quarters for the winter in
the loyal town of Oxford, with better hopes than
he had entertained since the complete subversion
of his party in the North; on news of which his
queen had instantly escaped to France, and he
himself had deemed it wise to send the Prince of
Wales to Bristol with a separate council and an
independent army, judging it hazardous to hold so
great a stake as their united safety embarked upon
a single venture.
Toward the dead of winter, the armies being
both laid up, the puritanic leaders returned to
Westminster, to take once more their part in the
proceedings of the houses, since they had no more
opportunity of active service in the field.
Matters
in parliament looked wildly  parties ran
higher now than they had done at any time, even
before the royalists seceded from the councils of
the nationthe Presbyterians and the
Independents
striving with rancorous and bitter energy to
gain the upper hand. Commissioners were indeed
sent from both sides to treat for peace, as during
the preceding winter, at Uxbridge, but rather to
preserve appearances than from the least belief
on either hand that they could prove successful in
their mission.
Such was the state of things when, on a keen
December's afternoon, Ardenne had strolled forth
from his lodging under the pressure of uneasy
thoughts, to try if exercise and change of scene
might banish the dull sense of rooted sorrow,
almost
amounting to despair, which had possessed
his bosom. At first he wandered aimlessly about
the streets, until at length he found himself in the
long alleys of St James's Mall, the stage in former
days of so much gayety and pomp, but now all
gloomy and deserted by every living thing except
a few disconsolate and dingy sparrows, huddled
together
on the leafless branches of the elms, or
twittering
feebly in the wintry sunshine. The dull and
lonely scenerythe grassplots mantled partially
with crisp hoarfrostthe wide canals sheeted with
rotten and half-melted icethe rustic benches
white with the slippery rimethe big drops
plashing
down from off the southern branches of the
giant treesand, above all, the utter solitude, the
absence of any human being, harmonized so well
with the dark and almost misanthropic mood which
had crept on the young soldier, that he continued
for above an hour to walk to and fro, almost
unconscious
of the flight of time. He was at length,
however, awakened from his revery by the
approach
of three men walking at a rapid pace
toward
him, apparently engaged in conversation of
the strongest interest. A single glance sufficed to
let him recognise the persons of Ireton, Vane, and
Cromwell. So deeply were these gentlemen
engrossed
in their discourse, that it was not till they
were on the very point of meeting that Cromwell
knew his favourite officer. They did not even then,
however, pause; but, with a courteous salutation,
passed him, still speaking rapidly in a low tone.
After a few steps Oliver quitted his companions,
and, turning short round, followed Edgar at so
swift a pace that he overtook him almost instantly.
You are well met, he said, entering without
preamble on his subject; had I not thusby
special favour, it should seem, of Providence
encountered
you, I should have sought you in your
lodging ere to-morrow morning. There is a great
change workingyea! a great change in Israel!
And truly it is needed; for, verily, the tares have
multiplied among the harvest of the Lordthey
have increased fourfoldthey have grown up all
green, and rank, and flourishing, that they shall
overtop the goodly wheat, and choke it down, and
triumph over it. But lo! the time is now at hand.
The Lord hath borne it in upon our hearts, that
we shall purge the fieldthat we shall purify the
threshing-floor, setting apart the good grain from
the sinful weedsthat so we may not die, but
live!
Of what change speak you, general?
returned
Ardenne, somewhat coldly; for, to say truth,
I may not comprehend you while you speak thus
in parables.
May not or
will
notwhether? Oliver
inquired
,
with a solemn sneer curling his lip; and he
fixed his piercing eye upon the face of Ardenne so
sternly and so searchingly withal, that few men
could have brooked his gaze without confusion;
then, seeing that the countenance of Edgar, though
firm and fixed, was frank and open as the day, he
deigned to speak directly to the point. Why,
see you not, he said, that an these generals,
these
lords
continueself-seekers as they be, not
holding their eyes steady and their hearts aright
toward the public weal, but turning to the right
hand and the left, struggling ever for their own
advancement
,
backsliding, wavering, and fainting at
the push of needsee you not that this war shall
vex the realm long years, and that the man Charles
Stuart must in the end prevail? For, lo you! even
now these covenanting, crafty Scots, whom may
the Lord confound, are hankering, as the Israelites
of old, after the fleshpots of the heathen. I tell
you, of a verity, if they might cast the net of their
deceptions over this groaning landeven the foul
abomination of an established Presbyterian church,
sterner than prelacy, yea, more intolerant than
papistry
itselfthey would desert us straightway, and
unsheath the sword, edgeless although it be, and
wielded by most weak and coward hands, to raise
the king unto his former place, and stablish him in
all the might, as he is steady in the will, to work
upon our heads his ancient tyranny.
Something of this I have perceived, Ardenne
C 2
replied, and Ioath am I to own it even to mine
inmost
thoughts. But, on my conscience, I believe
that Manchester and Essex wish not to see the
parliament prevail too fully. Nay, more, I
grievously
suspect the Scottish leaders, and have done
so from the beginning. It may be that I wrong
them, but I
do
hold that their only object from the
first hath been to force the bigoted and iron
discipline
of their presbytery upon this kingdom,
intolerant
,
inquisitorial, meddling, vexatious, and
fanatical
.
Nor do I think that they would strike one
blow for liberty, save in this rooted hope.
You do not, Edgar Ardenne, you do not wrong
them, exclaimed Cromwell, joyously. I do
rejoice
that you have read them rightly. And would
not you do somewhatsomewhat to free our necks
from this most bitter yoke of spiritual bondage
to cast this burden from our conscienceswould
you not venture somewhat?
Much, much! cried Ardenne; I would both
do and venture deeply, an I could see the method
and the time.
Verily, I will show thee, answered the other;
to-morrow do we hold a solemn fast and a
soul-searching
self-inquiry to the Lord in all our
congregations
,
and all our preachers shall exhort us
truly the Lord hath put one leaven and the same
into the hearts of all, and with it shall we all be
leavenedshowing us how unjust and scandalous
a thing it is that we, the members of the houses,
should engross all offices, both of the army and
the state; giving a cause to backbiters and to
malignants
that they should scoff and cry, `Haha!
lovers of gain rather than lovers of the Lord!
self-seekers
,
striving for the soft and elevated places!
belly-gods hungering and thirsting for the fat things
and the sweet things of the land!' Then shall we
move before the commons, Sir Harry Vane and I,
a self-denying ordinance, whereby no member shall
hold, any more, any commission in the armies of
the land. So shall these stiff-necked nobles be
forced to yield the sway they have so misemployed,
and Fairfax, honest and trusty Fairfax, shall take
the place of doubting Essex.
For a moment Ardenne pondered deeply, and it
was now his turn to strive to read the countenance
of his companion, but all was dark, mysterious,
and inscrutable. Your scheme, he said at length,
your scheme is naught, for by this ordinance you
must
yourself
resign your truncheon; and, I care
not although I say it, I hold
you
the main pillar of
our armies in the field. Your scheme is therefore
naughtnor could it pass the lords.
The lords! said Oliver, with a grim sneer;
trouble yourself not for the lords! Truly the
time hath come when they must do even as the
commons bid them. And for the rest, surely there
is a way
An
honest
way? asked Edgar, sharply, for,
to say truth, General Cromwell, I like not these
by-paths of counsel; still less like I this calling
upon holy names, this feigning inspiration and for
ging miracles, this quoting and interpreting the
word of God to justify things politic and worldly.
Go to! go to! cried Oliver, but with a dark
and subtle smile; thou talkest as a babeyea, as
a very suckling, that knoweth not the hearts of men.
Know thisall things are honest that are wrought
for honest ends. Moreover, many pious souls
there beyea, conscientious, tender, and
God-fearing
soulsthat will not lend themselves to any
work, how honest in itself soever, without they
seek the Lord and learn his pleasure. I say there
is a way, ay, and a righteous way, whereby we
may retain our leading of the new-modelled host,
and marshal it to glory.
How so? I see it not, said Edgar, wholly
unconvinced
by Cromwell's specious sophistry. It
must be most gross practice.
Surely we may resign our sittings in the
house, answered Oliver, very slowly, watching
the effect of every word upon the face of Ardenne,
if it be better for the people of the Lord that we
continue with the army.
And wherefore not they also?
Wherefore not interrupted Cromwell
wherefore, but because they, being peers of
England
,
their seats hereditary, their privileges
indefeasible
Well, sir, Edgar broke in upon him before
his speech was half concluded, I see your plan,
and I believe that you
mean
honestly;
nevertheless
,
I like it not, and I will none of it. I love
not devious counsels.
And will you then fall off? inquired the other,
evidently much annoyed; will
you
, that have
performed such mighty deeds for the good cause,
fighting the faithful fight for Israel, will you fall
off to those whom you know wavering and fickle,
if that they be not absolutely traitorous and false?
I will do nothing, Master Cromwell, on that
you may rely, I will do nothing, Edgar replied, in
quiet but stern tones, that both my head and heart
approve not. I may not in my conscience vote for
this your measure; for though I quarrel not with
the effects, but deem them most desirable, I do
abhor
the means. I may not vote against you, for I
yet more dislike the course of your opponents.
Neutral I will not be; therefore to-morrow I
resign
my seat. There be not any measures in
debate
in which I care to mingle. In matters of
religion
my voice is still for universal liberty; all
systems of exclusion, whether they be Presbyterian
or papistical, I hold alike despotic, bigoted, and
Jesuitical, and I will vote for none of them. I will
devote my parts where most they may availto
the ordering of my soldiery.
Be it so, answered Cromwell, somewhat
relieved
;
be it so, since it may not be as I should
deem for the better. But not the less shall we
prevail in this thing, only hold thou my counsels
secret.
I am not wont, said Ardenne, not a little
ruffled
,
to fetch and carry; and, as I said before, I
do believe that you mean honestly; to-morrow,
then, I shall resign my seat, and straight go down
to the army.
Farewell, then, till the springtide; and then,
then
, Edgar Ardenne, under command of the right
gallant Fairfax, full early shalt thou see and own
the wisdom of my measures. The next campaign
mark! mark, I say, my words, for they are of
the Lordthe next campaign shall be the last for
Charles.
CHAPTER VIII.
By Him who cannot lie,
Each bright intelligence that studs the pole,
Planet, or fixed, or wild eccentric star,
With some weak mortal hath connexion strange
Of good and ill. Yea, from his natal hour
O'erlooks his fortune, culminating proud
Foreshows his glory, but with watery hue
Sanguine and dim prophetic points his wo.
Some
months clapsed, as they had both surmised,
ere Ardenne again fell into contact with his
superior
officer; and, in the interval, not one, but all of
those great changes which the latter had predicted
had indeed come to pass. After much fierce
contention
the self-denying ordinance, although
opposed
to the utmost by Hollis, Glin, and Stapleton,
and all the leaders of the Presbyterian faction,
passed both houses; Fairfax was named chief
general
of the parliament, and, by a series of intricate
manuvres, affairs were so arranged that
Cromwell
,
still retaining his commission of
lieutenant-general
,
was not required even to resign his seat
in the commons. It was an evil omen for the royal
party that Laud, after remaining in confinement
during
four whole years in the tower, was now brought
to his trial, condemned, and put to death by
ordinance
of parliament, having in vain produced a
regular and ample pardon, under the king's hand
and seal. None, therefore, were surprised that,
like all former efforts at a reconciliation, the treaty
entered on at Uxbridge utterly failed in its results,
the king on one side and the commissioners on the
other exhibiting so much of haughtiness and
unaccommodating
spirit, that, unless by a miracle, no
peace could have been possibly concluded. So
much time had, however, elapsed in the debates at
Westminster, and so late was it in the session ere
the ordinance became a law, that the new model of
the army was not accomplished till the spring was
far advanced; and, ere the Independents were
prepared
to take the field, Charles had already gained
some trivial but encouraging successes. The town
of Leicester had been taken by assault, and
miserably
sacked by the wild cavaliers, who, as their
means decreased, fell more and more into those
desperate excesses which rendered, in the end,
their very name a byword for debauchery and
license; nor this important city only, but several
other garrisons had been stormed sword in hand;
while the new-modelled army had done nothing but
suffered a repulse from Borstall House, and made
a most unprofitable demonstration against the
university
of Oxford. Having received false tidings
that Fairfax had sat down in form before that city,
which might be deemed the capital of loyal
principles
,
the king marched hastily with some eight
thousand men, hoping to raise the siege, and force
the general to a battle ere he should be joined by
Cromwell with his cavalry; but hearing, after he
had advanced as far as Daventry, that Fairfax was
so near him as Northampton, he the same day
retreated
upon Harborough, intending to fall back on
Leicester, where he might draw more infantry from
Newark to his banner, and tarry the arrival of his
northern re-enforcements.
On the thirteenth of June the army of the
parliament
took up its quarters for the night about a mile
to the south of the small town of Naseby, the
ironsides
,
with Ardenne's regiment of horse, being a
little
in advance on the right wing of the position, and
occupying a commanding station on a range of
gentle eminences. It was a calm and lovely
evening
so
still and breathless that the smallest rural
soundsthe lowing of the cattle from the rich
pastures
in the vale belowthe bay of mastiffs from
the scattered grangesthe hooting of the owls from
many an ivy-mantled pollardeven the breezelike
murmur of the distant riverwere clearly audible,
in singular but pleasing contrast to the ruder sounds
of the nocturnal camp. The moon, in unveiled
gorgeousness
,
was hanging in a sky so perfectly
transparent
as is but rarely witnessed under the humid
atmosphere of England, and millions of bright stars
were flashing like diamond sparks in the unclouded
firmament. Edgar had only joined that afternoon,
and, taking orders from the general in person, had
not as yet fallen in with Cromwell; but now, when
he had seen his men duly provided with their rations,
his horses picketed and well supplied with forage,
and all precautions taken needful for a night to be
passed under arms, be made his way along the lines
toward Oliver's headquarters. Some two or three
tents, rudely pitched about the centre of the ridge,
with six or eight fieldpieces in battery before them,
and the red cross on the blue field of the Covenant
drooping around its staff, from which the gentle
air had not the power to move it, readily showed
him whither to direct his footsteps; but, somewhat
to his wonder, on reaching Cromwell's tent, the
sentinel on duty there informed him that the
lieutenant-general
had gone forth alone, beyond the
outposts of the army, to wrestle with the Lord in
prayer, even as holy Samuel went forth to cry
unto the Lord his God for Israel, that he might
save them our of the hands of the Philistines.
Anxious, however, to see him before the morning,
Edgar, inquiring of the sentinels and of the
scattered
groups of soldiers who were engaged cooking
their evening meal about the watchfires, easily
followed
on his track, and at last, having proceeded
some few hundred yards beyond the farthest
outpost
,
discerned the figure of a man kneeling upon
the open plain in the full moonlight, with both his
arms outstretched toward heaven. The clear light
glanced upon the polished iron of his morion and
breastplate; and, even more than this, the harsh
tones of the speaker, as he sent up in vehement
profusion
his wild supplicationsor remonstrances,
for such they were in factto the throne of grace,
announced to him distinctly that he had found the
object of his search. Before he reached him
Oliver's
prayer was ended; and, rising from his knees,
he stoodhis feet a little way apart, and planted
with colossal strength upon the mossy sodgazing
with an air of calm enthusiasm upon the glistering
heavens.
And thou, bright ruler of my destinies, thus
Ardenne, to his deep astonishment, heard him
exclaim
,
thou that didst smile upon my natal hour
thou that, through every change and chance of
this my mortal course, hast given evident and
never-failing
tokens both of my weal and wothou
that, when through long years I wallowed
unregenerate
and foul in the abyss of low and
soul-debasing
sin, wen dim and clouded ever with thick
darknessthou that, in after days, when, by the
gracious mercy of that long-suffering and
beneficent
Lordwho willeth not the death of a
sinner
,
but rather that he should turn from his
wickedness
and livemy soul was touched of grace,
and mine understanding enlightened to the
sinfulness
of my ways, wert seen to shoot forth
scintillations
pure as the seven living lamps that burn
before the throne, which are the seven spirits of
Vol. II.D
Godthou that, before the bloodred field of
Marston
,
whereon the Lord vouchsafed unto the
humblest
of his servants to fight the great fight and to
win the crowneven the crown of victory,
conjoined
with sanguine Mars didst shine pre-eminent
beam on! beam on, with that serene and placid
gorgeousness, which fills my soul with the high
confidence of coming triumph! Ha! who goes
there? he shouted, in a sharp, harsh key, strangely
at variance with the wild enthusiastic accents of
his previous meditations. Stand, ho! and give
the word!
The sword of Levi! answered Edgar,
promptly
;
lieutenant-general, I greet you on the eve of
battle!
Ha! Colonel Ardenne, by the voice, cried
Oliver; right glad am I now to encounter you.
I heard of your arrival, and truly I rejoiced that
we should once more ride together into the strife
of men. Surely the gentle beauty of the night
hath tempted me to wander forth and commune
here alone with mine own spirit. I do profess it
is a most fair scene; saw you the stars at any time
shine forth more gloriously?
It is indeed a night of most unusual beauty for
this our English climate, Ardenne replied,
somewhat
surprised at the uncommon turn the
conversation
had thus taken. I have seen many such,
however, in Italy and Spain. But I knew not that
you were so deep an admirer of naturemethought
that men had rather been the subjects of your
observation
.
It is not that, it is not that, said Cromwell,
although all
His
creations must needs be worth
man's study. But have you no belief in the
connexion
of those brilliant and mysterious twinklers
with the career of men  the course of great
events?
In truth not I, answered the other; nor do
I see how such belief can be consistent with the
Christian's faith in a supreme and all-commanding
Providence.
But I do, Cromwell interrupted him; I see
not wherefore the Eternal may not divulge a
portion
of our fates by means of these, the most
sublime
of his creations; nor wherefore the appointed
angel, who ministers to every one of mortals unto
righteousness, may not be likewise the presiding
spirit over some one of yonder glorious worlds. I
do believe it fullyyea, I have proved it. Lo!
see you not you large clear star, there to the east
of Lucifer, and higher toward the pole, brighter
than all the planets? It shone upon my birth, and
from my boyhood upward have I known and
marked the face of that far sparkler, and ever has
it varied with the varying of my fortunesdim
and most melancholy in my benighted days of evil,
but glorious, as you see it now, when aught of
greatness or of glory was in prospect. See how
it shoots forth jets of most pure light. No other
star doth likewise. Verily, verily, the Lord shall
work great things for us to-morrow!
I have heard tell of this before, Ardenne
replied
of
this your superstition, for so I cannot
but consider it; and likewise, that you fancy how
you saw a vision years ago.
Fancy!
fancy
I saw a vision, cried Oliver,
impatiently. I tell you, Edgar Ardenne, as
plainly as mine eyes behold you now, I saw that
dusky formas clearly as mine ears drink in your
doubting accents, so clearly did I feel the tones of
its immortal voice. How should I
fancy
such
things? I was then but a boya wayward,
headstrong
,
and most ill-conditioned schoolboy. It was
a Sabbath night, and I lay wide awake, plotting I
know not what of orchard-breaking or of
henroost-robbing
for the morrow, when suddenly a strange
and thrilling fear crept over me. I knew that I
was not alone, though I saw nothing. I felt as
though a pair of mighty wings were spread above
me, chilling my very soul. I would have cried
aloud, but my voice choked within me. I would
have risen up and fled, but could not move a finger;
and yet, although I say it, I was then bolder than
my years betokened, and feared not man or devil.
It was a night of murky darkness, but suddenly a
faint and pallid light filled the whole chamber, not
emanating from one brighter point, but uniform as
daylight, though very dull and ghastly; my
curtains
were drawn suddenly asunder, and a tall misty
shape stood in the opening. I tell you I did see it
perfectly and plainly, for I did not faint, though
my flesh quivered aguelike, and the cold sweat
stood in beads upon my brow, and my hair bristled,
as instinct with life. There stood it while I could
have reckoned twenty, and then a deep slow voice,
of strange and solemn harmony, rolled forth
without
an effort`Arise! arise,' it said, `thou that
shalt be the first in England!' It vanished, and
all again was darkness, but the voice was tingling
in mine ears when the next sun was high in
heaven.
And do you credit this? asked Ardenne,
fixing
his eyes with something of suspicion on the
face of the enthusiast. Do you trust in this
prophecy
?
Does this
dream
actuate your waking
movements
?
And wherefore not? said Cromwell; the
elder Brutus, he who made Rome free, was called
the
First in Rome
, and Father of his Country.
A man may be the first, and yet not king nor tyrant.
Cannot you credit this?
I fear me, Edgar answered, very gravely,
that this vision
was
a spiritthe evil spirit of
ambition
!
Beware, I say, beware how you give heed
to it! Truly there is not much about me of the
antique Roman; but did I thinkas half I doubt
even now  that this same vision were but the
working of an unholy thirst for power, which may
one day induce thee to lay violent hands upon thy
country's freedom, I have yet so much of the
Cassius in me that I would thrust this sword,
which I have buckled on to fight thy battles, into
thy very heart, ere thou shouldst live to find thy
vision truth!
We! wo is me, what have I said? cried
Oliver
,
apparently much moved; alack! alack!
truly
the flesh is weak, but strong and sincere is the
soul. Well hast thou said, my friend, and rightly
wouldst thou do, should I be rendered subject to
the temptings of the Evil One. Wo! wo is me,
that I should be mistrusted; surely, if this heart be
not honest, then there is neither faith nor honesty
in man. But thou, Lord, knowestthou beholdest
yea, thou searchest the most inward thoughts of
this thy servant. Continue me, then, oh thou
merciful
and mighty one, continue me thine
instrument
,
and shield me from the power of the Evil
One; and be thy word a lantern to my feet; and
keep me, even as I now am, thine, oh Lord, thy
servant, and thine only! and with the words he
burst into a violent passion of tears, mingled with
sobs so choking and hysterical that Edgar was
alarmed, half for the intellect, half for the health
of the strange being in whom he felt so deep an
interest. Within five minutes, however, the
ecstasy
had passed away, and, as if he had forgotten
D 2
all that had just occurred between them, Cromwell
addressed him now in the decided although quiet
accents of command. Soh! Colonel Ardenne,
you will join your men forthwith. Go over once
again your roll-call. See all be in right state for
carly action. One hour hence report to me your
numbers at my tent. And with a slight but
courteous
inclination, he turned his back, and walked
away toward a watchfire round which some dozen
of the ironsides were grouped. Food was before
themammunition-bread, steaks of beef rudely
cooked upon the embers, and a black-jack or
leathern
tankard of strong ale, while several pipes of
Trinidado were sending forth their powerful fumes
above the savoury odour of the viands.
Ho! Hezekiah Sin-despise, said Cromwell,
addressing a grim-looking trooperfor he knew
every one of his men personally and by name,
how fare ye here? Have the knave
commissaries
dealt with ye righteously? Surely ye must
not fast, else shalt the flesh be weak upon the
morrow
.
Yea! general, returned the independent, 'tis
very righteous truth. Wilt not thou taste thyself,
so shalt thou judge how fares the sturdy but
rough-coated
private, on whom doth fall the brunt and
burden of the service?
Take, eat! exclaimed another of the soldiers,
tendering to him a wooden platter heaped with
beef and bread. Eat, drink with us to-night, as
we shall fight with thee upon the morrow.
Will I not? answered Cromwell, seating
himself
beside the speaker, and helping himself
heartily
to the plain but wholesome food. When he
had finished eating he filled a cup of ale, and,
nodding
to the troopers, quaffed it until he nearly saw
the bottom; then, with a hoarse laugh, 'Twere
evil manners did I not share with
thee
, Born-again
Rumford, he exclaimed, since thou didst share
so courteously with
me;
and, instantly suiting the
action to the word, he chucked the rinsings of the
cup full into the broad face and grizzly mustaches
of the man who had supplied him with the meat.
Thou hast it therethou hast it fairly,
Born-again
,
shouted the soldiers, much delighted by the
practical jest of their stout leader.
I know not truly, Oliver continued, with a
grim smile, whether indeed this Rumford hath
been born again, either in flesh or spirit; but this
I do know of a surety, that he is now
Baptized-again
hey,
Rumford? Hand me a pipe of
Trinidado
,
he continued, turning toward another of
the military saints, who sat near grinning heart
and soul at the rough witticism. Think ye now,
men, that fretonhe is your commissary of the
horse, I trow, and sees to these your rations
think ye that Ireton, and Desborough, and
Rossiter
fare any wise more daintily than ye?
Ay, marry! answered Rumford, somewhat
sulkily, the private and the officers be not alike
in aught. Saw we not Master Zedekiah,
Desborough's
secretary, bear, not five minutes since, a
right fine haunch of grease, and store of flagons of
Bourdeaux into his master's tent. Lo! there go
Rossiter, and Jepherson, and Fight-the-good-fight
Egerton, to banquet even now upon the fat things
of the earth!
Ha! is it so? cried Cromwell, his eye
lighting
up; verily, then, the kid shall be preserved
from out the spoiler's jaws, and given as a feast
unto the shepherds! yea! even unto those who
watch! See here, Baptized-again; I go hence
straightway to my quarters. Enter thou in to
Desborough's
pavilion, and summon them all instantly
to meet me at my tent in council. When ye shall
hear three taps upon the kettledrum, then rush in,
all of ye, and fall to bravelyspare not to spoil the
haunch, nor yet to drain the flagonsI, even I
myself, will stand between ye and the fierce wrath
of your officers.
Cromwell! Live Cromwell! shouted the
delighted
soldiers; now may the Lord preserve to
us valiant and trusty Cromwell!
The object of their rude praises turned aside;
but, ere he went, another rugged jest displayed yet
farther the wild humour which at times possessed
him; for, as he passed behind the back of the tall
trooper whom he had addressed as Sin-despise, he
took the pipe out of his mouth when he had
kindled
its contents by two or three quick puffs to a
red heat, and struck the bowl so sharply on the
rim of the man's corslet, that all the blazing ashes
fell down his neck, between the shirt and skin.
Now may the Devil shouted the trooper,
springing to his feet.
Ho! swearest thou? Fy! fy! for shame!
cried Oliver. Orderly officer, set Hezekiah
Sindespise
down in thy book, five shillings for an
oath. Truly, thou shalt no more be known as
`Sin-despise,' but rather as `Overcome-by-Sin.
Again the soldiers roared their merry
approbation
,
till Oliver, surveying with a mirthful aspect
the contortions of the scalded veteran, and moved
to some compassion by his rueful countenance,
drew forth his purse, and, taking out the fine,
handed
it to the non-commissioned officer. Our
discipline
must be preserved, he said, and the foul
vice of swearing I do abhoryea! utterly. But,
in that some share of the fault was mine, who
tempted the loud railing of this rash Rabshakeh,
verily I will pay the sum in which he standeth
mulcted. Tush! twist not thyself, man, to and fro,
nor grin as though it hurt thee. Methought my
ironsides were proof 'gainst fire as well as steel!
and, without farther words, he hastened to his tent,
where he found Ardenne waiting with the list of
his returns. When all the council shall have
entered
in, he whispered to the sentry at the door,
strike three taps on the kettledrum, and suffer
none to come in or to go out after. Scarce had
he spoken ere the officers made their appearance,
Desborough wearing a marked air of sullen
discomposure
,
and all save Ireton, whose spirit was
of a higher and a nobler mould, showing some
symptoms of vexation.
Give you good evening, gentlemen; please you
draw nigh to the table, Oliver exclaimed, and
make me your reportspast doubt we shall engage
to-morrow. And for wellnigh an hour's space
he kept them there engaged in various details of
military service, some, truly, of importance, some
trivial and almost unmeaning; when at length all
was finished, Soh! we have done at last, he
said; have you supped, gentlemen? So far as
goes a crust of bread and cheese, and a good cup
of alecampaigner's fareI can supply you, if
you will tarry here and eat with me.
Thanks, worthy general, said Rossiter; but,
in good sooth, we were just at the sitting down
in Desborough's tent when that your summons
reached us. He hath, I know not how, wrung
forth a noble haunch of venison and store of
Bourdeaux
wine from some misproud malignant here at
Naseby!
Soh! soh! right creature-comfortstrust
Desborough
for that! Cromwell replied; why spoke
ye not of this beforehand? my business might have
tarried; but let me not detain you. Farewell
until
the morrow.
Not so, fair sir, Desborough answered, please
you to walk with us and share our supper.
Nay, I have supped already, he replied,
with some good fellows of Jepherson's stout
regiment
.
Well, since you be so pressing, I will e'en
walk down and crush one cup of wine with ye;
and, without farther words, they all proceeded,
conversing
gayly as they went, toward the tent of
Desborough. They reached it, and how strange a
scene was therethe canvass flapping on all sides
open to the airthe lamps streaming and flaring
in the night windthe seats around the table
occupied
by a dozen or so of rough-looking
cuirassiers
,
quaffing the rich wines, hacking the now
dismantled viands with knife and dagger
laughing
,
whooping, and shouting in their joyous revelry
while a score, at the least, of others waited till
these had finished, to fall in and take their turns.
Now shall you see, said Ireton, who
understood
the scene at half a glance, our stout host,
Desborough, foam like a baited bull. This is, I
warrant me, one of the general's jestssomewhat
rude; yet do the soldiers prize him all the more
for them.
Damnation! muttered Desborough, in
violent
though smothered fury, but this doth pass a
joke!
Yea! 'tis a
passing
good one! answered
Oliver
,
with an attempt at wit which drew a laugh
from the carousers; but surely thou didst swear;
a fine! a fine unto our treasury; look to it, Mr.
Commissary! So, now, these excellent good
fellows
have watched with their lights burning, and
their loins girded up, and they have their reward.
Art thou an hungered, Desborough? Nay, then,
our worthy Ireton will find you rations; less
delicate
,
perchance, than yon fat haunch that was,
but savouring more justly of the camp, and more
proportionate to the hard messes of your
fellow-soldiers
in the Lord. Fy! fy! but this was
gluttony
;
and the means, too, if I mistake not, won by
extortion! But enough of this! Off with ye to
your quarters, ye well-fed knaves, and snore off
this carousal; and ye, fair gentlemen, though
supperless
,
good rest to ye. Right bravely shall we
breakfast on the morrow, an Rupert keep his
purpose
.
The Lord save ye!
CHAPTER IX.
The night is past, and shines the sun
As if that morn were a jocund one,
Lightly and brightly breaks away
The morning from her mantle gray,
And the noon will look on a sultry day.
Hark to the trump and the drum,
And the mournful sound of the barbarous horn,
And the flap of the banners that flit as they're borne,
And the neigh of the steed, and the multitude's hum,
And the clash, and the shout, `they come! they come!
Byron's
Siege of Corinth
.
At
an early hour of the following morning,
while the east was yet gray with the lingering
shadows of the night, the army of the independents
drew out into line, and formed itself on ground of
the most advantageous nature. This was a long
range of low hillocks, dominating the whole plain
or valley that separates the towns of Harborough
and Naseby, the latter lying in the flat a little to
the northwest of the parliament's position. Their
centre, for the most part, was made up of
musketeers
and pikemen, with a good park of field
artillery
,
and Fairfax's life-guard in the reserve, the
whole commanded personally by that true
gentleman
and gallant soldierthe right wing was
composed
of Cromwell's ironsides, with Rossiter's and
Ardenne's lighter regiments; while the left,
consisting
likewise all of horse, was under Ireton's
direction
.
All their arrangements were completed
ere the first flush of daylight broke through the
leafy screens of woodland which fringed the
eastern
verge of that wide champaign; but soon the
thin clouds that were scattered over the summer
sky assumed a rosy tinge; a flood of golden light
succeeded, and then the great disc of the sun
himself
rushed up in living splendour from the low
horizon. The vapours gradually melted from the
lowlands, and disclosed a beautiful expanse of
rural
scenery; deep velvet pastures studded with
noble
trees, green hedges rich in the flowery
garniture
of spring, masses of forest throwing their dark
blue shadows in long checkered lines across the
laughing meadowsall sparkling with the
morning
dewdropsall clothed, as with a radiant
mantle
,
in gay and gorgeous sunshine. The cattle
lowed in the abundant valleys, the lark sprang
upward
from the pearly sod, the rooks sailed forth
upon their matin voyage, their harsh voices
pleasingly
mellowed by the distance, the hares limped
through the young wheat, scattering the dew from
the thick herbage in lengthened mazesbut not
one sound or sight was there betokening aught
save happiness and peaceful quietude.
The royal host, meanwhile, was also in array
some six miles distant, on a height just south of
Harborough, and posted yet more strongly than
their enemies, could the mad impetuosity of those
whom Heaven had marked out for destruction have
tarried to avail itself of their advantage. But, as
the day drew on, Rupert, who led the cavalry of
the king's rightleaving the centre under Lord
Astley, and the left commanded by the noble
Langdale, still in position on the hills, with the life
and horse guards in reservedashed forth, two
thousand strong, to reconnoitre. About the same
time Ardenne's regiment had been detached for
a like purpose; but that wary partisan, feeling
his way with caution through the wood-roads and
defiles of the valley, easily detected the advance of
the royalists, himself unperceived. Placing three
troops in ambush, with instructions to check the
prince's march by one deliberate volley, and then
to fall back on the spur, he drew the rest off, and
in a short half hour had the satisfaction of
collecting
his whole force under the guns of their
position
,
Rupert having been fairly staggered by the
fire of his skirmishers. Still, with his wonted
obstinacy
,
that rash leader porsisted in believing that
the Puritans were in retreat, and despatched
message
after message, to order first, and then to hurry
the advance of the main army, which left its
vantage
ground and fatally descended into the open
plain; so that, before three hours had elapsed, the
generals of the parliament might see the whole of
the king's host rushing like birds into the fowler's
net. With admirable foresight, Fairfax resolved
to suffer them to clear the broken country ere he
should attack them; seeing that, if defeated, the
enemy must be cut off among the lanes and passes,
which would be choked with fugitives the instant
that the battle should be turned into a rout. The
ground immediately below the hill was open, as
was the whole width of the slope, excepting two
or three stout timber fences and a group or two of
trees, which were at once pulled down or felled
by Ireton's pioneers, leaving as fair a field for the
encounter as ever was defaced and trampled into
Vol. II.E
gery mire by the death shock of thousands. A
little after ten on that bright summer morning,
Rupert's
bold cavaliers had cleared the woodlands;
the heads of Astley's columns were seen slowly
taking up their ground, and wheeling into line to
form the centre, while Langdale with his northern
horse was toiling at a full mile's distance in the
rear to bring up their field-ordnance. Still no
material
opposition was offered to the royalists,
except
that now and then a solitary cannon belched
forth its snow-white cloud, and hurled its shot with
terrible precision into the crowded files as they
debouched upon the plain. But now the trumpets
of Sir Marmaduke were heard upon the left, and
he appeared with all his Yorkshire chivalry; though
still the cannon of the cavaliers were at the least
a mile behind, encumbered by the fat loam of that
fertile district. Still the impetuous Rupert paused
not; the instant that the cavalry of Langdale came
into view upon the left, his bugles sounded for
the charge; and with a cheery shout, leading his
fiery squadrons, himself the foremost man, he
hurled himself against the horse of Ireton with
the velocity and brightness of a thunderbolt.
Forward
they rusheda torrent of plumes, scarfs, and
rich embroiderytheir brandished rapiers
glittering
aloft like lightning, and their high-blooded
chargers tearing the turf to atoms in their furious
speed. Such was the fury of their onset, that,
neglecting
to discharge their carbines, they plunged
at once into the closest conflict. There was a
clang as of ten thousand smiths plying their iron
trade! a shout that was heard, as men say, at
Harborough
!
And brave although they were,
stubborn
and resolute, the cavalry of Ireton wavered
in vain their high-souled leader strained every
nerve and bled at every pore; new here, now
there; rallying, shouting, charging; in vain he
crossed swords with the fiery prince, and checked
him for one momentthey bent, they broke, they
fled; then flashed the pistol-shots, and in
unbroken
force over them swept the cavaliers! The
ground was cumbered with the slainbut still,
over the dead and dying, over the voiceless
trumpet
and the tattered banner, over the mute
dismounted
ordnance, amid the groans and
blasphemies
,
the shivering clash of steel, the neigh of
maddened chargers, and the wild shouts of his
victorious troopers, on charged the daring leader!
on! fetlock deep in gore!
Now, an he wheel upon our flank, the battle
is half lost already, bissed the deep tones of
Cromwell in the very ear of Ardenne; but lo!
the Lord hath blinded himthe God of hosts hath
robbed him of his understanding! See where he
drives along, heedless of aught save massacre and
havoc. Ho! by the light of heaven, this day shall
crown the whole.
And, in good truth, neglecting all, wild as the
whirlwind, that destroys and still sweeps on,
hearing
destruction it knows not and it recks not
whither, Rupert pursued the flyersmile after
mile they fledmile after mile he followed
beyond
the heavy ordnance, beyond the baggage of
the parliament, cheering until his throat was
parched
,
and his voice clove to his jaws! slaying until
his sword was blunted, and his arm weary and
exhausted
!
Scarce five troops of the whole left
wing had held their ground, and these under the
valiant Ireton, as, fired by the success of their
companions
,
Astley's stout infantry came steadily and
firmly onward, charged gallantly upon a stand of
pikesthey were hurled backward as from a
castle
wall; and still that deep array of pikes rolled
onward. They rallied, and again they charged,
driving their horses in upon the serried spears, and
firing their pistols in the faces of the sturdy
footmen
.
But the cavaliers received them as the bull
receives the mastiff, and hurls him from his
unseathed
fronttheir leader was dismounted and
made prisonertheir bravest were stabbed down
and mangled by the goring pikesthey scattered
and fled diverse. But now the musketry awoke,
mixed with the louder bellowing of artillery; and,
save the rolling smoke-wreaths which packed above
the hosts in the calm hush of the hot noontide, and
the red glare that ever and anon surged upward, and
now the waving of a standard, and now the flash
of wheeling weapons half seen among the volleying
clouds, naught could be now descried. Yet still
the royal foot pressed on, unbroken and invincible;
and Fairfax, though his lines fought stubbornly and
well, and formed again when shaken by the
musket-buts
and halberts of the royalistswho hardly
fired a shot, still fighting hand to handand poured
their volleys in deliberate yet fast, felt that he still
was losing ground, and that the vantage of the hill
alone preserved him. On the right of the
parliament's
array the conflict had been long delayed,
for Langdale had scarce formed, even when
Rupert's
charge had pushed the horse of Ireton clear
off the field; and Cromwell dared not flank the
foot of Astley, lest he should be in turn outflanked
by Langdale. But now, with kettledrum and
trumpet, and shot of carbine and of pistol, Sir
Marmaduke
advanced upon the gallop; and Cromwell,
tarrying not to receive his charge, swung forth his
heavy squadrons, with a thundering hymn, to meet
him. An officer rode forward from the
Yorkshiremen
,
as both lines halted to reload, and Oliver
dashed out in person to encounter him. Their
pistols were discharged in vain, for Cromwell's
bullet glanced from the corslet of the cavalier, and
the other fired at randomthen blade to blade
they met; a dozen passes flashed with the speed
of light between them; their horses wheeled and
bounded obedient to the bit; Oliver missed a parry,
and his morion with the chin-strap severed fell
clanging to the ground; but, without hesitation, in
he went, and hailed so thick a storm of blows upon
his foeman, that he beat down his guard and hurled
him headlong. The whole passed in an instantere
another had elapsed the adverse lines were mingled;
yet, as they closed, Born-again Rumford sprang
to earth, caught up the general's morion, and tossed
it to his saddle-bow. Hastily, as he galloped on,
shouting his battle anthem, and still at every shout
striking a cavalier down from his saddle, he threw
the morion on, but with its peak behind, and so
unwittingly fought on through all that deadly strife.
Equal in numbers and well-matched in spirit, the
tug of war was dubious and protracted between
the Northern horse and the unconquered ironsides;
but, in the end, Cromwell's enthusiastic energy
prevailed
,
and Langdale, fighting to the last, was
driven from the field. Then! then was the
superior
moral of Oliver's men proved past doubt.
Obedient to the first word, they drew off, careless
of plunder or pursuit, although their blood was
stirred almost to phrensy by the protracted struggle
and by the beat of their religious zeal.
Oh! Ardenne, on! Oliver shouted, as he
halted his own five regiments. Pursue
pursue
!
suffer them not to rallysupport him,
Rossiter
;
away! Break them to piecesscatter them!
The Lord of hosts hath given them a prey into our
hands! All glory to the name of our God!
And, as he spoke, he wheeled at once upon the
E 2
flank and rear of Astley's infantry, which still
maintained the conflict in the centre, slowly but
steadily forcing their way against the stubborn
valour of the puritans. One hope remained for
Charlesone only! In the reserve himself, with
his lifeguard, commanded by Lord Lindesay, and
his own picked horseguardshis
troupe dore
of
nobles
under
the Earl of Litchfield, and Rupert's
best foot regiment, in all some thirteen hundred men,
fresh and unwearied, who had not, on that day,
unsheathed
a sword or pulled a trigger, he had a fair
occasion to draw out and fall upon the flank of
Cromwell, as he swept round to charge the foot;
and so, to do him but free justice, he proposed.
Bidding his trumpets sound, and drawing his own
rapiersheathed as he was in glittering steel from
crest to spur, conspicuous by his broad blue scarf
and diamond Georgehe plunged his rowels into
that snow-white charger, rendered immortal by the
deathless pencil of Vandyck. His pale and
melancholy
features transiently lighted up by strong
excitement, Follow me, he exclaimed, follow
me, all who love Charles Stuart. Full of ecstatic
valour, they sprang forthanother instant would
have hurled them on the unexpecting and unguarded flank of Oliver, who was already hewing his
way, crimson with blood from plume to
saddle-bow
,
through the now reeling infantry. The charge
must
have been perilous to Cromwell in the
extreme
might
have destroyed him utterly; and,
had it so fallen out, the victory was the king's, for
Rupert's scattered troops were even now
beginning
to return, and Fairfax could scarce hold his
own. But the charge was
not
made! Whether
from folly, cowardice, or treason, it now can never
be discovered, the Earl of Carnewarth, a mere
cipher
in that band of England's noblest peers,
seized
on the bridle of the king. Saul o' my body,
he exclaimed, in his broad Scottish accent, will
you, then, go upon your death this instant? and,
ere the hapless monarch could comprehend his
meaning or arrest the movement, he dragged his
charger toward the rear. Then, on the instant, a
strange panic fell on all around, so that they fled
upon the spur, although no enemy was near them;
and though, at length, the king's exertionswho
spurred through the ranks beseeching them to
stand, and even striking at the fugitives in
impotent
but noble indignationbrought them to rally
and ride back toward the field, the moment had
gone by! It was too late! For Fairfax, when he
saw how Cromwell had succeeded on his right,
and felt the consequences of his charge upon the
royal foot, in the disorder of that sturdy mass,
moved down at once his own lifeguard from the
reserve, and brought it into action. The prince
had, indeed, just returned from his insane pursuit;
but his men, deeming that their part was played
for that day, could not be brought to form again on
charge by any effort of their leaders. And now
but one battalion held its ground, a solid square of
foot, presenting an impenetrable front of pikes on
every side to the assailing horse, while from its
inner
ranks it poured a constant shower of balls, that
mowed down all before it. Cromwell, meantime,
was overthrowing every thing, traversing Astley's
line from the left endwise toward the centre, when
Fairfax, wheeling his lifeguards round upon the
rear of that undaunted square, charged it himself
in front. Two horses were shot under him; but,
a third time remounting, he brought up his men,
though shattered by the constant volleys, to
renewed
exertion. In the last deadly rush his helmet
was torn violently off by a pike's pointthe
colonel
of his lifeguard proffered his ownbut no!
bareheaded as he was, he dashed upon the spears
he hewed his way into that serried bandwith
his own hand he cleft the ensign of the regiment,
who crossed his path, through morion and scull
down to the very teethhe waved the captured
banner round his head, and threw it to a private for
safe keeping, who afterward would fain have
claimed
the honour. That line of pikes once broken,
in swept the independents with the rush of a
springtide; and, where it fought, that firm
battalion
,
refusing quarter and resisting to the last, was
trodden to the earth, annihilated, but unconquered.
The victory was complete, the rout disastrous!
Even to the walls of Leicester Cromwell's fierce
zealots did execution on the flying cavaliers; from
three miles south of Harborough to nine beyond
it, the country was one widespread scene of flight,
and massacre, and havoc. Five thousand of the
royalists were slain or taken, from an army which
had mustered but eight thousand in the morning.
Two hundred wagons, laden with arms and
baggage
,
all the artillery and colours, the royal
standard
,
and the king's own carriage, fell to the victors'
share; and, above all, that fatal cabinet of letters,
whichthough, with a delicate and generous point
of honour not often to be met with in such times,
Fairfax declined to open themwhen published
by the orders of the parliament, proved, past all
doubt or question, the utter insincerity of Charles;
and his resolveas firm at the last hour as when
he first set up his standardof reigning, if at all,
a monarch irresponsible and absolute.
That victory decided the campaign, and that
campaign the cause of England's freedom!
CHAPTER X.
To that father's heart
Return, forgiving all thy wrongs, return!
Speak to me, Raimond, thou wert ever kind,
And brave, and gentle! Say that all the past
Shall be forgiven! That word from none but thee
My lips e'er ask'd. Speak to me once, my boy,
My pride, my hope!
Hemans
Vespers of Palermo
.
The
action, having raged incessantly from ten
o'clock till one, sank into sudden silence after the
charge of Fairfax, which, like a hurricane, swept
all before it; and, ere another hour from that time
elapsed, the field was utterly deserted, except by
those who, having fallen in the full tide of violence
and fury, now slept as soundly and as well upon
the gory turf as though they had departed from
their peaceful beds amid the weeping ministry of
friends; or those less fortunate, who lay hopelessly
writhing in their mortal agonies, scorched with
the death thirst, and torturing the tainted air with
their unheeded lamentations. The hot sun poured
his steadiest and brightest rays over that scene of
carnage, glancing as if in mockery upon the
gorgeous
dresses, the rich armour, and the noble
steedslately so full of fiery life and beauty
which shed but now a halo of false glory over the
horrors and the misery of warfare. The
round-heads
had withdrawn to their encampment on the
hills, and were recruiting themselves, after the heat
and labours of the day, in that deathlike and
absolute
repose which is the sweetest balm to soul and
body, equally exhausted by the tension of unnatural
excitement. No plunderersthose human
vultores
that haunt the battle-field to render horror
yet more horriblecrept stealthily among the
dying
and the dead; for, such was the severe and
ruthless
discipline of Cromwell, that the few sordid
spirits who necessarily mingled with the high
enthusiasts
of freedom and religion dared not even
by night, much less in broad daylight, for their
lives, to exercise their odious calling. But the
ravens
had already flocked in hundreds to the plain,
lured by the scent of carnage from the wide
woodlands
of Northamptonshire and Huntingdon, and
now sat perched upon the neighbouring trees,
waiting
the evening darkness to commence their
loathsome
meal, while several large kites and buzzards
sailed slowly round and round in lofty circles, as
fearing to alight while any breath or motion
remained
to their intended victims. Such was the
aspect of the ground across which Edgar led his
men, returning from the first pursuit of Langdale's
cavalry, which he had urgedhis military ardour
tempered by Christian mercyno farther than was
needful to prevent their rallying that day; and it
had given him more pleasure than he had felt for
many a month to see with what a generous and
British sentiment his men, though hot in blood, the
most part wounded more or less severely, and all
exasperated by the fall of many a gallant comrade,
refusedeven when urged by the fierce
exhortations
of their more fanatical commandersto strike
an unresisting foeman. While they fought front
to front, their hearts were hardened and their hands
unmerciful; but when the rush and fury of the
conflict had passed over, they felt that those poor
fugitives were countrymen and brothers. How
trumpet-tongued does this fact cry aloud in the
behalf
of those much slandered independents, whom
it has pleased the writers of grave, sober history
all either Prelatists or Presbyteriansto represent
as stern, morose, bloodthirsty, and remorseless.
In the protracted fight and in the hotly-urged
pursuit
eight hundred only of the royalists were slain,
and of these more than three fourths occupied the
ground whereon they foughtcut down,
flagrante
prlio
, with weapons in their hands; while
Rupert's
onset, and the massacre which followed it,
needlessly savage and unsparing, alone cost
Ireton's
brigade more lives than the whole royal loss!
The prisoners, not the slainthe prisoners and the
results were the true tests and trophies of the
victory
at Naseby. But these were not the thoughts
which crowded on the mind of Edgar as he rode
sorrowfully back across the red arena of his party's
triumph; he looked upon the dead, as they lay
stiff and cold, outstretched in serried ranks, even
where they fought and fell, like swathes before the
mower's scythetheir feet toward their foemen,
their grim and gory faces turned up reproachfully
toward the placid heaven, their backs upon their
native earth, and every wound in front; and, as he
looked, in very bitterness of heart he beat his
bosom
with his hands till his steel corslet clattered.
Not one of these but died, in his own creed,
self-justified
not
one but deemed himself a patriot and
a martyrthe churchman as the puritanthe fiery
loyalist as the severe republicaneach battling for
his country's righteach honestly believing his
opponent the rebel or the tyrant! Alas for
human
reason! Alas for human error! Alas for
vanity and ignorance, for blindness and
presumption
!
Alas for right and wrongfor virtue and
for vice! Wherewhere on earth shall we
discover
the distinctionhow test them here below,
save by the arbitry of the false harlot fortune
save by the sophist touchstone of success? At
every step his charger's hoof plashed with a
sickening
sound in the dark curdled gore that flowed
commingling from the wounds of that fine
aristocracy
that
old high stock of English gentlemen,
polished in courts, athletic and well-skilled in every
manly feat or rural exercise, second to none as
scholars in the forum or as soldiers in the field,
lowly in bearing to the low, open and frank among
their peers, haughty and proud to their superiors!
and of that independent yeomanry, fearless, and
generous, and free, remote alike from insolence
and cringing, dauntless and stanch in war, blunt
and sincere in peace, the children, tillers, owners
of the soil! both races equally England's
peculiar
and appropriate sons, known to no other land.'
And wherefore lay they here, never to gladden
hall or cottage moretheir energies, their virtues,
their devoted love lost to their native land for ever?
Was itwas it, indeed, for England's goodwas
it, in truth, for the pure cause of liberty that they
had fallen there, self-immolated victimsor was it
but for man's insatiate ambition? Was it, indeed,
a trial between the principles of tyranny and
freedom
,
or a vain struggle between this and that
oppressor
a
conflict between principles of legalized
authority and arbitrary sway, or a mere strife
between
the interests of Cromwell and Charles
Stuart
?
Such were the gloomy thoughts that sat so
heavy at the heart of the young conqueror; such
the unanswered doubts that led him almost to
distrust
himself, almost to curse the hour when he
joined the standard of the parliament; but it was
not long ere more immediate cares, sorrows more
near and kindred, diverted, if they could not
overpower
,
the half prophetic achings of his patriotic
soul. The course which Langdale's fugitives had
taken, far to the right hand of the field, prevented
him on his return from meeting the main tide of
the king's army, which, scattered irretrievably,
covered
the plain toward Harborough. He therefore,
rode directly to the post of Cromwell. It was near
three of the afternoon when he arrived, and found
the leader of the ironsides mounted again and at
the head of his brigade, refreshed by their brief
halt, about to set forth instantly in the pursuit.
Before he started on his march, however, he
handed
several letters to an orderly dragoon, who stood,
booted and spurred, with a broad leathern belt and
a despatch bag buckled round his waist, waiting
his orders. This, he said, this to the
honourable
William Lenthal, the speaker of the commons
house of parliamentwith your own hand,
remember
,
your own hand!this to the worshipful Lord
Saythis to good Master Miltonand now get
you gone; let not the grass grow under your
horse's hoofsbe swift and trusty. Ha! Colonel
Ardenne, he continued, his brow overclouded as
he saw him, a word with you apart; then, as he
drew him to one side, truly the Lord, he said,
hath blessed the general cause with mighty
triumph
I may say with a great and crowning
mercyand, therefore, it behooves us not, with
weak and fainting hearts, to sorrow over-deeply
for our own private griefs. Surely whom the Lord
loveth most he chastenethis not this righteous
truth?
Undoubtedly, Edgar replied, not unsurprised
by the peculiar manner of his leader;
undoubtedly
it is; but wherefore say you this to me?
Yea, and he tempereth the wind to the shorn
lamb. So may he temper it to thee, humbly and
fervently I trust, honest and valiant friend, in thy
time of affliction. Much have I prayed and
wrestled
with the Lord since I did hear
Vol. II.F
Whatwhat? I pray you speak,
lieutenant-general
,
if you know aught concerning me or mine.
There needeth not this tampering with the subject;
I can endure to hear aught of affliction human
tongue can tell me.
Be you so strong? said Cromwell; man,
then, your heart; for, of a truth, your father is a
prisoner in the camp, sore wounded  ay, unto
death, I fear me.
Where lies he? Edgar inquired, with a voice
so preternaturally calm that Oliver himself gazed
at him wondering. Hath he had any help?
I caused him to be borne, Oliver answered,
down to the village yonder, even unto the house
of the Episcopalian priest; two of his own
domestics
be about him, and General Fairfax hath sent
his own chirurgeonbest hasten, though, if thou
wouldst see him living. I march forthwith; but
tarry thou behind until the fourth day henceso
long may I dispense with thee. Then join me at
the half-way house 'twixt Harborough and
Leicester
,
at the first hour after noon. Farewell, and
may the Lord look down on thee! The trumpets
sounded, and the ironsides filed off at a sharp trot,
and Edgar, mounting hastily on a fresh horse, and
calling several of his body-servants to attend him,
rode furiously away along the broken lanes toward
Naseby.
The vicarage was a low rustic tenement,
distinguished
from the neighbouring cottages by
nothing
but its superior neatness, and its close vicinity
to the square ivy-mantled tower, and the
yew-shadowed
yard, with its low mossy graves, of the small
village church. A noble lime-tree, myriads of bees
humming and revelling amid its scented blossoms,
overhung the grassplot in the front, and a thick
growth of honeysuckle crept over the whole
building
,
curtaining porch and roof with its close-matted
verdure, and peeping with its honeyed trumpets
through the latticed casements. Each hut and
cottage
through the hamlet had been converted into a
temporary hospital for the reception of the
wounded
from the near battle-field; but, by the group of
horses, guarded by a stout knot of troopers, and
the two sturdy sentinels who kept the door, the son
knew instantly the sojourn of his father. Curbing
his horse so violently up that he had wellnigh fallen
on his haunches, he sprang down, and rushed under
the low doorway. Just as his foot was on the
threshold, a person whom he judged to be the
surgeon
was passing outward.
How fares he? Edgar gasped, the words half
choking in his throat; how fares your patient?
Have you any hope?
The man of healing shook his head. None
not the slightest, he replied; the ball hath
severed
all the main intestines. The hemorrhage
has ceased externally, and he is easier now;
mortification
must ensue; he cannot live six hours!
I have done all I may in quieting his agonies
man can no more.
Bending his head to veil the bitter anguish that
racked his manly features, Ardenne passed onward;
directed by a gesture of the silent sentinel, he
entered
the small parlour; and there, upon a
temporary
couch, the window-curtains drawn aside, the
lattices thrown open to admit the slightest draught
of air that might be stirringthe old steward of his
household wiping the death-sweat from the massive
brow and long gray locks of his loved master, while
the big teardrops fell like rain down his own
withered
cheeksand the white-bearded vicar kneeling
in silent prayer beside the deathbed of the cavalier
there lay his father, with his high features pale
and sharpened by the near approach of death, and
the froth gathering round his bloodless lips, and the
dark drops of icy perspiration bursting from every
pore of his broad temples. No groan or murmur
passed the mouth of the calm sufferer, but one
sad, querulous, and oft-repeated cry, Comes he
not yet?not yet? but when the foot of Edgar,
lightly although he set it on the floor, clinked with
its jingling spurs upon his ear, he started half erect,
and drew his hand across his eyes as if to clear
away the gathering mists. 'Tis he, he cried, in
tones distinct and clear from the excitement of the
moment, a faint flush lighting up his ashy cheeks,
but instantly departing, 'tis he at lengththank
Godmy son! my son! and into that son's arms
he sank, and lay there as contentedly as though no
cloud of anger or mistrust had ever come between
them, smiling up with a faint but most kind smile
into his face, and clasping his convulsed and
trembling
hand with all the little strength his mortal
wound had left him. For many moments Edgar
could find no voicehis whole frame shook with
agonyhe sobbed as though his very heart would
burst, gazing upon the countenance of that loved
parent with dry and burning eyes, and a throat
choked by the convulsive spasms of a tearless
sorrow.
My boymy own boyEdgar, the old man
faltered forth, at length, take not on thusoh! take
not on thus bitterly. 'Tis but the course of nature
the old must die before the young; and Iwhy
I have fallen full of years and full of honour,
although
myself I say itand I am glad to die thus
thus
, with your arms about me, Edgar. But I
have much to say to you, and I can feel my time
grows very short to say it. Our reverend friend,
to whom I owe so much, good Master Winterfield,
will pardon us a little whileand Anthony, old,
faithful Anthony, will leave us. We have not met
in many days, and we would fain be private ere
we part, and his voice failed a little, and a tear
stood in his clear gray eye; part, as we must,
for ever. We will recall you, he continued,
presently
,
for I would fain pray with this holy man
ere I go hence to stand before my Maker. There
was a pausea long, sad pause, as all obeyed his
words, broken by nothing but the hard breathing
of the wounded man and the strong sobbing of
the mourner.
Edgar, the old man said, at length, are we
alone? Have they all left us? and then, his
question
being answered, This is a sorrowful yet a
most happy meeting; for I feelI feel here, and
he laid his hand upon his breast, that that kind
heart of yours has pardoned all the wrongs, the cruel
and unmanly wrongs, which I have heaped upon
you. Is it not somy boymy kind and noble
boy?
Oh! speak not thus, he answered, when he
could force a word, oh! speak not thus, my father;
you have been ever goodtoo generous! too good!
'Tis I'tis I alone, may Heaven forgive me, that
have been to blame. Say only that you pardon
me, and bless me, oh my father.
No! no! exclaimed Sir Henry, with more of
energy than he had spoken yet. I will
not
I
do
not
for I
have
naught to pardon. Never
never, from your most early yearshave I had
cause of aught save joy and pride in you. And
you wereyas! you were the joy, the pride, the
only anchor, the last stay of my lone widowed
heart, till England became mad, and this
accursed
and unnatural war rushed over us, tearing
asunder every gentle link and blightiong every
F 2
warm affection. But I have naught, even here, to
pardonfor I have been, even here, alone to blame!
But II too was mad!
Oh! no, cried the repentant son; it was my
duty to obey youto bear with youto do, in
every thing, your bidding
Not so! Sir Henry once more interrupted
him. 'Tis no man's duty to obey in things
against his conscience; and I was but a foolan
obstinate and merciless old fool, that would not
even hear you. Nay, more! nay, more! he cried,
wringing his hands with mental torture, rash,
miserable sinner that I am, I would have slain you
but for that angel girlslain
you
, that would have
never been within my power but for your
self-devoting
efforts to preserve me. And I
have
slain
your quietudeyour peace of mind for ever!
blasted your hopes of fireside happiness
banished
you from the dwelling of your fathersrobbed
youay, robbed you of your heritagedivorced
you from your bridecut short your hopes of
leaving
your high name to sons as glorious as
yourself
.
All thisall this, and much more have I
donemuch more! and, as he spoke, he sank
back quite exhausted by his own vehemence; but,
in a moment, disregarding the entreaties of his
son that he would not wear out his faculties with
this most needless passion, I willI will, he
answered; I will go through with my
confession
.
Reach me that cup, and hear me; he
drained the draught of some mild opiate mingled
with wine and water, and proceeded. Much
more of deadly sin than this! I am the murderer
of Sibyl. For an instant Edgar fancied that his
intellect had failed him, and gazed hopelessly upon
his face; but there was no glare of insanity, no
idiot vacancy in those high pallid features. Yes!
he continued, I have murdered her. Have I not
seen her growing paler day by day, and thinner,
and more deheate and frail? Have I not seen her
pining hourly awaywithering beneath the blight
of her affections, like flowers beneath the carliest
frost-windsand yet, at every hour, more patient,
and more angel-like, and more unearthly in her
pure holy loveliness? and I have done this also
this foul and gradual murder! and she will waste
away before her time, and sink by inches into the
cold dark grave, blessing her slayer as she dies!
And thou, too, thou, my son, wilt live a sorrowing
and solitary thingfor thy strong noble soul will not
succumb to any violence or spite of fortunealone
upon the earth, like the last oak of a Druidic
grove, when all its brother trees have fallen by the
woodman's axemagnificent, and flourishing, and
stately, yet sad in all its dignityfriendless,
companionless
,
alone! and with the worm, the
never-dying
worm, busily gnawing at its heartyet
happier
than thee in this, that 'twas not by a father's
hand its green companions fell; not by a father's
hand the foul destroying worm was thrust into its
bosom! No, no! it cannot beyou can
not
pardon
me!
All this, said Edgar, calmly, yet much moved,
though smothering his emotion; all this is but
the work of Heaven. The Lord hath willed it so,
and we are but the instruments, the wretched
instruments
,
within the hollow of his hand. If you
have erred, as I say not you have, you erred in
honour, and believing yourself justified; but if it
be a comfort to you, hear me now, on my knees,
beside your dying bed, declare, that nevernever,
for one short momenthave I felt any wrath or
bitternessnever known any feeling toward you,
dearest and most honoured father, save the most
deep heart-springing reverence and love.
Sorrowed
I have, and deeply, that you misjudged my
soul, and disapproved the course my conscience
bound me to pursue; but never have I thought of
you as wronging menever presumed, nor even
wished to blame you. But yet, if there be aught
for which you need forgiveness from a childoh,
term most misappliedwith all my heartwith all
my soulin sight of men and angels, I bless you
and forgive you, oh my father.
And bless
you
, cried the old man, my
noble-hearted
boy. Heaven bless youand it will
it
must
bless such as you, and prosper you with
all its choicest stores, and make you tenfold
compensation
for your past and present sorrows; and
he drew down the lips of Edgar to his own, and
clasped his arms about his neck, and their tears
mingled long and silently, and their prayers went
up together to the throne of mercy; and with those
tears and that embrace, the bitterness passed by,
the iron was drawn out from the old warrior's soul.
The clergyman returned, the simple but
affecting
service of the church was feelingly performed,
the last most holy rite partaken, both by the son
and sire, the servants were called inthe faithful
followers of their lord through weal and woand
a faint smile, a sad farewell, a kindly pressure of
the honoured hand, dismissed each, weeping, not
as for a master, but rather as for a friend and
father, from the low chamber; and once again the
father and the son were left in solitude. There
they remained for hours; the old man, while his
painful breathing shock the couch beneath him,
calm, patient, and serenethe stately son bowed
down, and bent, as if by age, clasping the languid
hand that grew at every instant sensibly colder and
more pulscless, and sorrowing as one who would
not be consoled, although he choked his anguish,
lest it should but increase his father's sufferings.
The bright warm sun had long since sunk into
the west, and his last flush had faded from the sky;
yet so mild was the evening air that every lattice
was still thrown wide open, and the rich odour of
the woodbine and sweetbrier rose more profusely
on the senses when the plants were steeped in the
pure dews of summer. And now the dark blue
skies grew gradually lighter, as the moon, near her
full, soared slowly and serenely over the distant
trees. There was a whispering of the breeze in
the top branches of the lime, and from the odorous
shrubs in a far corner of the garden a solitary
nightingale, awakened by the glorious lustre of the
planet, started at once into its wild and melancholy
flood of song.
The dying man, who had sunk into a long and
tranquil slumber, moved now uneasily; he made an
effort to turn over, and the pain caused by the
motion
roused him, Sibyl, he muttered, hardly
yet awake, Sibyl, your song is wondrous sweet
to-night, but why so sad? it should be gay as
summer after this blessed union. Ah! he
continued
,
ah! as consciousness returned, I dreamed
I have slept pleasantly, and dreamed a most
delicious
dream. Is it late, Edgar?
The clock hath just chimed ten, Edgar
replied
,
I would have called for lights, but feared
to waken youshall I now do so?
No, he said, faintly, no, it matters not now.
How calm it is, and sweetthe blessed moonlight
streams in through the casement like Heaven's
own mild forgiveness into a sinner's bosom:
Edgar
,
when I am gone, say to my poor, poor Sibyl,
that, on my happy deathbed, my sole regret was
that I could not join her hand with yours for ever.
She will be yours now
now
that this miserable
war is endedfor it is ended, Edgar, and I regret
its termination less that I have lately seen much
in Charles Stuartin the kingthat I had
disbelieved
or shut my eyes upon before. He hath,
I must confess it, dealt insincerely with his
nearest
counsellors. He hath kept up a secret
intercourse
with the wild Irish rebels, through that
ill-minded
Antrim; and, I much fear me, he was
privy to, and instigated their first bloody rising
under the bigoted and barbarous O'Neill. Weak,
obstinate, and prejudiced he is, beyond all doubt,
proud and uxorious. I know that he stands pledged
in private to his queen never to give peace to his
people unless by her consentand all this done
against the counsels and without the knowledge
of those men who have a right to counsel him, ay!
and know his measuressince for him they have
risked their all!done in deep malice to his enemies
in deeper guile to whom he calls his friends! Out!
out! I say, upon such kingcraft! A good man he
may be, butit will outa bad king! But enough
of this. She will be yours, and you will both be
happy yetas I am nowmost happy! How
soothing is that sad bird's noteI could almost
believe it is prophetichow beautifulhow
beautiful
!
He was again for some time silent, as
though absorbed in listening or in thought; and
Edgar, who well knew his end was very near at
hand, was motionless, and almost breathless; his
heart was far too full for words. At length the
old man spoke once more, but now his voice was
very faint and low, and all its accents were so
altered
that his nearest friend could not have
recognised
a toneand his words came at intervals,
quivering, and slow, and interrupted. How
exquisite
,
he said, how exquisite this tranquil bliss.
Neverno, neverfelt I such complete peace
before
such
perfect happiness. Edgarmy time
is drawingnear. My feet grow numb and cold.
Kiss meboykiss me. The bird hath ceased
his song; even while he spoke, its notes were
filling
every corner of the chamber with its most
thrilling
melody. The moon hath set, yet she was
streaming full on his uncurtained couch; all
all is darkand silent. Timeit is timeto die!
My boymy own boy. Bless you  Sibyl!
Sibyl!
It was all overthe spirit had departed to its
God.
CROMWELL.
BOOK III.
There can be slain
No sacrifice to God more acceptable
Than an unjust and wicked king.
Milton
from Senecs
.
Vol. II.G
CHAPTER I.
The abuse of greatness is when it disjoins
Remorse from power; and, to speak truth of Csar,
I have not known when his affection swayed
More than his reason. But 'tis a common proof
That lowliness is young ambition's ladder,
Whereto the climber upward turns his face;
But, when he once attains the topmost round,
He then unto the ladder turns his back,
Looks in the clouds, scorning the base degrees
By which he did ascend.
Julius Csar
.
Two
full years had gone round since the defeat
of Naseby had paralyzed the efforts and destroyed
the hopes of Charles Stuart's party. During the
whole remainder of that fatal yeareven when
winter had set in with its most keen severitythe
arms of Cromwell swept like a hurricane over the
western and the midland counties. No leader
could compete with him on terms of vantage or
equalityno forces stand against him in the field
no town or garrison resist his prowess. Chief
after chief was beaten in detail; stronghold upon
stronghold surrendered, or was stormed sword in
hand; till, to conclude the whole, Winchester and
the long-disputed post of Baring House were
taken, and Astley, on the 21st of Marchthe sole
commander of the king's now at the head of any
powersuffered so total a defeat at
Stow-on-the-Wold
,
being himself made prisoner, with sixteen
hundred of his men, that he said frankly to his
captors, My masters, you have done your work,
and may go play, unless you please now to fall out
among yourselves.
His fortunes in the field being thus utterly
disastrous
,
after some fruitless efforts at negotiation
with the parliament and with the Independent
leadersnegotiation marked by all his usual
chicane
and insincerityon the fifth day of May
Charles threw himself into the quarters of the Earl
of Leven, then besieging Newark. How the Scots
dealt with their unhappy monarchwho,
whatsoever
were his faults, undoubtedly confided in their
honourthe world knows, for it has become a brand
of national reproach. Treated, from the first
moment
when they found he would not guarantee their
Covenant, and promise to establish Presbyterian
rule throughout the land, not as a prisoner merely,
but with indignity and insulthow, Judaslike, they
sold him to the parliament, and gave him up to
Skippon, like a mere thing of merchandise, on
payment
of two hundred thousand pounds, is history.
But not so, that it was several times in the
unfortunate
king's power to escape to France or
Holland
,
but that the menacing and angry letters of
his false queen, who had her own peculiar reasons
for dreading a reunion with her injured husband at
this moment, prevented him till it was all too late,
and, in effect, consigned him to the block. That
the uxorious and weak king was mainly
prompted
to the war by the ill counsels of his
adulterous
wife, is evident. Her prideher education
her hereditary prejudicesher selfwillnay, her
very birth itself, made it but natural that she
should aim at arbitrary power, and urge her
husband
,
himself obstinate as weak, to that insane and
suicidal policy which ultimately proved his ruin.
But that, herself in safety, she should, with cool
determined infidelity, insist on his remaining among
his deadly enemies, when hope was itself at an
end, would seem incredible, were it not fixed
beyond
a doubt by the existence of her threatening
letters and his heart-broken answers.
Immediately on his surrender to the parliament
he was removed to Holmby Castle, where he
remained
in close though honourable custody, served
and attended as a king, and suffered to indulge in
all his favourite recreations, though strictly
watched
,
and vigilantly hindered from any secret
correspondence
with his friends, and even interdicted
from communion with ministers of the
Episcopalian
church. At this very time there was in
progress
a desperate struggle between the
Presbyterians
and the army. The former, having already
utterly suppressed Episcopacy through the realm,
proceeded with the sternest and most bigoted
intolerance
of persecution against all sects, Papist or
Protestant, clearly demonstrating their resolution
to subject the whole kingdom to a system of
church governance, connected with the state, under
the Presbyterian form, as fully organized as that
which they had just put down, and ten times more
obnoxious to domestic freedomten times more
rigid, fierce, inquisitorial, and tyrannical. Against
these measures the Independents, who, although a
minority in both houses, were formidable from the
talents of the leaders, the enthusiasm of the mass,
the real justice of their cause, and, above all, from
the fact that they possessed the power of the sword,
the army being almost unanimously in their favour,
offered all constitutional oppositionbut to no
purpose
.
Petition after petition was presented, only
to be contemned and disregarded. Just at this
moment it was rumoured, and, as was shortly
proved, most truly, that the parliament was now
preparing to disband the army without payment of
its long arrears, and then to re-enlist it, under
Presbyterian
officers, for the conquest of rebellious
Ireland
a
plot most cunningly devised, could it have
been effected, for wresting their ascendency from
Ireton and Cromwell, and rendering themselves
unquestioned masters of the state. This instantly
gave rise to mutinies the most alarming; the army
organized itself into political divisionsthe privates,
under their adjutators, elected two from every
regiment
,
and the officers forming a superior council
and treated with the parliament, as a species of
fourth estate, holding itself under arms, and ready
for offensive action. At the first of this crisis
Cromwell opposed the mutineers with such
apparent
energy and zeal, that, for a time, he lost his
popularity with his own soldiery; and, shortly
afterward
,
having been accused, or, at the least,
suspected
,
in the house, of underhanded tampering
with the mutineers, he cleared himself to the full
satisfaction of all present by a most vehement and
overpowering burst of indignation, mingled with
tears, and prayers, and explanations, such as
removed
from every mind all doubts of his integrity.
Shortly, however, fresh suspicions were excited
among the Presbyterian leaders, who, dark and
wily in their own secret machinations, naturally
feared the like manuvres from their political
opponents
.
By some means it leaked out that a new
Presbyterian army was to be raised forthwith, the
veteran host compelled to disband at the sword's
point, and Cromwell, Ireton, and Harrisonthe
champions of the Independentscommitted to the
Tower. Thus forced, in self-defence, to concur in
those very movements which they had first opposed
as mutinyunless they should prefer to submit
G 2
tamely to their own destruction, and to the
overthrow
of all those principles of civil and religious
freedom for which they had so long and painfully
contendedthe military chieftains acted with all
that rapid and decisive energy which had
continually
signalized their conduct in the field. The
instant
they had ascertained the truth of these
reports
,
one Joyce, a man of well-proved resolution,
though by rank only cornet in Whalley's regiment
of horse, was sent to Holmby to secure the person
of the king, who was conducted with all the speed
consistent with respect to the headquarters of the
army; and such was the considerate and
honourable
bearing of the soldiery toward their captive
monarch, that, on Fairfax disavowing Joyce's
enterprise
and offering to send him back to Holmby,
he at once replied that naught but force should
urge him to it. And, in good truth, the difference
of his situation was so great as well to justify his
preference; and could he even then have laid aside
dissimulation, and acted with straightforward
singleness
of purpose, it is most certain he might
again have filled the throne of his fathers. Both
parties were, indeed, at this time willing, nay,
desirous
,
to reinstate the sovereign; for such a union
as that measure would have caused with the still
powerful, though beaten, faction of the cavaliers,
would have placed either permanently in the
ascendant
.
The Presbyterians proffered to replace
him on the throne, provided he would yield assent
to the substitution of a Presbytery for the
established
Church of England, endowed with all its
ancient
privileges, to the absolute suppression of all
other sects; and farther, to such cessions of
prerogative
as would have left him but the shadow of
a sceptre. The Independents stipulated merely
for universal tolerationexcepting only papistry,
which they insisted he should extirpate entirely,
root and branchand for the full securing to all
men of every constitutional and civil privilege. In
either case his life and throne would have been
both secured to him; yet could he not refrain from
playing off the one against the other faction, till
both had learned that they could place no
confidence
in his sincerity or truth.
While he continued with the army, all was, for
a long time, comparatively sunshine; at
Cromwell's
intercession, his childrenthe young Dukes
of York and Gloucester, and the Princess
Elizabeth
were
suffered constantly to visit him, and
to remain in his society. Two chaplains of his
own persuasionan indulgence sternly refused
him by the parliamentwere granted willingly by
the commanders of the soldiery, who, while they
asserted their own liberty to worship as they chose
to preach and pray themselves, and listen to the
exhortations, not of licensed gospellers, but of their
own military saintsconsistent at the least in this
were willing to concede to others, unlike the
bitterer
Presbyterians, the same rights which they
stickled for themselves. Fortified now by
possessing
,
not the person only, but the confidence and
favour of the king, the army moved toward
London
.
From Newmarket they marched to Royston,
Reading, and then Windsor; and at the latter place
Charles occupied his royal castle. Thence, after
some delay, advancing, they encamped on
Hounslow
,
their leaders holding constant although
guarded
intercourse with their now trembling and half
discomfited opponents. Early in August the king
was reinstalled in Hampton Court, and all things
seemed to be once more his own. His yeomen
of the wardrobe and the guard attended him; he
was permitted to hold levees of all parties; all his
own favourite advisers were permitted to resort to
him, including several under the ban of parliament.
There was, as it were, a general amnesty and
reconciliation
.
Members of both the houses visited
him; Cromwell and Ireton held close and constant
intercourse with him; and so sincere were these
in their intention to befriend him, that they
actually
commenced a correspondence with the queen's
emissaries, and suffered Berkeley, Legge, and
Ashburnham
once more to take their places in his
council. The adjutators of the regiments elected
by the privates, and members from the council of
the officers, attended him with terms so
advantageous
,
that Sir John Berkeley openly declared, that
a crown so near lost was never yet so easily
recovered
as this would be, were things adjusted on
these terms. Yet even then, hoping for
something
more, he haughtily and scornfully rejected
and, plunging headlong into a fresh scheme with
Lauderdale, assented to the covenant, on the
condition
that he should be brought at once to
Westminster
;
which he had the folly to believe would
place him where he was in power before the
outbreak
of hostilities.
The citizens of London and the militia of that
city greedily entered on the scheme, and signed
the covenant by thousands! Both houses instantly
voted this an act of treason against England; but on
that very night their doors were forced by a
tumultuous
and infuriate mob of Presbyterians, mingled
with concealed royaliststheir persons were
assailed
with violence and insulttheir very lives
endangered
!
Compelled by imminent and sudden peril,
they passed a hasty vote sanctioning the return of
Charies, but the next instant voted an adjournment,
as unable to deliberate with liberty of conscience;
and straightway a large party of both houses, with
the speakers, Manchester and Lenthall, at their head,
withdrew from the disordered capital, and finally
repaired to seek protection in the camp at
Hounslow
.
In the mean time, the violent presumption
of the king, unduly elevated by his supposed
success
,
and instigated farther by the intriguing
Ashburnham
,
induced him actually to treat with
contumely
the adjutators of the army, openly refusing
to concede the smallest jot of his prerogative, and
even intimating his intention again to force
Episcopacy
on the Scots. Inflamed to madness by this
strange tergiversation, the soldiers flew to arms;
and a strong party forced their way into the
chambers
of Lord Lauderdale, then in the palace, and
compelled him to return, having held no
communication
with the king, direct to London. A few
days after this, with the most perfect
shamelessness
,
the king in public solemnly disavowed his
dealings with the Covenanters, and once more
professed
entire confidence in the commanders of the
army, and feigned a vehement desire to come to
settled terms with them.
In London the remnant of the houses
commenced
a weak and futile effort at resistance; they
called out the militia of the city, appointing Waller
and Massey to command their raw tumultuary
levies, repaired the fortifications, and, in short, had
every thing in readiness for action except energy
and courage. After a rendezvous on Hounslow
Heath, the parliamentary seceders were welcomed
by the excited soldiery with the loudest
acclamations
and the sincerest tokens of affection. A
convention
,
held at Sion House, whereat Fairfax and
his superior officers assumed their seats in common
with the members of both houses, decided the
whole question; and on the sixth of August the
army entered London, without experiencing a
shadow of resistance, their colours flying and their
drums beating through the streets! That same
day the seceders were reinstated in their seats by
the strong hand of military power! the General
Fairfax was appointed Constable of the Tower,
and a thanksgiving voted with no dissentient voice
either of peers or commons! Thus was the
triumph
of the Independents finally determined, and
themselves raised to power not soon again to fall.
It was the second day after the entrance of the
army that Sir Edgar Ardenne, elevated to the
baronetcy
by his father's deathwho, though
becoming
gradually more and more doubtful of the purity
of Cromwell's motives, had played his part as
gallantly
as heretofore throughout the long campaign
of '46 and '47, and even shared in the deliberations
and proceedings of the army as opposed to the yet
darker machinations of the parliament  walked
forth to seek for some solution of his apprehensions
in the deep wisdom of his friend John Milton.
His mind had, in truth, long been in a dubious and
unsettled state; the tyranny of Charles, against
which he had taken arms in the beginning, was
something palpable and obvious, as was his
leaning
toward Romish doctrines, and his inclination
to fritter down as much as possible the broad
distinction
between the Catholic and Episcopalian
churches. It was, however, rather against the
king's aggression upon civil freedom than against
the abuses of the church that he had warred,
although
he saw the latter in so clear a light that he
felt no repugnance to make common cause with
those who viewed them as the greater evil. Now,
when the first oppressor was reduced, the first
assailants
of religious freedom beaten and trampled
under foot, it seemed too probable that a new
hydra-headed
tyranny would spring up from the
down-fallen
despotism, and greater outrages on liberty
of conscience follow than those which had called
England into arms. Such was, indeed, the certain
course of things, if, in the present struggle, the
parliament
should regain the ascendencywhich body,
it was evident, under the strong plea of necessity,
had already most alarmingly extended their
boasted
privilege, leaving all the assumptions of
prerogative
immeasurably in the rear, and which, now
that the conflict was decided, showed little
disposition
to lay down their dear-bought power.
Himself
a follower of the Church of England, Sir
Edgar
had seen little to find fault with in the old
establishment
,
except an over-rigour and a want of
toleration, which he would have extended to all
seets, except the Catholics, who were, in those
days, truly formidable, from their determined spirit
of conversion, their bigotry, and, above all, their
undissembled inclinatron toward arbitrary
government
.
He therefore looked upon the stern and
overstrained morality of the Presbytery with
feelings
of so deep dislike, that he would almost have
surrendered all the gains of the late war to hinder
its establishment as a predominating state-religion,
although he would have gladly suffered it in
common
with all other Protestant denominations.
With these views he had naturally joined the
Independents
in their contest with the parliament;
but now that they had gained the day, he was yet
ill at ease. A fierce fanatical hoplocracy would
be, it was self-evident, the very worst of
governments
,
and utterly subversive of the English
liberties
and coustitution. The wavering and dishonest
policy of Charles rendered his restoration all but
impossible; while, in the deep-laid and
unfathomable
mysteries of Cromwell's course, Ardenne
began
to foresee daily more and more cause for
apprehension
and for caution. Still, such were the
rare talents of the man, such his inexplicable
influence
over the minds of all whom he
encountered
,
that, while Sir Edgar doubted, he was
compelled
to grant that he had no cause for doubt
which he could make clear to himself, much less
to others. At times he fancied his religious
ecstasies
mere hypocritic jargon, adopted so to mystify
all eyes and veil his deep ambition; at others
and that, too, most soberly and oftenhe believed
him a wild, self-deceiving hypochondriacan
erring
,
though sincere enthusiast. Hitherto all that
Oliver had done had doubtless been of service to
the cause of veritable freedom; and it was certain
that his present opposition to the Presbyterians
might
prove quite as unselfish, quite as beneficial
to the commonwealth as his preceding opposition
to the king. Still it was too apparent to escape
the foresight of a politican so clear-headed and
far-reaching as Sir Edgar, that, if the military
faction
should gain firm foothold in the state,
Cromwell
would not lack either talent, opportunity, or
power to mount even to the topmost summits of
ambition, if he should feel the inclination to
attempt
them. And who, when all things most
magnificently
tempting shall lie prone, subject to his
mere will, yea, courting him to grasp themwhen
to dare almost seems a virtueto refrain a
despicable
weaknesswho can, in such a situation,
answer
for anotherwho even for himself?
Revolving such thoughts in his mind, and eager
to unbosom himself to some true friend, Sir Edgar
took his way, as has been said, the second evening
after the occupation of the city by the troops,
toward
the dwelling of John Milton. The
controversialist
had changed his domicil during this
troubled period, and now occupied a smaller house
in Holborn, opening backward upon Lincoln's Inn.
It was a lovely evening as ever smiled upon the
earth which Ardenne had selected for his visit to
the patriotic poet. The setting sun, that
alchymist
of nature, shone out so brilliantly from an
unclouded sky, that even the great wilderness of
walls and chimneys, for once seen through a purer
medium than their accustomed canopy of fog and
smoke, looked cheerfully. The same grave-eyed
and sober-looking servitor who had admitted him
at his last visit six long years before, opened the
door; and, in reply to his inquiry, informed him
that Master Milton was within, but in his garden;
and, ushering him into a small parlour, decked with
the selfsame dark-green hangings, offered to call
his master; but, declining his civility, Sir Edgar
walked himself into the narrow stripe of garden,
planted with a few lilachs and laburnums, all
besmirched
and dingy from the effects of the
London
atmosphere. At first he saw not any thing of
him he sought; but, in a moment after, he
distinguished
the full solemn voice, whose cadences,
once heard, could never be forgotten, proceeding
from a little arbour facing the western sun, and
covered by a mass of annual creepers such as
may easily be reared even upon the meanest plat
of soil. The sounds, however, were not as of one
engaged in conversation, but resembled rather the
accents of a person thinking aloud, or possibly
composing what might be afterward committed to
the safer guardianship of paper. The words
which reached his ear as he advanced were these,
at no long period subsequently published in the
poem styled II Penseroso.
The high-embowed roof
With antique columns massy proof,
And storied windows richly dight
Casting a dim religious light:
Vol. II.H
There let the pealing organ blow,
To the full-voiced quire below,
In service high and anthems clear
As may with sweetness through mine ear
Diseolve me into ecstasies,
And bring all heaven before mine eyes.
That which was most peculiar in the manner
of the speaker, if, as Ardenne suspected, he were
pronouncing thoughts which for the first time now
were couched in language, was, that they flowed
in one melodious and uninterrupted stream,
unbroken
by the slightest pause or hesitation, and
running, as it were, into spontaneous melody; as
unpremeditated as the music of a bird, the
murmuring
of a rivulet, or any other natural sound that
soothes the ear of man with untaught harmony.
He had not, however, much time to drink in the
sweet and solemn verses, for the quick ear of the
poetquicker, perhaps, as his sense of vision year
after year became less vigorousdetected an
approaching
footstep on the gravel walk; and,
ceasing
instantly from his employment, he stepped
forth to meet his visiter. The countenance of
Milton was but little altered, embalmed as it were
by his passionless and peaceful avocations,
excepting
that perhaps the furrows on his expansive
foreheadfurrows of thought, not agewere
somewhat
deeper, and the whole expression of his
lineaments
more subdued and even melancholy than
when they last met his friend's eye. The change,
if change there were, was slight indeed as
compared
with the havoc which anxiety, grief,
hardship
,
and exposure, more than time, had wrought
on the fine features of Sir Edgar Ardenne. His
glance was, indeed, bright as everhis carriage as
erect and dignifiedhis limbs as muscular, nay,
even as elastic. But the high manly beautythe
triumphant energythe soul out-flashing from the
face at every new emotionthe flush of youth
the glorious radiancy of a fresh mindwere utterly
extinct for ever. The features were, indeed, the
same in their proud classic mould, save that the
nose was sharpened, and that the mouth so
firmly set, rarely or never now relaxed into that
playful smile that used to light up the whole
countenance
like sudden sunshine. Deep lines were
visible, not on the forehead only, but hard and
sharply cut from either nostril downward. His
hair, still soft and waving, was streaked in many
places with premature and wintry gray; and, more
than all, a dull dead shadow had settled down
upon him with a gloom like that which an
autumnal
cloud will cast upon a landscape that, scarce
a minute past, was laughing in its sunniest
loveliness
.
At first sight Milton scarcely recognised his
friend and pupil; and when at length he framed
a half apology, attributing the blame to his own
great infirmity, becoming, as he said, as each
morn rose on its preceding night, but more and
more decided.
I thank you, answered Ardenne, grasping the
soft hand of the scholar with warm affection, I
thank you for your kindly artifice; but I well
know that hard seasons, and yet harder fortunes,
have so far changed me, that, were my mother
living
,
she scarce could recognise her son in the gray
weather-beaten soldier that alone remains of him.
But, after all, what matters it? what matters it that
our frail bodies should wear out and wither, when
even thus they outlive empires! But let us in
if I may so far trespass on your leisuremy mind
is ill at ease, and I would fain cast off some of its
secret burdens into ears which I know friendly,
wise, and trustworthy.
Milton assented with a kindly but grave
gesture
;
sympathizing more deeply than could have
been expected, from his unworldly habits and
philosophic
style of thought, in the appalling change
which he was well aware could have been only
wrought by singular affliction on the aspect of a
man whom he knew by experience, to be calmer
and more disciplined of mind than the most
chastened
of his austere contemporaries. They walked
in silence to the house, for too full were the hearts
of both to vent themselves in any converse of
small moment; but, when once seated in the
quiet parlour, Ardenue at once broke silence. I
have, he said, methinks, more than a common
claim on you for that advice and information
which I believe no man can so well afford me;
seeing that it was owing mainly to your
exhortations
that I determined on embarking actively
upon that stream of circumstances which has all
blindly swept me onward to this pass. Obedient
or, I should rather say, convinced by those your
exhortations, I have been, as you know, a
faithful
and unflinching, if unimportant, actor in the
events which have dethroned the kingabolished
the established churchand, to conclude, laid the
whole realmlaws, liberties, and lives of
Englishmen
at
the precarious mercy of an armed and
zealot multitude. In thus pursuing the dictates of
your
advice not less than of
my
conscience, I
devoted
myself wholly to what I
then
believed my
country's good. I have lostsacrificedevery
thing! I am alone among the ruins of my house
a sole and thunder-stricken column left standing
when its temple hath for ever fallen. My father
died at Nasebymy only consolation, that he
forgot
our differences, and blessed me ere he passed
away. My betrothed brideyou saw her once in
our young days of hope and promise, and know
her priceless worthis perishing by inches of a
pined and broken heart. But thisay! all this I
could bear, were it not that dark fears have grown
into my soul till I doubt every thingalmost my
own integrity and honour. A busy voice is
whispering
at my heart that I have forfeited all that
makes life a blessingnay, more, that I have
aided in destroying all those most dear to me, and
in the chase of a vain phantom! And more, yet
more than thisthat in the very chase I have but
been the sport and mockery of a falsehood. I
feel, I see, that England has been deluged with
the blood of her free sonsher valleys fattened
with the corpses of her best and bravesther
wise and pious prelates driven from out their
spheres of usefulnessher monarch, justly, I grant,
but fatally, held captive in the very palaces of his
forefathersher constitution plunged into the
wildest
jeopardy. All this I feelI see. The havoc
and the misery, the desolation and the peril! But,
when I look forward, all is blank and hopeless.
The worst view, anarchy in the state, and
persecution
in the church! For governmentan army
of sectarians and schismaticsfanatical, and
ignorant
,
and savage! For councila small knot of
officers; wild visionary madmen, like Harrison and
Lilburneenthusiasts, like Iretonor hypocrites
and mercenary knaves, like hundreds I
could
name,
but need not! and for churchan austere,
intolerant
,
morose, heart-chilling disciplineparalyzing
every noble aspirationcondemning every
innocent
and lawful pleasurehardening, and, at the
same time, lowering every heartconfounding
every real standardnarrowing all distinctions
between
vice and virtueconverting men into mere
hypocrites, or, worse, into mere misanthropes and
brutes! This is the darker side of the picture;
H 2
turn it! and the best viewtruly, the more I look
upon it, the more sure do I feel that it will come
to passthe best view is the resurrection of a
stronger dynastystronger, because supported
by a standing army, founded upon a conquest,
erected on the ruins of all that
did
oppose its
predecessor
,
and
cannot
oppose
it
a dynasty, with
for its founder and its head, mightier and more
dangerous a thousand fold than Charles, because
more wise, more valiant, and more virtuousstart
not, my friend, at what I am about to saywith
for its
tyrant
Cromwell
!
I have heard you without interruption,
answered
Milton, in his rich, persuasive tones, but
with sorrow, with attention, and with wonder.
Sorrowthat you have lain beneath the burden of
affliction, such as no fainting pilgrim of us all could
bear and live, did we not know that such is but the
test which the Supreme Artificer applies to try the
temper and the metal of our soulsthe purgative,
like fire under the rude ores of the mine, by which
he fits our corrupt bodies to put on incorruption.
Attentionfor that, although I trust to show them
baseless as the morning vapours which disappear
before the all-pervading daylight, your prognostics
are fraught deeply with the world's wisdom, and
your views of the presbytery entirely sound and
solid. Wonderthat you should doubt, or anywise
distrust, the purest and sincerest patriot, the most
upright judge, the stoutest man-of-war, the
trustiest
and most pains-taking Christian that the Lord
hath raised up, since the old days of Israel's glory,
to vindicate the liberties and wipe away the
sorrows
of an oppressed and groaning people.
I rejoice much, Edgar replied, to hear that
much is your opinion. I cannot say, indeed, that I
so much distrust
him
as I do the tide of
circumstances
which seem to flow on irresistibly toward
his elevation. Charles never can again sit on the
throne; no party can place confidence in him;
myself
I would not see him there, for whensoever he
should fancy he had gained the power, so surely as
we two are here conversing now, would he renew
these struggles. He is in heartby habitby his
very blood, a despot. But let me profit by your
wisdomto what end do you look, whether for
sorrow or rejoicing?
The lieutenant-general, answered Milton,
has gone hence but nowscarcely an hour
before
you came. Indeed, he passed a great part of
the morning with me in grave disputation; for we
did not, nor do we yet, agree. He would replace
Charles Stuart in the high places of his fathers,
dreading the tyranny of the parliament more than
he dreads the despotism of the kingthe
persecutions
of the Presbyterians beyond the persecutions
of the Prelatists.
Indeed! Sir Edgar answered, in great
astonishment
;
indeed! Then have I much misjudged
him. Restore Charles Stuart! I should have
thought he would have stricken off his right hand
sooner!
He would do so, however, Milton replied;
beyond all doubt he would. He deems he has
devised a scheme to fetter him within the bounds
of lawful power. Besides, he trusts his gratitude
mistaken trust, I fear me, on most unstable
grounds. He parted hence almost in anger, for
that I thwarted him and held his project naught.
And the terms? asked Sir Edgar; what be
the terms on which he would restore him?
Certain improvements in the freedom of
elections
,
returned the other, and in the rights of
parliament. The military power both by land and
sea, and the creation of all great officers of state,
to be for ten years vested solely in that body. No
person who has warred against the parliament to
sit for five years, whether as peer or commoner, or
to hold any office. No peers created since the
removal
of the privy seal in '42 to sit without
permission
of both houses. All grants made by the
king since that same date to be held void; all by
the lords and commons valid. The liturgy not to
be enjoined, nor yet the covenant enforced, but all
coercive power to be taken from the bishops and
the clergy. The king, queen, and the royal issue,
except in these points, to resume all their old
powers
and prerogatives without restriction; and,
lastly
,
an indemnity, to all but five delinquents, to be
granted in behalf of those who have served for the
king, whether in camp or council.
And does the king consent? Ardenne inquired
once more.
Surely he does, the poet answered; he
were mad to refuse conditions which, fallen as he
is, he could have scarce even hoped for.
It would work well, said Edgar, musing very
deeply. It would work excellently well if the
king might be trusted. ButI fear still. At all
events, the zeal of Cromwell to promote this
settlement
argues that I have been unjust in my
suspicions
.
Yes, I have greatly wronged him. But
you said that you differed from his views, and that
he went hence ireful and chafing. I pray you tell
mewhat, then, are your opinions?
Mine? replied Milton; my opinions are but
the musings of a solitary bookman, unskilled in
court or councilneither a statesman nor a
politician
;
yet, such as they be, you shall have them.
I would see England free! free and unshackled, as
was Rome in her fresh days of glory, ere she had
bowed the knee to any Kaisar; as Greece, when
she spurned forth the countless myriads of the
oriental
king from her unviolated shores, and reared
herself a bright example, pure and immortal, of
liberty unquenched, unquenchable! I would see
England subject to law, to reason, and to God
bending the neck to none`rousing herself, like a
strong man after sleep, and shaking her invincible
locks!' I would `see her as an eagle, muing her
mighty youth, and kindling her undazzled eyes at
the full midday beam!' yea, spreading forth to the
four winds of heaven her long-abused and fettered
pinions, superbly floating in her pride of place,
unscathed
amid the lightnings of the empyrean! And
wherefore, I would ask you, not? Consider what
we are and have been`a nation, not slow nor dull,
but of a quick, ingenious, and piercing spirit, acute
to invent, subtile and sinewy to discourse, not
beneath
the reach of any point the highest that human
capacity can soar to!' A nation not luxurious nor
effeminate, but of a hardihood surpassing that, I
say not of the frivolous, light Frenchman, not of
the polished and effete Italian, not of the indolent
Castilian, but of the frugal Transylvanian, the
winter-tempered
Russ, the mountain Switzer! A
nation
boasting itself the freeborn offspring of the
free! a nation that rolled back the flood of Roman
war from its interior fastnesses, when Rome was
at the mightiest! a nation that shall yetonce
freed from the soul-galling yoke of monarchythe
spirit-killing sway of Prelatists, and peers, and
papistssend forth her arms, her laws, her
language
,
and, above all, the lights of her religion, to
the remotest corners of the habitable earth, securely
throned on her sea-circled pinnacle of glory,
o'er-shadowing
the lands with her dominion, sweeping
the ocean-waves with her renown!
Dreamsdreams! replied Ardenne, shaking
his head mournfully; beautifulbeautiful dreams,
but baseless! Methought that you had studied
history more narrowly. There never has been,
from the world's birth till nowthere never shall
be, henceforth to the day when the great trump
shall sounda true republic! Rome, when her
kings were banished, was an aristocracya wise,
poor, frugal, brave, paternal
aristocracy;
foot after
foot her nobles yielded to the flood of what her
demagogues styled freedom; the moment when
she became republican or democratic, which you
will, that moment held her up a prize to the
successful
soldier. Her history was thenceforth
corruption
,
anarchy, bloodshed, proscription, Csar!
And what was Athens? If for a little while she
stood cemented by external wars, which forced her
to be single and united, what was her government
but a succession of bright usurpationsof
aggressions
on the people's rightsabuses of the people's
power, till, at the last, democracy prevailed; and
then  the thirty tyrants! Sparta, from first to
last, was the most close and austere oligarchy
the earth has ever witnesseday, oligarchy within
oligarchyan irresponsible and highborn senate,
holding their sway for life over an oligarchy of
six thousand warrior Dorians; who in turn
domineered
with a most iron sceptre over their myriads
of subordinate Laconians, myriads of scourged and
tortured Helots! These! these are your bright
examplesthese the republics of the universe!
For you will hardly quote me VeniceGenoa
Florencewherein not all a Petrarch's or an
Ariosto's
glory could veil the degradation of the
slavish
mobthe tyrant insolence of the brute nobles.
Dreams, I say once again  beautiful, but still
dreams! Alas, for human nature! how can we
look to see republics stand, unless we hope for
wisdom and for virtue in the councils and the
actions
of the masshow hope for these when
human
reason and Divine authority tell us alike, and
tell us truly, that the majority of men are ignorant
and prone to evil! But now, truce to discussion;
you have relieved my mind, at all events, from one
great dreadof having been, in truth, while I
supposed
myself, in some degree, a champion of my
country's weal, the mere tool of one man's
ambition
.
This was the point on which I chiefly sought
your counsel, and I am satisfied. And now let us
to lighter and more pleasing matters. I heard your
voice, as I approached the arbour, composing, as I
fancied, some new poem.
A triflea mere trifle, answered the other, as
if half reluctant to descant on such a subject; but
Ardenne's end was gained; the thread of their
original discourse was broken, and, turning thence
to poetry and the chief literary topics of the day,
a conversation followed, which, though of interest
enough to those who held it, was scarce of such
importance as to warrant its transmission to
posterity
.
CHAPTER II.
Nay, be thou sure I'll well requite thy kindness,
For that it made my imprisonment a pleasure
Ay, such a pleasure as encaged birds
Conceive, when, after many moody thoughts,
At last, by notes of household harmony,
They quite forget their loss of liberty.
But, Warwick, after God, thou set'st me free,
And chiefly, therefore, I thank God and thee.
King Henry VI.Part 3d
.
It
was a lovely summer morning, with a soft
west wind just ruffling the bosom of the silver
Thames, and wantoning among the graceful foliage
of the tall trees, and slenderer though not less
beautiful
exotics, which still adorn in such profusion the
gardens of that palace built by the haughty
Wolsey
,
but destined soon to pass into the hands of his
bluff master, and to descend to his posterity as one
of the most fair abodes of England's royalty. In
a magnificent apartment overlooking those
unrivalled
gardens, its ceiling gorgeously painted in
Italian frescoes with some of the most picturesque
creations of the Grecian fable, its walls draped with
brocaded damask bordered with arabesques of gold
two feet in width, and decorated with the
master-pieces
of Vandyck and Lely, in all but power a
king, sat Charles, gazing out with a sad but quiet
eye upon the flowery parterres, adorned with many
an urn and statuethe trimly-shaven lawnsthe
odorous thicketsand the alleys green, with the
broad monarch of his kingdom's rivers flashing out
brightly in the sunshine between the fluttering
leaves. His children were about him; the Duke
of York, the eldest, leaning upon his father's knee,
and looking up into his face as conscious of the
melancholy air, which had become almost habitual
to those unmarked but comely features, yet
ignorant
of the dark causes which had there imprinted
it; the younger Duke of Gloucester, and
Elizabeth
,
his little sisterjust at that happy age when
tears are but as April showers, succeeded instantly
by smiles, when sorrows pass away and leave no
sting behindwere busily employed imprisoning,
beneath a Venice goblet, a painted butterfly, which,
lured by a display of lovely summer flowers
bloomin
a large crystal vase upon the table, had flitted
in through the tall casements but to be made a
prize by the admiring children. A louder laugh
than usual, joyously bursting from the lips of the
young girl, diverted the king's mind for a moment
from his sad reflections.
My little girl, he said, half sorrowfully
smiling
,
you would not persecute the pretty butterfly;
see how it beats its painted wings against the walls
of its transparent prison, and rubs off all the downy
colours that you thought so beautiful. Know, my
Elizabeth, that poor imprisoned fly would now be
fluttering far away over the sunny gardens, in the
sweet morning air, sipping the dew from every
flower, happy and free; and you, by shutting it up
here, have made it very wretched; and it will pine
and die. See, it grows weak already; would not
my darling sorrow for the poor butterfly if she
should find it lying dead upon its prison floor
tomorrow
?
The child stared wonderingly, with her great
blue eyes wide open, upon her father, for he spoke
with a degree of serious and simple pathos, caused,
perhaps, by a sense of sympathy with the slight
insect, caged like himself, though in a splendid
prison; but, as he ceased, a big tear swelled upon
Vol. II.I
the lashes of either bright orb, and slid slowly down
over her rosy cheeks. I did not want, she said,
to make the butterfly unhappy. Will it die, papa,
now, if I let it fly away?
No, my sweet child, he answered, it will
revive
directly; all that it wants is the fresh air, and
liberty to go where it pleases.
Then farewell, pretty butterfly, she cried, half
weeping and half smiling, as she released the
captive
.
I should not love to be a prisoner myself,
Go and be very happy. See! see! he is gone
already
!
Heaven, in its mercy, grant you never may,
my child, Charles answered solemnly; but, if it
should please God that evil men should shut you
up, you must be very patient, and not hate those
who hurt you, but forgive them, and say your
prayers for them to your great King and Father in
his holy heaven, that he may pardon them, and turn
their hearts.
Do you do so, papa, she saiddo you do
so? For I heard you say one day that you were
a prisonerthough this pretty room can hardly
be a prisonfor I thought a prison was a dark
place under ground, all barred with iron grates,
and very terrible. Do you forgive your enemies?
Surely I do, my little girl, he answered, else
would not God forgive me. But, now, go play
for, see here, some one comes to speak with me;
and, as he said the words, the door was opened,
and a gentleman usher with his black rod entered
the chamber, and informed the king that the
Lieutenant-general
Cromwell was in the
audience-chamber
waiting his pleasure.
Admit him forthwith, Feilding; we will receive
him here, replied the king; and, hark you, pray
Mistress Drummond to come hither, and take
hence the children. We would be alone.
The usher instantly retired; and taking up his
high-crowned hat which lay upon the table,
without
any feather, but ornamented by a diamond
buckle in the band, he placed it on his head, and
seated himself before a writing cabinet of ebony
inlaid with ivory and silver. Scarce had he
settled
himself, with perhaps some slight view to
effect
,
when the independent entered. He was
uncovered
,
bearing his beaver in his hand, and bowed
low to the fallen sovereign, though he bent not the
knee, nor offered any movement to kiss hands.
It was a singular and interesting meeting between
two men, pitted by fortune for long years against
each other, and now thrown peaceably into
familiar
contact. The contrastthe marked difference
between the twoboth greatbut the one born to
greatness, the other having, by the energies of his
own mind, the actions of his own right hand,
achieved it. Their features spoke volumes as to
the distinction! The king's were, indeed, comely,
and full of a calm natural majesty, but bearing no
decisive marks of any ruling principle or passion
no radiancy of intellectno manifest impress of
character!mild, though at the same time
somewhat
stern, their chief expression was an air of
cold and melancholy resolution, not, perhaps,
inconsistent
with the traits of mind for which he was
remarkable. When gazed upon, indeed, by one
who knew him as the king, he looked it every
inch; but, had he been met in a crowd, attired as
a private individual, he would have been observed
for nothing but the easy bearing natural to every
highborn gentleman. The countenance of
Cromwell
,
on the contrary, owed all its influence over
the mind of those who saw himand powerful,
indeed
,
and universal was that influenceto the
undoubted
stamp of geniusto the indomitable
resolution
the
deeply-seated and unfathomable thought
the quiet but intense enthusiasm, graven in
living
characters upon his homely featuresto the
intelligence
,
in short, and soul that flashed out
palpably
from every line and lineament of his marked
face. Seen in the armour of the soldierthe
stateman's robe of peacethe plain garb of the
every-day staid citizenor the vile tatters of the
mendicant, he could not for a second's space have
remained unnoted as a superior creatureas a
man of vast unquestionable powers. But if, in
this respect, the carver out of his own mighty
fortunes
surpassed the owner of legitimate hereditary
sway, in bearing and demeanour there was no
comparison
.
Every position, every movement of the
king was redolent of ease and dignity combined;
and his reposethat hardest test of grace
carelessly
natural and unstudied, was as perfect in its
harmony and keeping as if it had been the result
of the most artful skill. The motions of the
independent
,
on the other hand, were sudden, rapid,
rough; his postures rigid and iron, when erect;
when seated, angular at any time and awkward,
but so more obviously when brought into relief by
contrast to the elegance of Charles. Both were
dressed simply for their station in society, the
king especially, who would have been outshone at
first sight by the poorest noble of his court. He
wore a plain suit of black taffeta, crossed by the
broad riband of the garter, silk stockings of the
same colour, with satin roses in his shoes, and a
short mantle of black velvet. His sword was a
plain mourning rapier, with a hilt of jet; but the
deep falling collar round his neck was of the
finest Brussel's point, and the star on the left
side of his cloak glittered with diamonds of the
purest water. His visiter, who, as he rose in
dignity
and station, had discarded the slovenly and
coarse style of his garments, was attired
handsomely
in a half uniform of marone coloured cloth,
faced with black velvet; a broad silk scarf of the
same hue was wound in many folds about his
waist, supporting his steel-hilted rapier. Military
boots, highly polished and equipped with silver
spurs, met his trunk hose, fashioned to match his
doublet, just below the knee; and a silk hatband,
with a silver clasp, relieved his dark gray beaver.
I give you good day, sir, said Charles, in
answer
to the low reverence of Cromwell; we are
well pleased to see you, the rather that we owe
you thanks, for that, as we have learned, by your
warm intercession with the parliament, our
children
have been yielded to our prayers.
Verily, answered Cromwell, verily, if it
please your highness, I hold this matter no just
cause for thanks; seeing thatas myself a father,
whom the Lord hath vouchsafed to bless with a
fair progenyand as a Christian man, who, having
learned that we should do to others as we would
have it done to us, strives still to put in practice
that which he has learnedI have but done my
duty. Permit me to hope, rather, that it may be
my fortune, in the time to come, in such degree to
minister unto your majesty's advancement and
well-being, as may deserve not
your
thanks only,
but those of this distracted realm.
Nevertheless, we thank you, sir, returned
Charles, with a smile seemingly sincere and
natural
,
both for the good which you have done to
us already, and that which you profess your will to
do hereafter. We will speak more at length when
we shall be alone; and, in good time, here comes
I 2
fair Mistress Drummond. Good Drummondhe
addressed the lady who now enteredwe will,
if you be now at leisure, trespass so far upon your
time as pray you to bestow your care upon these
little ones. James, he said, turning to the Duke
of York, if Sir John Berkeley be at liberty to
wait on you, you have my license to ride forth;
but see you be not absent over-long. Farewell,
my little prattlers, and he stooped down to kiss
the rosy lips of the young princess, laying his hand
softly on the sunny curls of Gloucester.
Drummond
will take ye to the gardens; and, in an hour
or two, ye may return to me. Farewell!Who
waits without? he added, in a louder voice, as the
lady left the chamber with the children.
Feilding, your majesty, replied the usher, a
cadet of the noble house of Denbigh.
Feilding, we would be private. What pages
have ye there?
Mildmay and Henry Gage, so please you.
Send Mildmay to the head of the great stairs;
let Gage wait at the entrance of the painted gallery,
and you bestow yourself in the fourth window
hence. Suffer not any one to pass the stairs, nor
interrupt us upon any plea of pleasure or of
business
!
Business, he added, now addressing
Cromwell
,
who had remained standing, hat in hand
we will to business, sir, for that, I trow, has gained
for me the pleasure of this visit. I pray you sit
nearer the table, if it please you; and, drawing
forth some papers from the cabinet before him, he
perused them rapidly, as if in search of some
peculiar
passage.
Has your grace found the leisure, Cromwell
asked, to overrun the schedule of conditions which
my son-in-law, Colonel Ireton, had the honour to
submit to your attention?
treat, Cromwell replied. I haveI do profess
it to your graceI have laboured with my whole
soul and spirit, wrestling in your behalf and for
your friends' advantage; and, truly, I scruple not
to say it, I hold there is not one among the
Presbyterian
faction that will consent to a firm peace
while there be any bishops in the land.
I do believe, said Charles, I do, indeed,
believe that you have stood my friend of late; and
I do thank you for it, and, well I hope, the time
shall come when I can compensate your good
deeds to the full.
Your majesty may say so, well, Cromwell
replied
,
impressively; I have stood forth somewhat
too boldly, so that I haveI grieve to say it, but,
verily, truth must be spoken alwaysso that I have
fallen into some suspicion even among my veteran
soldieryso that they scoff, and point at me with
jeering fingers, and cry, `Lo! he, that puts his
trust in princes!' Also the adjutators of the
regiments
have called into their counsel my son Ireton,
and wrathfully entreated him, enjoining it most
sternly on him that we shall hold no more
communion
with your highness unless some terms be
settled, and that, too, right speedily.
Indeed, answered the king, I had hoped that
the army was disposed more loyally.
Of a truth, Cromwell replied, it was so;
greatly distrusting the rogue Presbyterians, and
striving often and sincerely with the Lord in spirit,
that it would please him to replace your majesty
in the dominion and upon the throne of your
forefathers
;
but, when you last gave audience to the
adjutatorssurely it is a grievous thing to say
but I profess to you, as the Lord liveth, it is true
all their trust in your highness passed away; and
all the favour you had met with in their eyes, even
as morning clouds when that the south wind chaseth
them. Yea! and their hearts were hardened, and
their countenances changed against you, and against
all they deemed your friends. Moreover, secretly
have Iay, even I myselfbeen now advised, by
letters from tried friends and otherwise, that threats
are rife against me in the camp; how they would
lay wait privily, and dig a pit, and set a snare
before
me, and take and smite me with the sword,
and slay me under the cloud of night. But, as I
live, they know me not who do suppose that any
fear of that which man can do to me shall turn
me from performing that which I have tasked my
spirit to accomplish. Truly these terms, which
now lie here before your majesty, with much of
danger and yet more of difficulty have I prevailed
upon the host to offer you. If that it seem good to
you to accept them, I pledge myself right gladly
that the parliament shall, ere long, consent
likewise
.
For, lo, the army is the mightier! But if
which I trust will not be the caseyou shall
determine
to reject them, then do I wash my hands
of it. If by mine own self-sacrifice I could secure
your majesty's and England's quiet, then might I,
Decius-like, devote myself; but, truly, I esteem it
mere insanity to rush upon mine own destruction
when naught is to be gained proportionate.
If it be so, sir, answered Charles, after a
brief pause of deliberation, and these be the best
terms your friendly aid may gain for me, I will
be frank with you, and candidly accept them.
Rather would I take harder terms from the blunt
honesty of your stout soldiers, than chaffer for
conditions, as for vile merchandise, with the cold
cozening Presbyterians; and, for your own part,
trust me when I say, that, next to the Almighty,
with reverence be it spoken, I hold
you
the
instrument
that hath uplifted me from the abyss of
sorrow
,
and wrought for me deliverance and
restoration
!
And I assure you there shall be a time
when you will own me grateful.
This, then, is settled, Cromwell replied; I
may announce unto the host your majesty's
unqualified
assent to these their propositions.
You are at liberty to do so, returned Charles;
for myself, from this hour, I hold me bound by
them.
Right joyful am I, exclaimed Oliver; all
thanks be to the Lord of HostsEngland shall
then have peace! Verily, ere ten days be passed,
your majesty shall sit in state at Westminster.
And my first deed, when there, said Charles,
in guerdon of your much esteemed and faithful
services, shall be to raise my well-beloved and
trusty Cromwell to the peerage, under the title,
now extinct, of Earl of Essex, and to grace him
with the garter of St. George, which never yet was
buckled round the knee of braver leader. The
parliament, I trow, will not object to honours thus
bestowed on their best general, nor to my
commending
him to the command of England's armies!
Your majesty is gracious, answered the
independent
,
in a tone half indignation and half irony;
but, not to be made Prince of Wales, and heir to
England's crown, would I thus labour that you
should once more occupy the throne, did I not well
believe that England's peace demands it! It is
for England's laws and England's libertiesnot
for my personal aggrandizementnot that I should
be known as lord, or earl, nor yet by any other
title, which is but earthly pomp and vanity before
the Lordnot that I should be the owner of
broad lands or the dispenser of preferments,
wielding
the truncheon of the hosts of Britainthat I
have done so much, and suffered; and, did I not
believe your majesty resolved henceforth to hold
the liberties and weal of all your subjects nearest
your heart, and the fear of the Lord alway before
your eyes, verily, withered be my arm and my
tongue palsied if I would strike one blow or
sylable
one word to save you from perdition! But,
now this matter is so happily arranged, may it
please your grace excuse me. My duties call me
hence to Windsor, where I should be by noon!
Duty, sir, needs no license, Charles replied,
smiling most graciously, and rising from his seat,
and even taking three steps toward the door, as the
blunt soldier moved to leave the presence; and, till
we meet at Westminster, rest in the full assurance
of possessing your liege sovereign's gratitude and
favour. Ha! he continued, as the door closed,
and he found himself alone, deep as he is, I have
out-generalled him. Now he suspects not any thing.
Ha! ha! the garter! and the Earl of Essexa
precious clown, in faith, to grace an earldom! But
now for Lauderdale and Hollis!the dull fools
we will out with them all, and yet reign, as our
father did before us, a king in something more
than name!
But the enthusiast strode forth, the tesselated
floor of the proud gallery ringing beneath his
massive
stride, exulting and triumphant; and, as he
passed the vestibule, where there were none to
mark his actions, he clasped both hands above his
head, and cried out in a voice husky and stifled
with emotion, My countryoh my countryhave
I thenhave I won for thee peace, happiness, and
freedom?
CHAPTER III.
Let us see
Leave, gentle wax; and, manners, blame us not:
To know our enemies' minds, we'd rip their hearts;
Their papers is more lawful.
King Lear
.
It
was the third day only after Cromwell's
interview
with Charles that Ardenne, who had
purchased
a small house in the Strand, with pleasant
gardens sloping to the river, making it his continual
abode when not engaged in military duties, was
walking on the terrace close to the water's edge,
in one of those abstracted and half-melancholy
moods which had become almost habitual to him,
except when circumstances calling for sudden
action
roused him at once to all his former energy.
The day had been one of storm, more like a
winter's
tempest than a mere summer's showerthe
rain, driven along the river's course by a cold
eastern
gale, had fallen constantly since daybreak; and,
though toward evening it had ceased, and the wind
sunk, a thick chilling mist crept up the stream, at
the first clinging only to the opposite shores and
curtaining the distant objects, but increasing
gradually
in its volume, till the whole space from bank
to bank was filled with a gray mass of fog, so
palpable
and dense that barge and wherry passed and
repassed unseen, although the near dash of their
oars and the loud voices of the rowers showed that
they could scarcely be at ten yards distance. A
transient gleam of sunshine had drawn forth Sir
Edgar from his solitary studies; and, once plunged
in his gloomy reveries, he continued to walk to and
fro, scarce conscious of the increasing badness of
the weather; but suddenly, as he paused near the
little wharf to which his barge was moored, a
stern voice, whose accents of command he
recognised
at once, rose from the misty river above the
splashing of the oars which had for some time been
approaching.
Ho! put in here, thou stupid knave; here, at
this private stair; 'tis here we would be landed.
It was, he could not be mistaken, the voice of
Cromwell; and immediately the sharp beak of a
wherry ran upon the steps, pulled by two
watermen
,
with two more men, soldiers it seemed,
reclining
in the stern. Oliver, for one was indeed
he, leaped out forthwith, and addressed Edgar
hastily
,
as if afraid that he should speak the first, and
in a tone so loud that it was evident he wished the
boatmen to hear what he said.
Is not this, I beseech you, the dwelling of
brave Colonel Ardenne? We have come hither
from the armytwo of the adjutatorsto bear
tidings
to him.
It is, sir, Edgar replied, quickly
comprehending
Cromwell's wish. And I am Colonel
Ardenne
.
I pray you walk up to the house, you and
your comrade.
Surely, most surely, Oliver replied, with
well-feigned
bluntness; we have come by the river up
from Brentford, and I profess that I am chilled,
and yearning for the creature comforts. How say
you, Fast and Pray, think'st thou a quartern of
strong waters would go down amiss? You,
watermen
,
he added, make fast your boat there to the
stairs, and follow us to the house; we cannot tarry
here in this foul mist to pay your fares. They
were joined, while he was speaking, by the other
Vol. II.K
soldier, whom, despite his dress, Ardenne at first
sight discovered to be Ireton; and, although not a
little wondering at their visit, and the disguise they
had adopted, judging the garden no place for
inquiry
,
he led them in all haste toward the house.
Both wore coarse scarlet cassocks, with buff
breeches and immense jack-boots, the uniform of
privates in the ironsides off duty; long tucks, with
iron scabbards, hanging from their buff belts, and
clattering on the pavements as they strode along;
and broad-brimmed hats of felt, the flaps unlooped,
and covering their brows as if to guard against the
weather. They both were furnished with
tobaccopipes
short,
dingy iron tubesand smoked almost
incessantly, as well to cloud their features as to
afford a plausible excuse for silence; but, as a
farther safeguard against inquiring cyes,
Cromwell
had cast about him a stained and
weather-beaten
dragoon cloak of frieze, with its cape
muffling
him wellnigh to the mouth. Ireton carried
in his hand a package of some size, wrapped in an
oilskin cover; and, on a casual meeting, even an
intimate acquaintance would have detected nothing
in their air or demeanour by which to judge them
different from what they seemed. The moment
they had enteredLet your domestics instantly
take arms, said Cromwell, and lay these
watermen
by the heels; they might blab else, although
I think they know us not; and let your trusty
steward alone attend us; and bid him see your
doors be locked, and that no one of your
attendants
,
on any pretext, this night cross the threshold.
Leading his guests himself into a small library
refired
from the street and looking out upon the
garden
,
Edgar went out to give his orders. Before
returning he had seen the boatmen, after a slight
struggle, secured in a remote chamber, with an
abundance of strong liquors, which he judged
rightly
would at once console them and effectually close
their mouths, and two stout watchmen posted at
the doorhad given his directions to old Anthony,
who, since Sir Henry's death, followed his fortunes
and held the keys of every door and shutter in
his own possession.
Rude greeting, this, said Oliver, as he
returned
;
but, of a truth, there is deep need of it.
In brief, I will acquaint you with the matter, for
time presses. Three days since Charles accepted
fully the conditions of the army, as I wrote you on
Monday! The adjutators are brought over! the
parliament must come to our terms! So far all's
well! But, with the dawn to-day, a letter came to
me at Windsorfrom one who has conveyed us
much intelligence, and never has deceived usa
friend in the king's bedchamber
verbum sat!
He
writes us that Charles Stuart hath been all
yesterday
in deep debate with Ashburnham, that
firebrand
of the queen'sthat their resolves are taken
and a letterof a surety in cipher, but, then,
we hold the key, the Lord be thankful for it
prepared
for Henrietta, to be conveyed right cunningly
this night to Dover by an unconscious messenger.
What the contents may be our friend might not
discover, though, as he writes, he left no stone
unturned
;
but of this he is certain, that it is
all-important
,
and decisive of the king's intention as to
the pending treaty. This letter we
must
intercept;
and, therefore, we rode straight in this disguise to
Brentford, and thence took boat, to baffle prying
eyes; and, so far, all goes rightly. Now attend
the bearer of this letter will come at ten o'clock
tonight
,
carrying a saddle on his head, to the Blue
Boar in Holborn, thence to take horse for Dover.
The man will wear a green plush riding-coat, and
breeches of the same; the elbows of the doublet
and the seams of the trunk-hose guarded with
neat-skin
leather; a stammel waistcoat, and a red riband
round his hat, which is of common straw. The
saddle will be old, and somewhat patched and
ragged
;
and, in the off-side lap, between the tree and
pannel, the letter is concealed. The man knows
not that it is there, deeming he goes to buy a
famous
hunting-horse from one John Styles, a horse
courser. He is to put up at the Red Lion inn in
Dover; and there will be one, knowing his
description
,
who shall search the saddle andfind
nothing
!
for we must have the packet! How goes
the night, Sir Edgar?
Past seven, I am sure; nay, after looking at
his watch, but it lacks scant a quarter of an
hour to eight. I thought not that it was so late!
Nay, then, we are but just in time; you will
go with us, sir, and aid us. We must have three,
and know none else in whom we may so perfectly
rely. You are aware that Charles is on parole not
to hold secret interview with Francehis parole
broken, there is no breach of honesty or honour in
seizing and perusing his despatches. That
package
open
it quickly, Iretoncontains a dress like
these that we now wearthe uniform of one who
hath about your inches, borrowed for the nonce.
It savours somewhat of tobacco-smoke and stale
October, but we must not be nice. I pray you
don it speedily. Nay, Ireton, you forget; where
is the net to gather up his lovelocks, and the
peruke
?
quick! quick! he cried, impatiently
binding
up Edgar's flowing hair, and covering it with a
foxy wig, close-clipped, and cut into a hundred
little
peaks, like those which Cleaveland mentions in
his Hue and Cry, deriding them as `Hair in
characters
and luggs in text.'
Some pigment was laid on his eyebrows,
whiskers
,
and mustaches, suiting them to the colour of
his false hair. A kerchief of coarse cotton next
replaced his collar of fine lace, and a garb similar
to that of his companions his well-fancied habits.
A clumsy broadsword was produced, with a wide
leathern shoulder-belt, from under Cromwell's
cloak; and this, with an old pair of his own military
boots, carefully soiled for the occasion, and fitted
with rough iron spurs, and an unpolished headpiece,
completed his attire.
Mind, now, your bearing, Cromwell said, as
they left the house; smoke without ceasing;
jostle a little those whom we meet with in the
streets, and quote the strongest texts you may
remember
.
When that we reach the inn, the great
gate will be closed, the wicket only open. We
will all enter in, and drink till half past nine of the
clockthen go forth you, as if upon some errand
loiter about the gate until you see our man
follow
in after him, and, when he passeth up the yard
for he will go directly to the stablesbar
instantly
the wicket, and advise us! Now let us
move on somewhat smartly.
Without more words, they took their way across
the town toward Holborn, through quarters which,
though now the very heart and the most populous
portion of the giant city, were then but sparsely
built upon, with frequent gardens intervening
between
the scattered tenements, and miry lanes,
unlighted
and ill paved, instead of regular streets.
The night continued dark, and so unpleasant that,
when they reached at length the mighty
thoroughfare
of Holborn, the street was half deserted and
nearly silent. Smoking much as they passed
along, and speaking little, they reached the
well-known
hostelry. Its gate, as Cromwell had
foreseen
,
K 2
was closed and locked; but a low wicket
door gave ingress to the yard, a long irregular space,
surrounded on three sides by the rambling buildings
of the inn, with three tiers, one above the other,
of open galleries, through which was the access
to the chambers, and bounded at the end by a long
range of granaries and pack-stables. The yard
was nearly darkfor but one lamp shone dimly
over the entrance of the public room, just at the left
hand of the gateway as they entered; and, except
the lanterns of the hostlers flitting about the
farther
buildings, no other lights were visible within;
but, as if to make up for the deficiency, a large
glass lamp on either side the gateway rendered
the street in front of it as light as day. Abruptly
entering the taproom, in which some four or five
grave-looking citizens were comforting themselves,
after the business of the day, with poached eggs
and canary, buttered ale, burnt sack, and half a
dozen other drinks and dishes fashionable in those
days, but long ago forgotten
Ho! landlord! shouted Cromwell, bring us
three cans of your best double alegood measure,
and be quick about it! Surely, my flesh doth
thirst for a cool drink, even as the faint spirit
thirsteth for a soul-searching exposition of the
mysteries
that be essential to salvation.
Such as Lieutenant Profit-by-the-word poured
forth to our great edifying yester even, Ireton
answered
;
verily, good man, he was upheld most
marvellouslyfour hours did he hold forth steadily,
not waxing faint in flesh nor weary in well-doing,
but borne along in spirit with exceeding fervour,
and his voice ringing like a trumpet, louder at
every
close. Truly, a second Boanerges.
Ay! and he touched with the true unction on
that hard rock that splits all weaker vessels, the full
justification of the soul by faiththe utter
needlessness
of works to save, when that the soul is
filleday, as a tankard that doth overflow its
brimand lo! my can is out. Ho! tapster, fill
us the good black gallon jack, and fetch us more
tobaccoor as a milldam that doth burst its banks
with the true grace of God!
Yea! answered Ireton, yea! verily he did;
but I bethought me somewhat that he o'ershot the
mark when he did undertake to prove that those
who have been once in grace may never relapse
into sin, and that unto the pure all things are pure
and holy.
Why, you must be an infidel, returned the
other; what, know you not that vice and virtue
be but namesnot of aught tangible or realnot
of things that exist without the bodybut of mere
fantasies, abstractions whose seat is the mind.
Surely it is the spirit in which a thing is done, and
not the thing itself, that makes the virtue or the
vice. Lo! when you slay a man in hand to hand
encounter, fighting, it may be, in the deadly breach,
or riding on the cannon's mouth, truly it is imputed
not as an act of sin, but an heroical and manly deed
of gloryas when strong Samson killed his
thousands
ay,
or, yet more to the point, when Heber's
wife the Kenite smote Sisera within the tent and
slew him, though a suppliant and guest; but had
she driven in that selfsame nail to satisfy vile lust
of gain or murtherous revenge, then had it been
guilt in hershame while on earth and infamy
and, though we should not judgejudgment
hereafter
and perdition. Thus, in the soul is the
distinction
;
it maketh its own righteouness, it maketh
its own sin! All that is done for virtue becomes
virtue. To whom all things
seem
pure, verily, all
are
pure! Yea, if a man have the grace given
passed by him near a lighted shop; he suffered
him to get some dozen paces in advance, and then,
with a slow sauntering gait, pursued him. He saw
him stoop beneath the wicket, and, without looking
to the right or left, walk up the yard toward a
group of hostlers playing at odd or even on a
horseblock round a dingy lantern. Silently and
unseen he dropped the bar across the wicket, and
looked into the taproom.
Tarry, said Cromwell, tarry yet a while
the bird is ours!
In a few minutes the sound of a horse's hoofs
were heard upon the pavement. Now, then,
cried Oliver, now! and, instantly unsheathing his
long tuck, he darted through the doorway,
followed
immediately by Ireton and Sir Edgar, likewise
with drawn swords. Cromwell had reached the
man before they overtook him; but Ardenne heard
him say, You ride forth late, my friend, but we
be placed here in the name and by the orders of
the parliament to search all goers out. But,
verily
,
thou lookest like an honest lad. Thou hast, I
warrant me, nothing that thou wouldst care to
hide!
Not I, i'faith, replied the stranger, bluntly;
search away, Master Soldier, if such be your
orders
,
but I pray you delay me not, because I am in
haste.
Lead the man's horse into the stable, Fast and
Pray, said Cromwell, glancing his eyes toward
Ireton, 'twere shame to let the dumb beast stand
here in the pelting rain; and thou, good
Win-the-fight
,
come in with us. Verily, friend, we will not
long detain theebut a horn of ale will not harm
thee this dark night, I trow.
Not it, not it! replied the fellow; what
would you have now?
Oh! turn thy pockets out. Surely we will not
be too hard with thee. Well! well! this is a
pursegood lack, a heavy one!`to this a letter
`to Master Styles, horse courser, Dover!' Look
sharp that he be not too deep for thee, this John
Styles  he played our Colonel Whalley a foul
trick with a spavened jade some two years past.
He is a keen blade. Well! this is a pipeand
this a bacca-boxso! so!in these there is no
treason
.
Truly, I said thou wert an honest fellow;
and I was not deceived. Another cup of ale?
Tush, never mince the matter, 'twill warm thee
more than thy plush jerkin. Upseys! So! down
with it like lamb's-wool. Wellthou mayst go
now, so thou wilt not tarry and have a rouse with
us. Ho! Fast and Pray, bring out the worthy
fellow's
horse; he is not such as we be sent to look
for, andnow I think of itour time of watch is
ended! A quick glance interchanged with his
son-in-law assured the general that the letter was
secured; so, slapping the messenger upon the back,
he bade him mount, and God go with him; and
as he rode away, unconscious that his journey was
now useless, the three companions hurried to
Ardenne's
house, where they might profit by their
prize in safety.
A short half hour's walk placed them before his
doorso quickly, goaded to their utmost speed by
anxious curiosity, did they retrace their steps.
Lights were set in the library, the curtains closely
drawn, the door locked, and then Ireton produced
the packet; it was a small despatch, and fastened
with a plain flaxen cord and ordinary seal,
addressed
to Master Ephraim Mackleworth
evidently
a feigned nameat the Red Lion, Dover.
Within this was a small letter, simply directed to
H. M. R., bound with a skein of white floss silk,
and fastened with the impression of a finely-cut
antique upon green wax. Oliver caught it with an
impatient gesture from the hand of Ireton, broke
the seal, cast his eyes hastily upon it, and
exclaiming
,
Nay, it is not in cipher, read thus aloud:
Dearest and best Marie
I have received your kind and most consoling
letter of July from the tried friend who bore it.
The wisdom of your counsels I acknowledge, and,
so far as in
me
lies, will follow them. But, trust
me, girl, better and brighter days are yet in store
for us. I do assure you I am even now more
king
more powerful and freethan ere I raised my
standard; so that I doubt not, with a little patience
and a small share of
finesse
, all shall be yet as we
would have it. I am now courted by all parties
English and ScottishPresbyterians, Independents
parliament and armyall prostrate at my feet
all rivals for my favour, and balanced, too, so
equally, that whom I join soever carries the day.
In truth, chiefly do I incline toward the Scots,
but, for the present, seem, for my own purposes,
to favour more the army. In the end, whosoe
bids the highest has me. You disapprove, you
tell me, my `promising so much to those two
villains
,
Ireton and Cromwell.' Now, I beseech you,
be not alarmed nor troubled; but leave
me
to
manage
,
who am informed far better of all
circumstances
than you by any means can be; and on this
head rest altogether easy, for in due season I shall
know how to deal with these rogues,
who, for a
silken garter, shall be fitted with a hempen rope!
This by a mode that can by no chance fail; where,
fore, though brieflyas my space compelsI yet
write plainly. If all things prosper with me, as I
have now good cause to deem they willfor all the
factions, themselves cozened, look on the others as
outwittedI shall once more embrace the
well-beloved
queen and mistress of my heart, greater
and far more powerful than ever, ere many months
shall pass, in our own palace of Whitehall.
Until the Lord, in his good time, shall bring
which things to pass,
Your loving husband and idolater,
C. R.
With a calm voice, though bitter in the extreme
and scornful, Cromwell read out this document.
Ireton's eye flashed fire, and, as his father-in-law
ended, he violently dashed his hand upon the
table
Whose dogs are we, he cried, in fierce and
ringing tones, that we should be thus
scandalously
dealt with? As the Lord liveth he shall
die the death!
But three days since, said Cromwell,
hypocrite
that he is, base knave, and liar, he proclaimed,
through me, his full acceptance of the army's terms
his last words were, `and for myself henceforth
I hold me bound by them!' and I, fool that I was,
I
did rejoice, and triumphed in my heart that
England
should have peace! and nowhe will
hang
both of us! ay, HANG! Can there be any trust in
such a man?
None! answered Edgar, mournfully, there
can indeed be none! It is long since I have even
dreamed there could! He is unstable as the sands
of the seashore, and falseas fortune!
Alas! alas! for England! Oliver exclaimed,
in deep impressive tones. If it be thy will,
mighty Lord, that this thy servant be a prey and
victim to this man of Belial, truly I am prepared.
But for this goodly and regenerate land, for this
oppressed
and miserable people, in whose behalf
already
many times thou hast displayed the
wonders
of thy mightthe miracles of thine invincible
right handnot for myselfnot for myself, oh
Lord, poor sinner that I am and leaky vessel, do
I presume now to remonstrateto strive earnestly
to wrestle, as did Jacob in the darkagainst thy
great decreesbut for this lovely islethis
precious
England!
With Caiaphas
I
say, returned the fiery
Ireton
,
with Caiaphas! Jew though he was,
unrighteous
judge, and murtherer of the Lord's
anointed! `Ye know not''tis to you I say it,
my friends and fellow-soldiers`nor consider that
it is expedient for us that one man should die for
the people, and that the whole nation perish not!'
This bold speech for that night ended the
debate
.
Cromwell was silentthough the
remarkable
and resolute compression of his mouth, and
the deep frown that furrowed his high forehead,
and the determined gleam of his hard eye, showed
that his silence was produced by any thing rather
than doubt or fearand Ardenne, at this last and
heaviest blow, was, for the moment, wholly
overcome
!
He saw the certain peril, the imminent
and overwhelming ruin, but he saw neither refuge
nor escape. He felt that, while Charles lived,
England
could never be at rest; but he did
not
feel
that his death would give her that repose which
she desired now more almost than liberty.
In gloom that evening they had metin deeper
gloom they partedsave Ireton alone, who seemed
elate and almost joyous; for, fraught with a
sincere
unselfish patriotism that would not have
disgraced
an ancient Romana wild and daring
theorist
a
confident and bold believer in the
perfectibility
of man and in the supreme excellence of
Vol. II.L
democratic formshe fancied that he now foresaw
the advent of his dearest wishesthe overthrow of
monarchy and aristocracy for everthe birth of a
seagirt republicthe creation of a British state,
unequalled in the annals of the world! more wise
and eloquent than the free Athens!in morals
more severe than Sparta!in grace more elegant
than Corinth!in empire, arms, and glory more
magnificent than Rome!
CHAPTER IV.
I have advertised him by secret means,
That if, about this hour, he make this way,
Under the colour of his usual game,
He shall here find his friends, with horse and men,
To set him free from his captivity.
King Henry VI
.
Sadly
and wearily the year wore onward; the
golden days of summer were already passed; the
leaves, which had so greenly flourished a few weeks
before, grew sere like human hopes, and were
whirled wildly from their hold by each succeeding
blast. Autumn had waned already into winter;
yet still the leaders of the army, after their seizure
of the fatal letter, which necessarily ruined the
king's cause, remained inactive, as it seemed, at
Windsor, but, in truth, hushed in grim repose, and
waiting the maturity of those events which they
foresaw distinctly, and expected with a stern and
vengeful pleasure. Meantime the privates became
every day more restless and ungovernable.
Distrusting
their own officers while they held daily
Intercourse with the king's friends, now that they
had withdrawn themselves from all
communication
,
they imagined not that the correspondence was
indeed at an end, but that some scheme had been
determined to the exclusion and betrayal of their
interests, and raved accordingly in their religious
and political assemblies with equal fury against the
carnal-minded parliament and the grandees, as they
now termed their own superior officers. The
regiment
of Ardenne was perhaps the only one of the
whole army which had entirely resisted this
contagion
;
for having taken armsmany from personal
attachment to their young leader, whose neighbours
or whose tenants a great portion of the soldiers
weremany from a sense of political oppression,
but none from any feeling of fanaticism or religious
furythe most part being of the Episcopal
persuasion
they
looked on unconcerned, while their
companions
were indulging in the loudest tumults, and
reposed all their trust in the high talents and
integrity
of their commander. Often times since the
memorable evening of the intercepted letter
Cromwell
and Ardenne had debated on the next step to
be taken, and on the future prospects of their
country
;
and both had often and again grieved at
their inability to shape out any course by which
they might hope confidently to eschew the breakers
which they could see directly in their track. Both
clearly saw that the king's union with the
Presbyterians
could but be the beginning of a worse
tyranny
,
both in the church and state, than that which
they had overthrown; and both saw likewise that
with these, rather than with the army, he would
assuredly at last make common cause. Cromwell,
in this dilemma, hinted, rather than openly declared,
his own opinion, founded in part upon the evident
determination of the army, that the king should be
brought to trial, and, if found guilty, suffered to reap
the harvest of his perjury, dissimulation, and
oppression
;
yet, while maintaining both the policy and
justice of the measure, he was still at a loss to say
what plan should be adopted for the future
government
of England, thus to be left without a head.
Avowing himself favourable to a mixed form,
composed
,
as heretofore, of three estates, with the
executive
department vested in one officer of ample
powers though limited, he yet could point out none
on whom the choice could fall with safety and
propriety
.
Sir Edgar, on the other
hand--acknowledging
the perfect justice, doubted the policy of the
king's execution  thinking that wilder anarchy
would follow at the first, and ultimately either the
Presbyterian influence, which they now chiefly
feared, prevail, or one strong-handed military
tyrant
rise from the chaos of licentious freedom.
Ireton, in the mean time, the leader of a powerful
faction, declared at all times his desire for a
republic
,
founded upon a general franchise of the whole
people; and Harrison, who represented a yet more
fanatical and phrensied party, calling themselves
fifth-monarchists, looked forward to the near
approach
of the millennium, and, arrogating to
themselves
an absolute perfection, claimed an equality
of rights, of power, and of property for all men;
but all alike agreed on the expedience of awaiting
the recurrence of some overt action on the part of
Charles or of the Presbyterians. For this they
had not, indeed, long to tarry; for, on the morning
of the twelfth day of November, the gentlemen
whose office was to wait upon his chamber found
that the king was not there, and his bed had not
been used that night. Three letters in his own
handwriting lay upon the table; two to the
parliament
,
one to the speaker of each house, and a
third to the General Fairfax. After the first
excitement
had subsided, it was discovered that Sir John
Berkeley, Legg, and Ashburnham were missing;
and the hoof marks of four horses were traced
readily in the moist ground close to the postern
of the garden, into which there was a private
passage
from the chamber of the king. In none of
the three letters was it stated whither he had fled,
but simply that he had found it needful to withdraw
himself, in consequence, as he was well assured, of
plots existing for his assassination, and that he
should hold himself concealed until some
settlement
was made for the well-governance and quiet
of the kingdom. The news of this escape
produced
the greatest tribulation in the houses. It
was believed, and generally dreaded, that the king
was in hiding somewhere within the city; that
the Presbyterian party and the royalists had
privily
united, and that a sudden rising would ensue,
and massacre of all opposed to it. An act passed
instantly, prohibiting, on pain of death and
confiscation
,
any from harbouring the king without
conveying
notice to the parliament. Expresses were
sent off to every seaport town, laying a strict
embargo
on all vessels; and every person who had
fought on the king's side in the late wars was
banished
from the city, and any other place within a
circuit of ten miles round London. Meanwhile the
hapless monarch, having ridden day and night
toward
the southwestern coast, frustrated, by the
mismanagement, or, as some say, the treachery of
Ashburnham, in his desire of taking ship from the
New Forest, sought refuge for a space at Titchfield
House in Hampshire; and, finally, with an
incomprehonsible
degree of folly, surrendered himself to
Hammond, a strict friend of Cromwell, governor
of the Isle of Wight.
It was the second day after the flight of Charles,
his unalterable hatred and contempt of parliament
had led him peremptorily to refuse.
On the fifteenth of the same month, a statement
of the king's escape, his present secure situation,
and the propositions tendered to him by the
parliament
,
was sent down to the army, with a
remonstrance
ably penned by Fairfax, refuting the strong
calumnies which had been cast against the
principal
commanders, and setting forth the motives of
their conduct. Armed with this potent document,
Cromwell, as the most firm, and, at the same time,
best-beloved of all the officers, was selected to this
perilous but honourable duty; and, taking with
him Ardenne's well-disciplined and trusty
regiment
,
without delay or hesitation he repaired to
Wareat that time the headquarters of some five
or six thousand soldiers at the least, who,
stimulated
by their adjutators, and believing that the
flight of Charles was preconcerted and connived at
by the
grandees
of the host, were in state of
turbulence
bordering closely upon actual mutiny. It
was about eleven of the clock on a bright frosty
morning that Cromwell, with his small lifeguard,
reached Ware. Causing his trumpets to sound
through the streets, he summoned all the regiments
to get themselves together orderly upon the green,
to hear a proclamation from the lord-general; and,
ere this summons had been well delivered, they
turned out, not, indeed, orderly or in good
discipline
,
but in loud and tumultuous disarray. They
were all under arms, although expressly contrary
to orders; two regiments especially of musketeers,
who had their caps adorned with ribands, inscribed,
as a motto of insubordination, with the words
For the people's freedom and the soldiers' right!
were observed to be in full field order, with their
bandoleers slung round them, and the matches of
their arquebuses lighted. Among these, as
Cromwell
advanced slowly toward them, accompanied
by Ardenne only, and followed at a little distance by
a dismounted captain's guard with drawn swords,
but no firearmsthe remainder of the regiment
halting in line a little farther in the reara wild
disorganizing shout arose, Equality of rights!
equality of rights! No king! no coalition! Down
with the false grandees!
But when, with his long sturdy strides, and his
stern features perfectly calm, but resolute and hard
as if they had been cast in iron, he had closed with
them, the shouts ceased suddenly. Slowly he
walked along their front, looking each private full
and firmly in the eye; and few were there who
dared to meet with an unblenching brow his
concentrated
glare of anger and defiance. Halting at
length directly opposite to the two regiments of
musketeers, he drew out the proclamation.
I have a paper here, he said, to read to ye
from the lord-general. Not to mutineers, however,
but to soldiers was I sent! Extinguish instantly,
he added, in a tone somewhat louder, yet so
severe
and passionless that one battalion obeyed on
the moment, those matches! How dare ye
muster
thus? Out of your caps with those unsoldierly
and villain mottoesout with them! Nay! but ye
shall trample them beneath your feet! and, awed
by his immoveable determination, the same
battalion
once again complied; while the great bulk of
that tumultuous assembly looked on in abashed
wonder, and, ordering as rapidly as possible their
unmilitary and ill-dressed front, assumed an air of
perfect discipline and a right soldierly demeanour.
Not so the second regiment; for, brandishing their
arms aloft, they raised a deep and scornful
murmur
,
increasing gradually into a shout of absolute
defiance. Nay, some brought down their
arquebuses
to the ready movement, and even cocked
them; but not one man removed the motto of
rebellion
.
It was a moment of anxiety, if not of real
peril; for, though the great mass of the men were
quiet, they yet wore an air of sullen and almost
savage discontent, which clearly showed their
temper
,
and made it but too probable than any overt
action, of one troop even, would kindle the whole
body into a sudden blaze of fury.
Heard ye not, Oliver proceeded, in a voice
pitched several notes below his usual key, but so
full of intense resolve, of quiet but indomitable
spirit, that it thrilled to the hearts of all who heard
it, even of those who still resisted, or do ye
dare
to disobey me? You, sir, he continued, stepping
close up to the ranks, which now began to waver
somewhat, and confronting a gigantic lance-pesade,
ground your arms! and the man, overawed by his
demeanour, slowly and sulkily obeyed. Shame!
shame! cried several voices from the rear; thou
braggart, that wouldst do so much, to shrink at the
first word!
Silence there in the ranks! Oliver cried,
fiercely
,
and at his word again the murmurs ceased; but,
brief and trivial as they were, these murmurs had
yet roused anew a spirit of resistance in the bosom
of the half-terrified ringleader. Silent he stood
indeed
,
but his mouth worked convulsively, a red
flush overspread his countenance, and his hand
quivered as it grasped the barrel of his musket.
Soh! thou art then a soldier, continued
Cromwell
,
once more confronting the delinquent. Now,
then, pull forth that rascal riband from thy cap!
Cast it, I say, into the dust, and set thy foot upon it!
The man spoke not, but bit his lip till the blood
spirted forth, moving, however, no limb or muscle
of his body, whether to execute or to resist his
officer's
command.
Do as I bid thee, dog! and, with a flash of
furious
and ungovernable ire lighting up every
feature
of his face, Cromwell stamped his heel on the
turf as though he was in act of trampling down a
living foeman.
No dog of thine, at least, answered the fellow;
though, if thou hadst the will, all Englishmen
would be as slaves and dogs beneath thee.
Ha! this to me! and, seizing the gigantic
trooper by the throat, he shook him to and fro as
though he were an infant, and cast him, almost, as
it seemed, without an effort, to the earth behind
him. Seize him, guards, ho! Ye answer for him
with your lives. He is a ringleader; and, as the
Lord of earth and heaven liveth, verily he shall die
the death! and, as he spoke, his handful of
assistants
dragged off the prisoner, struggling and
shouting
for a rescue, and placed him in security among
their mounted comrades. But, quickly as they did
his bidding, yet quicker was the movement of the
captive's right-hand man to succour or avenge him,
who, at the very point of time when Cromwell
seized the lance-pesade, levelled his arquebuse
right at his head within six feet. Ardenne dashed
forward sword in hand followed by six or eight of
his most active men, while his lieutenant shouted
to the horsemen in the rear to charge! Yet, had
their aid been needed, the career of Oliver had
been concluded on that day in a poor paltry riot
but it was needed not! for, in the very act of
capturing the one, that keen-eyed and quick-witted
leader observed the motion of the other mutineer!
Before the heavy din, with which the armour of
the first clanged as he fell, was ended, his broad
sword gleamed aloft in the bright sunshinedown
it came whistling through the airdown, like a
flash of lightning, and, with his scull cleft through
his headpiece to the chin, the second plunged head
foremost, a dead man ere he touched the earth, his
arquebuse discharged, though harmlessly, by the
convulsed and quivering fingers after the life had
left the body. He paused not for a second's space
to suffer them to rafly or recover from the
consternation
which had fallen on them with all the chilling
influence of a panic terror, but, Charge! he
shouted, in a voice of thunder, charge the
rebellious
dogs. Kill! kill! spare none who dare
resist
!
and, with the word, Ardenne rushed in, and
faithfully his gallant men requited the trust placed
in their allegiance. Firmly, as though they had
outnumbered their opponents, that little handful
dashed into the breach which Cromwell's energy
had made already in the rebellious ranks; and at
a full trot, with their rapiers levelled to the charge,
up swept the horsemen. But the fall of their
ringleaders
,
and the undaunted bearing of their officers,
were too much for their nerves; and, ere the
guard was on them, their musket-buts rang heavily
as they were grounded simultaneously, and the
obnoxious
badges, torn with quick hands from every
headpiece, fluttered on all sides in the air, or
strewed the turf before their feet. Halt! ho!
halt, Colonel Ardenne! shouted Oliver,
perceiving
instantly and profiting by his advantage; but
scarcely was his second cry in time; for, though
they curbed their chargers as the word reached
their ears, the cavalry stopped not until their horses
chests were close upon the wavering ranks, and
their long rapiers waving over their heads. Draw
off your horse, Lieutcnant Winthrop, he
continued
;
advance six files dismountedarrest each
those, of whom one certainly was destined to be
sent from the fair face of the bright laughing earth,
unhouselled and unshriven, into the presence of his
Maker, with scarce a moment even to prepare the
spirit
for endurance of the fearful shock which should
disjoin it from the body! The lottery of death
was ended! The soldier, whose hard fate had been
thus chance-decided, was a small, delicate,
pale-looking
man; of a weak frame, and a countenance
effeminate and betokening any thing save energy
of mind or resolution. Yet was this frail and
nerveless being perfectly cool and self-collected;
while his companion  taken in the very fact
limbed like a Hercules, with high bold features
and a brilliant eyea man who would have ridden
fearlessly, although alone, upon a stand of levelled
pikes, or rushed upon a cannon's mouth just as the
linstock was appliedshook like an aspen leaf
through all his powerful frame; his brow, his
cheek, his lip, grew white as asheshis eye was
dim and senselesshe sobbed, he wept aloud,
struggling violently with the troopers who
conducted
him to his last stand on earth, and yelling
phrensiedly
for mercy. With an air perfectly
composed
and fearless, the other threw aside his
cassock
and his vest, unbound the kerchief from his
neck, giving it as a token to a favourite
fellow-soldier
,
and having, in a clear, unfaltering voice,
confessed the justice of his sentence, and exhorted
his companions to take warning from his fate, he
bowed respectfully to those who had condemned
him, and stepped as lightly to the place of
execution
as though it were his choice to die. There
they stood, side by sidefull of strong health, and
intellect, and life, and passion, in one short
moment
to be mere clods of soulless and unconscious
clayand there, with their death-weapons levelled,
Vol. II.M
paler themselves and far more agitated than even
those on whom they were to do the work of blood,
the firing party, chosen from the ranks of the same
regimentcomposed, perhaps, of messmates, of
familiar friends, of proved associates in many a
scene of peril and of gleryperhaps of comrades,
plotters, instigators to the very crime which
they
were destined to avenge,
their friends
to expiate
their partners, without doubt, in this last fatal deed
of guilt, and now their executioners! The
regiments
were drawn up forming three sides of a
great hollow square, the criminals upon the fourth,
the executioners already facing them at scarce ten
paces distant. There was not a voicea sigha
movement in that mighty concourse; not a weapon
clashed, not a foot rustled on the earth. But the
sun shone in glorious beauty upon the burnished
pike-heads and the waving standards; and the
whole earth looked gay and smilingmore gay,
more smiling, as it seemed to the poor criminals,
than ever it had been before. A short
extemporaneous
prayer was uttered by the captain of their
own battalion; a sad and doleful hymn was chanted
by the now penitent and terrified assemblage, with a
sound inexpressibly and strangely mournful. The
fatal sign was given!a bright flash, and a sharp
report as of a single piece!and, when the smoke
cleared off, there lay the bodies on the sod, lifeless
and motionless, their sins and sorrows thus
simultaneously
and suddenly concluded. There was no
need of more severityand the quick eye of
Cromwell
saw it. With the yet warm and palpitating
bodies in full view, he read aloud the general's
message, the soldiery listening to every word with
a respectful and sincere attention, that denoted all
the force of the example they had witnessed. As
he concluded, every regiment presented, and then
grounded arms; the adjutators humbly advanced
from the crestfallen ranks, and with a deferential
air expressed their complete satisfaction at the
lord-general's
exposition, their sense of their own past
misconduct, and their gratitude to Cromwell for
the mercy he had shown them, in taking but
two lives where all so righteously were forfeit.
After a few more words of reprimand, blended
with commendations of their former services, and
exhortations never to offend in the like sort
hereafter
,
Oliver, whose point was amply gained,
dismissed
the soldiers; and the bands striking up in
the impressive notes of a dead march, with colours
trailed and arms reversed, they filed off to their
several quarters, well convinced now that,
howsoever
their commanders might connive at
disobedience
to the parliament, they would in no sort
tolerate
or wink at the most trivial mutiny against
their own authority. In fact, by his undaunted
resolution in suppressing, and his inflexible
severity
in punishing the present disaffection, joined to
the partial lenity he had extended to his prisoners,
Cromwell had more than regained all that he had
temporarily lost in the opinions of the army.
Never
,
perhaps, at any previous time had he stood
higher in power, or possessed more fully the
respect
and admiration, not unmixed with wholesome
fear, of those whom he commanded, than at the
present moment.
The next night, in the most magnificent of
England's
palaces, in the great hall of Windsor Castle,
the officers of that victorious army, which had not
merely conquered but annihilated the high faction
of the cavaliers, defeated the intrigues of the Scotch
Presbyterians, seen through and cut asunderif
they had not disentangledthe gordian knot of
parliamentary
chicane, assembled in most solemn but
most secret council. There, actuated by a single
spirit, and speaking, as it were, all with one
common
voicewhich they asserted, and perhaps
believed
,
such is the force of the heart's
self-deception
,
to be a direct proof that HE, whom they had
sought so long in prayer, earnestly dealing with
him that he should let that cup pass from them,
had put the counsel by immediate inspiration into
their heartsthose stern religionists determined
that, as a traitor, murderer, and tyrant, Charles
Stuart
should be arraigned, and brought to answer for
his deeds before the high court of the nation in
parliament assembled.
It was remarked even then, and deeply
pondered
on in after days, as something singular and
strange, by Ardenne, who was not present at the
council, having remained in London on his return
from Ware, but who was instantly apprized of the
proceedingsthat, neither before that assemblage,
nor publicly at any other time, did Oliver urge on
or advocate, with his accustomed fervour, the
measure
which, as Sir Edgar knew full well, he had
long since determined on within his secret heart.
It seemed as though he did not choose himself to
stir at all in that which had been mooted by the
common soldiery in the first instance, and advanced
by insubordination verging on open mutiny; or,
perhaps, seeing that, without his personal
co-operation
in the matter, all things were tending to the
result which he believed the best, he was content
to lend them the mere negative support afforded by
his presence at deliberations, which he did not
oppose
or hinder, wisely reserving his great energies
for the accomplishment of those great ends which
could not be wrought to maturity without them;
and holding himself, like the gods of the Grecian
drama, aloof from matters which afforded no due
scope for his unconquerable powersfrom plots
which could as well be disentangled and wound
smoothly cut by those who had, perhaps, imbibed
his own opinions, and were unconsciouslywhile
fancying themselves free and untrammelied agents
the mere tools and instruments of his superior
intellect.
CHAPTER V.
Let us be sacriticers, but not butchers, Caius.
We all stand up against the spirit of Csar,
And in the spirit of men there is no blood;
Oh that we, then, could come by Csar's spirit,
And not dismember Csar. But, alas!
Csar must bleed for it. And, gentle friends,
Let's kill him holdly, but not wrathfully.
Let's calve him as a dish fit for the gods,
Not hew him as a carcass fit for hounds.
Julius Csar
.
The
indignation of the parliament, who, after the
retreat of the eleven impeached members, had more
and more come into the strong measures of the
army, was fearfully inflamed by the king's absolute
refusal of the four acts; so much so that a bill
was passed forbidding all addresses for the future
to Charles Stuart, and all renewal of negotiations
with him for a settlement, though not till after two
or three debates, in which the military leaders, and,
above all, the lieutenant-general, took active part.
The last, indeed, on one occasion, ended a long and
strenuous harangue by raising his voice to its
highest
pitch with these emphatic words, Teach not
the army, by neglecting your own safety and that
of the kingdom, by which theirs also is involved, to
M 2
deem themselves betrayed, and their best interests
abandoned to the rage of an irreconcilable enemy,
whom, for your sake, they have dared to provoke.
Bewareand, as he spoke, he laid his hand upon
his rapier's hiltbeware, lest their despair cause
them to seek safety by some other means than by
adhering to you, who know not to consult for your
own safety.
And now, although the peril from the army's
insubordination
had subsided, not a day passed
without
some riotous commotion indicative of the
divided
state of public feeling. Continual tumults
between the London mob, now become once more
loyal to the king, and the detachments of the
veterans
quartered in the metropolis, were not
suppressed
without some bloodshed; and, in the early
spring, were followed by a general movement of
the royalists throughout the kingdom, which, had it
been planned with as much of concert and of
wisdom
as it was executed with high bravery and
spirit, would have caused much perplexity to those
in power. As it was, however, so ill-timed and
unpremediated were the risings of the cavaliers,
that they were easily subdued in detail, although
their numbers, if united, would have been truly
formidable
,
and although they fought, as individual
bodies, with all the resolution of despair, and in no
case were vanquished without loss and difficulty by
the independent army. The men of Kent were
beaten, after a hard-fought and well-disputed
battle
,
at Maidstone, by the lord-general in person
the royalists of Wales, under the gallant Colonel
Poyer, were defeated, and Pembroke, into which
they had retired, taken by Cromwell after a six
weeks' siege. This exploit over, that indefatigable
leader hurried northward with all his wonted
energy
of movement, came on the Scottish army, now
united with the northern cavaliers of Langdale, at
Preston on the Ribbic; and, though with forces
vastly inferior, hesitated not to give them battle.
Having defeated them so utterly that their army
was, in truth, wholly disorganized and scattered, he
pursued them closely into Scotland, where he
compelled
the citizens of Edinburgh, deeply averse and
hostile to his party, to put down the royalists, and
to replace the power of the state in Argyle's hands,
who had now joined the independent faction with
his whole heart and spirit. While there, the Earl
of Leven and Sir David Lesley so totally
disclaimed
the covenant as to cannonade the royalist
troops from the castle, and to agree, at a
convention
held in my Lady Home's house in the
Cannongate
,
with Oliver, that there was a necessity, now
fully obvious, for taking the king's life.
Meanwhile
Lord Goring, who had advanced to
Black-heath
,
hoping that by his presence London would
be encouraged into action, being checked by
Fairfax
,
shut himself up in Colchester; but, after a
long and vigorous defence, was forced, when all
was over, to surrender at discretion; and had the
farther misery of seeing two of his bravest officers,
Sir George Liste and Sir Charles Lucas, shot by
the conquerors as rebelsa rigorous and cruel
exercise
of power, for which the general did not
escape
much obloquy, although it was alleged in his
defence, and probably with truth, that he was
instigated
to such unwonted harshness solely by the
suggestions of the fierce and unrelenting Ireton.
This absolute suppression of the king's friends
by land was poorly compeusated by the defection
of the navy; Rainsborough, its commander for the
parliament, having been set on shore by his
rebellious
crews, who bore away for Holland, and,
casting
anchor at the Brill, after a short time took on
board the Prince of Wales, accompanied by
Rupert
,
as their admiral; not in compliance with the
wishes of the queen, who would have lavished that
high dignity on her unworthy paramour Lord
Jermyn
.
About the same time the young Duke of
York, afterward James the Second, by the
assistance
and the skill of Colonel Bamfield, made
good his flight from London, and reached the
Netherlands
in safety. And now, beyond all doubt,
was the atrocious infidelity and wickedness of
Henrietta
proved, whoalthough the revolted fleet had
full and undisputed mastery of the channel, and
might, with ease and certainty, have forcibly
delivered
Charles from the hard durance in which he
was now held, after an unsuccessful effort to break
forth at Carisbrookprevailed upon the Prince of
Wales to waste his time in frivolous and uscless
enterprises up the Thames and on the coasts, until
the parliament had fitted out another fleet under
the Earl of Warwiek, when, after what a scaman
would term lubberly manuvring, he sailed
toward
Holland, closely pursued by Warwiek's navy,
and never performed any action serviceable to
his unhappy father's cause or creditable to his own
fame. During the progress of the futile struggle,
which had terminated in rendering obvious to all
the hopelessness of any effort at armed
interposition
for the king, the parliament, while Cromwell
was in Scotland, had held fresh negotiations at
Newport, in the Isle of Wight, with Charles, who,
to the last, despite the urgent prayers both of his
friends and the more moderate of his opponents,
refused compliance with the conditions offered,
though he must now have apprehended this to be
the only means by which he could retain
possession
of his crown. The temper of the commons
after receiving tidings of the king's unconquered
obstinacyevinced by the distaste of the majority
toward an angry speech of Vane, so much alarmed
the leaders of the army, that, finding Hammond
more disposed toward the parliament than they had
hoped, they caused by stratagem the custody of the
king's person to be transferred to Colonel Ewre, a
man entirely in their interests, and ordered him to
be removed at once to the strong solitary fortress
of Hurst Castle, on the coast of Hampshire. A
letter from the commons to the general, demanding
instant restitution of the royal person to his former
guardian and abode, was answered by a demand
for payment of arrears due to the army, and, after
a few days, by the march of the most zealous and
enthusiastic regiments to London; the general
taking
up his quarters at Whitehall, and other
officers
with their detachments at Durham House, the
King's Mews, Covent Garden, Westminster, and
St. James's Palace. Still, undeterred by this bold
step, the Presbyterian party, after a violent debate,
carried it, by a majority of thirty-six against the
independents
and the army faction, that the king's
answer was a ground upon which for the houses to
proceed for the settlement of the peace of the
kingdom
.
A resolution which, had it been brought
into force, would have effectually undone all that
had been effected by the long and bloody strife
which had preceded it, and left the king as
powerful
for good or evil as he had been at its
commencement
,
provided he should, as his true policy
would dictate, hold to the friendship of the
parliament
.
That afternoon a large committee of the
commons waited upon the general at his lodgings
of Whitehall, but met from him only a supercilious
and cold welcome, and no satisfaction. The
following
morning, when the members went to take
their seats, a guard of musketeers was at the doors,
headed by Colonel Pride and the Lord Grey of
Groby, who held a list of those who should not be
permitted to go in to the debate, and these were kept
three days in custody in different inns of court,
while the remainder of the house, called afterward
by royalists the Rump, voted that the king's
answer
to the propositions was not satisfactory. Sir
Edgar, in the earlier part of the late tumults, had
served with Fairfax, and, after the surrender of
Colchester, had resigned his commission, disgusted
by the fate of Lisle and Lucas. Meanwhile,
however
,
he had been re-elected to the house, the
Presbyterians
considering his departure from the army
as an earnest of his accession to their party, while
the independents, wiser in this than their
antagonists
,
foresaw that, howsoever he might disapprove
their violence, he would, at the least, never join
their enemies. On this account, then, he was
suffered
by the soldiers to assume his seat, his name
not being on the list of those excluded. The first
step which he took was to move instantly for an
inquiry into the causes of the present outrage, and
though, when overruled in this by a majority of
those remaining in the house, he coincided with
the opinion that the king's answer was
unsatisfactory
,
he refused peremptorily to give any vote on the
occasion. Then, after several vain attempts to find
out the devisers of the violence, Fairfax denying
any knowledge of it, and the guards merely stating
that they had their orders, he at the first resolved
to vacate his seat once again; but, after much
reflection
,
held it the manlier and more upright course
still to continue in the house, opposing, to the best
of his abilities, all inroads on the liberties of
Englishmen
,
in their most delicate and dearest point,
the privilege of parliament. Just at this juncture,
indeed, upon the very evening of the day which
had been signalized by the exclusion of the
Presbyterian
members, Cromwell returned from
Scotland
,
and took up his abode in the king's palace of
Whitehall. To him, indeed, Ardenne's suspicions
had first pointed as the real mover of this
outrageous
measure; yet, on his charging it directly to
him, he answered with so much of ready frankness,
that he had not been acquainted with the design,
yet, since it was done, he was glad of it, and would
endeavour to maintain it, and asked so warmly for
his presence and advice at a council to be held that
evening in the house of Ludlow, that he succeeded
almost in convincing him that his suspicions were
unfounded. An early hour of the evening found
Sir Edgar at the place appointed, where he was
shown into a large well-lighted chamber, filled with
about two score of gentlemen, for the most part
the leaders of the army; among whom, at the first
glance, he recognised Ireton, Harrison, and
Lilburne
,
afterward nicknamed Trouble-world, with
Hacker, Hutchinson resembling a cavalier in his
rich dress and flowing hair, and some of the most
eminent civilians, Sir Harry Vane the younger,
and some few of the Presbyterian party, besides the
master of the house, and Cromwell, who sat aloof,
as it would seem, engrossed in weighty
meditation
;
Fairfax was not among them. When Sir
Edgar entered Harrison was declaiming with much
vehemence, as well of gesture as of speech, and
not without a species of wild eloquence, against all
forms of monarchy, which he asserted neither to be
good in itself, nor yet good for the people,
quoting
the whole eighth chapter of the first book of
Samuel, and argaing therefrom that to be
governed
by a king was in itself displeasing to the
King and Monarch of the universe, and absolutely
sinful; for that the Lord himself bade Samuel yet
solemnly protest unto them, and show the
manner
of the king that should reign over them;' and
afterward foretold to them `that ye shall cry out
in that day because of the king ye have chosen
you, and the Lord shall not hear you in that day.
Wherefore, he added, let us put away from us
this sin and this abominationlet us wash from
our hands the stain of this iniquityyea! let us
cleanse ourselves with myrrh, with aloes, and with
hyssop, ay, and with bloodeven the blood of
sacrifice
!from
this offence which stinketh in the
nostrils
of Jehovah! And let this manthe firebrand
of eivil conflagrationthe drawer of the
slaughtering
sword against his peoplethe slayer of our
brethren and our sonsthe spoilers of our
vineyards
and our oliveyardsthis faithless gentleman
and perjured princethis tyrant, traitor, murderer,
Charles Stuartlet him be driven out, even as the
scapegoat sent into the wilderness to bear away
the sins and sufferings of the peoplelet him be
cut off utterly, and cast upon the dunghill, and let
the dogs lick
his
blood, as they licked that of
Ahab, when the Lord smote him by the arrow of the
Syriansmote him at Ramoth Gilead that he died
and let his name be never named in Israel from
thenceforth ever more! So let it be with him, and
let the people cry amen! To Harrison succeeded
Ireton, and Ludlow after him, both urging the
expediency
of the king's death no less strongly than
its justicedescanting loudly on the faithlessness
which he had shown in all his previous dealings
his often protestations and engagements in the
name of a king and gentleman which he hath so
often violatedand the small probability that any
new bond or restraint of conscience should now be
found to fetter one, whom neither his own
coronation
oath nor the laws which he had sworn to
honour, uphold, and obey, could hinder from
endeavouring
to subvert his country's constitution,
and build an autocratic throne upon the ruin of his
people's freedom.
When these had finished speaking, Sir Edgar
ealmly but impressively addressed them,
beseeching
them to ponder deeply and pause long ere they
should take a step irrevocable, and, if it should
prove evil, irretrievable and ruinous. Admitting,
as fully as the warmest advocates for the king's
death, his guilt in aiming at supreme
unconstitutional
dominionhis guilt in plunging the whole
population intrusted to his careeven as children
to a father's chargeinto the misery of civil
slaughter
,
merely to gratify his own ambitionhis guilt
in violating every covenant and compact he had
made!owning the utter hopelessness of any
effort
to establish peace while he should be within
the realm, in how close custody soeverthe folly
of imagining that England's liberties could be in
safety while he should hold the reins of
government
,
how limited soever in his sway!declaring
that he believed him in all justice to be guilty even
unto deathI yet conjure you, he exclaimed,
to pause before you shed his blood! If ye
depose
him from the throne, and banish him the
realm, ye will gain all advantage that his death
could give you, and more also!ye will disarm
the tongues of those who would cry out against his
execution as against a sacrilegious and accursed
parricide, and fill the very mouths that would be
open to revile you, with praises of your clemency
and grace. Ye will deprive him wholly of the
means to do you evil, and ye will have this farther
safeguard, that, while he lives, no other can lay
claim to England's crown, whereas, once dead, his
son will instantly succeed to all his father's rights,
Vol. II.N
and more than all his father's influence on the
minds of men maddened with loyal sorrow and
athirst for vengeance. It was a wise and politic
saw of the old Romans, `to spare the subject and
subdue the proud!' To slay Charles Stuart is but
to elevate a bad king to an honoured martyr!to
depose and banish him is to degrade him from a
suffering prince into a scorned and abject beggar!
Men will compassionate, and honour, ay! and bleed
for royalty in chains, when they but jeer and scoff
at royalty in tatters! Banish this man, and he
may wander forth from court to court of Europe;
he
may
be treated with mock deference,
may
be
styled king and brother, and pensioned with the
crumbs that fall from royal tablesbut 'twill be
hollow all and insincere! Scorned and despised,
he will drag out a life held by your sufferance,
weary and painful to himself, and innocent to you
even of momentary cause for apprehension! Slay
him, and ye will buckle harness on the back of
each legitimate hereditary prince of Christendom
against you!ye will concentrate and renerve the
partisans of royalty now scattered, hopeless, and
undone!ye will enkindle a consuming flame,
which, though for a brief space it may smoulder
or burn dimly, shall yet wax hourly more broad,
and bright, and high, till it shall soar in triumph
over the liberties of England, shrivelled again, and
blasted, perchance, never to revive!
His views, shrewd and farsighted as they were,
and couched in language bold and perspicuous,
produced a great effect on the more moderate of
either party, and he was followed by several of the
Presbyterians on the same side, and even by one
or two of the milder officers; but the more
zealous
held to their opinions, and urged them with
all their wonted force and ingenuity, and the
debate
waxed warm, a strong majority, however,
leaning
evidently toward the death of Charles and
the abolition of all royal power in Great Britain.
It was, moreover, brought into debate, and
discussed
very earnestly, by what meansif it should
be decided that Charles Stuart must diehis death
should be effectedsome hesitating not to
advocate
his private taking off by poison or the dagger,
so to avoid the scandal and the odium of his
public
executionto whom the honest but fanatical
and visionary Harrison replied in words of fire,
repudiating
the idea of such foul and midnight
murder
,
and declaring that, as their cause was just, so
should their vengeance be both bold and open!
that, as his crimes were evident, so should their
punishment be manifest and in the face of day!
What, he exclaimed, with real eloquence, shall
we, the workers of the grandest revolution earth
ever has beheldthe conscience-armed deliverers
of Englandthe champions of a nation's freedom
the Christian warriors of an all-seeing God
shall we take off our foe by ratsbane in the dark,
or slay him with a hireling knife, for a mere
paltry
dread of what the world shall say? Not so!
not so! but we will point the world's voice by our
actionsfetter its opinion by our boldness! Let
Charles, I say, let Charles THE KING be brought
to trial in the presence of his peersTHE PEOPLE!
There, if he be found guilty, let him be led to
execution
in the world's eye and the sun's! Let him
be slain as a deliberate and solemn sacrifice
offered
as a high victim at the shrines of freedom
and of God! With honour and respect to the
great station he has held, but with implacable and
stern resentment toward the crimes by which he
has defiled it, as he hath done to others so let us
do to him, not as vile stabbers and assassins, but as
elected judges, acting for men below, and
answerable
to the Lord on high! Let
him
henceforth be
an ensample unto those who would enslave their
fellows. Let England be a precept to all nations,
that, when oppressed, they shall arise in the
unconquerable
strength of purity, and honesty, and truth!
that they shall battle boldly, and unto success!
that they shall judge impartially!and execute
inflexibly
the high decrees of justice and of
vengeance
!
Throughout this stirring scene, to Edgar's great
astonishment, Cromwell took no share in the
argument
,
nor did he even seem to pay the grave
attention
which the subject merited to the opinions of
the speakers. Much of the time he was engaged
in whispering, and even jesting, with those who sat
beside him; and once or twice indulged in those
rude ebullitions of practical humour which had
made him such a favourite in the camp, but which
were most unsuitable and unbecoming in a grave
and sorrowful debate, involving, it might be, the life
and death of thousands, the fate of a most ancient
line of kings, the future government of a great and
glorious empire. Not a little astonished and
disgusted
at this conduct, Sir Edgar watched him
closely, to detect, if possible, the causes of his mood
and the internal workings of his mind; but, after a
long survey, being still in doubt whether he had
brought to the council a mind predetermined and
unalterably fixed, or whether he had put on levity
of manner to conceal irresolution and a perturbed
spirit, he called openly on Cromwell to give his
opinion.
Verily, answered he, verily I am yet
unresolved
.
Have at thee, Ludlow! he continued,
springing to his feet, with a loud boisterous laugh,
and hurling at the head of the republican a cushion
of the sofa on which he was sitting, with such
violence
as almost to overturn him, upsetting at the
same time several candles, and throwing the whole
council into confusion, under cover of which he
ran out of the room, and was already half way
down the stairs, when Ludlow, who had pursued
him, struck him between the shoulders with the
same missile, and drove him head-foremost down
the flight of steps and through the door, which had
been opened by a servant in expectation of his exit.
Thus ended the discussion and the council for that
evening; but, within a week, the House of
Commons
appointed a committee to prepare a charge
of high treason against the king, which should
contain
the several crimes and misdemeanours of his
reign; which, being made, they would consider
the best way and manner of proceeding that he
might be brought to justice. About the same
time some idle intercessions, at the request of the
prince, were made in the behalf of Charles by the
states-general of Holland, and a letter yet more
idle sent by the queen to be delivered to the
parliament
.
In a short time the charge of the
committee
was prepared and approved by the
commons
.
The House of Lords, indeed, rejected it;
and, instantly adjourning for a week, on their
return
found their doors locked by orders of the
lower house, and, being thus excluded, sat no more
for many years. Then a high court of justice was
appointed, of the most celebrated and influential
men, civil and military, in the realm. Bradshaw, a
lawyer of great talent and inflexible boldness, was
named lord president, invested with much state,
and having lodgings suitable to his high office
assigned
to him at Westminster. The royal prisoner
was brought up from Hurst to Windsor under a
powerful guard of Harrison's command, and thence
N 2
to his own palace at St. James, where he was held
in rigorons custody, while every preparation was
made for the accomplishment of that great tragedy,
with the report of which Europe was soon to ring
from side to side.
CHAPTER VI.
Mal
. If such a one be fit to govern, speak;
Moc
. Fit to govern!
No, not to live. Oh nation miserable!
Macbeth
.
The
day at length arrived, big with the fate of
England and her kingthe twentieth of January,
memorable thenceforth through every age for the
most solemn and sublimely daring measure
recorded
in the annals of the world. At an
extremely
early hour the members of the high court of
justice, which had been constituted with the utmost
labour by the military council that swayed the helm
of state, so as to be a fair representation of all
ranks and classes of society, assembled in the
painted chamber. All the chief members of the
independent party in the commonsLord Fairfax,
Cromwell, Skippon, Ireton, as the four generals,
with all the colonels of the armythe two chief
justices and the chief baronsix peersfive
aldermen
of Londonseveral from the most leading
barristersand many baronets and country
gentlemen
of note, had been at the first summoned to the
discharge of this unprecedented trust; but, when
the House of Lords refused its sanction to the
ordinance
for bringing of the king to justice, the
peers and judges were omitted. Sir Harry Vane,
Algernon Sidney, St. John, and some other stanch
republicans, who, although friendly to the king's
deposition, were not consenting to his death,
refused
to sit as members of the court; and many
more, either from fear or conscience, failed
answering
to their names.
While the commissioners were here assembled,
Ardenne among the rest, news was brought to them
on a sudden that his majesty had landed at Sir
Robert Cotton's stairs, on which Cromwell, who
had been previously conversing with sundry of his
intimates among the judges, with the same air of
jocularity which had so strongly marked his
conduct
during the earlier consultation, rose suddenly
from the place where he had been sitting, and
moved with rapid but unequal steps toward the
window. The keen eye of Sir Edgar followed
him, and, to his no small wonder, he perceived
that the hands, which the daring chieftain laid upon
the wainscot to support him as he leaned his body
forward to look upon the royal captive, quivered so
violently as almost to communicate a tremour to
his frame; and, when he turned away, after a long
and anxious gaze upon the destined victim,
although
his eye was steady and unblenching, and
his mouth firmly compressed and calm, his whole
face, usually so rubicund and sanguine in its
colouring
,
was ghastly pale, and his lips white as
ashes. Marvelling greatly at this change in one
so stern and inaccessible to ordinary feelings;
remembering
,
too, the widely different glance with
which, at a more early period of his great career,
the eye of Cromwell had completely quelled the
proud man at whose aspect he now faltered; and
wishing to investigate the state of mind which
caused so strange a revelation of contending
passions
,
Sir Edgar was just stepping forward to
address
him, when the doors were thrown wide open,
and the judges summoned to the court.
Westminster
Hall, that most sublime and ancient
specimen
of architecture, brought to perfection, which
modern art has vainly sought to imitate, by those
whom, in our overweening vanity, we children of a
later day presume to style barbarians, had been
prepared, with singular attention to details, for this
most dread solemnity. Benches, row above row,
covered with crimson velvet for the
commissioners
,
filled all the upper end; Bradshaw, the
learned
and undaunted president, sat in the centre of
the front rank on a splendid chair, attired in rich
dark-coloured robes, and supported on the right
hand and the left by his assessors, Say and Lisle,
with a long table similarly decked before them.
The galleries were crowded almost to suffocation
by spectators pale with excitement and anxiety,
while the whole body of the building was filled
by an enormous multitude upon the right, and by
a regiment of musketeers upon the left, in caps of
steel and polished corslets, with their pieces loaded
and their ready matches lighted, a narrow passage
being marked out with silken cords between the
soldiery and populace, affording a free passage
from the doorway to the bar. The judges entered
in the midst of a silence so stern and deep, that
the slight rustling of their mantles and their feet
on the thick carpets, which were strewn within the
bar, was clearly audible. Solemn, severe, and sad,
they took their seatseach man of them, as it
appeared
,
almost oppressed by the intense feeling of
the vast responsibility which had been laid upon
him, and each determined to acquit himself as
became
one called to act, as it were, before the real
and imbodied presence of his country and his God.
As Ardenne looked around him, he felt the blood
thrill painfully in every pore of his own frame! He
saw that the same process was at work in all
around him! Never had he beheld so pale a
concourse
!
Yet, amid all that colourless and ashy
pallor
,
there was no sign of trepidation or dismay; it
was the outward aspect of a mind within so rigidly
and painfully resolved, that it had gathered all the
blood toward its citadel the heart, not the weak
failing of the flesh through doubt or terror. Scarce
had their seats been taken ere the doors of that
great hall were opened, and a sedan chair,
preceded
and surrounded by a guard of carbineers,
was carried to the bar, where a large chair of
velvet
was set forth for the king's accommodation.
There was a pause of intense interest as the
prisoner
stepped outit seemed as if the heart of each
man in that huge apartment had ceased from its
pulsations
not
a hand moved, not a breath was drawn.
It was, however, but for a moment; for the king
instantly came forth, dressed in his usual garb of
sable silk, decked only by the star and garter, and
wearing on his head his high-crowned hat, which
he did not remove, when, after a stern and haughty
look of mingled pride and sadness on the assembled
court, he calmly took the seat prepared for his
reception
.
Nor did he then, by any glance or sign of
courtesy, acknowledge or show any reverence to
the court; but, after sitting still for a few minutes'
space, arose again, and, having turned completely
round with his back toward the judges, gazed
steadfastly down the long area of the hall with the
same severe aspect as before, until the crier of the
court began to read the ordinance of parliament
commanding his arraignment in a sharp ringing
voice, that filled the whole apartment with its
distinct
and high-pitched tones. Then he again sat
down, with his eyes fixed immoveably on the
commanding
and undaunted features of the president.
The parliament's commission ended, the names of
all the judges were called overand, first, that of
the president, who answered in a clear voice, quiet
and unmoved by any tremour. Then the
lord-general
was summoned, and straight there was a
pause of unexpected silence, for no one answered.
Again the crier's accents wakened the echoes of
the hallLord Fairfax!and this second time a
shrill voice, though musical and soft, replied. He
has more wit, it said, than to be present here!
The court rose in confusionthere was a
momentary
tumult, and a clamour of stern import both
from the judges and spectators; but Bradshaw's
high notes, pealing like a silver trumpet's above the
din of tongues, enforced tranquillity, and, calling on
the officers to seize the person who had dared
contemn
the court, appeased the short-lived riot. But
when, after a hasty search, no one could be
discovered
,
the calling of the commissioners proceeded,
until nearly eighty had answered to their names.
Then, with an air of deep religious feeling, mixed
with the consciousness of high authority, engraved
on his strong features, marked, as they were, by
lines of wearing thought, and pale from studious
vigils over the midnight lamp, Bradshaw arose;
and his voice, though it faltered not, was subdued
almost unto tenderness as he addressed the royal
culprit.
Charles Stuart, king of Englandthe commons
of England, being deeply sensible of the calamities
that have been brought upon this nation, which are
fixed upon you as the principal author of them,
have resolved to make inquisition for blood; and,
according to that debt and duty which they owe to
justiceto Godto the kingdom, and themselves,
they have resolved to bring you to trial and to
judgment; and for that purpose have constituted
the high court of justice before which you are now
brought.
This said, Cook, the attorney of the
commonwealth
,
who sat close to the person of the
prisoner
,
rose to address the court; but the king,
having
in his hand a staff of ebony, tipped with a little
head of silver, laid it upon his shoulder, and, in the
deep tones of authority, commanded him to Hold!
which word he still reiterated with warmth, that
might almost have been termed violence, when he
perceived that he was disobeyed at the
lord-president's
command.
My lord, the attorney said, I come here to
charge Charles Stuart, the King of England, in the
name of the commons of England, with treason
and high misdemeanour. I desire that the said
charge may be read! And the lord-president
giving direction to the clerk to read the charge,
the king, in a yet louder and more angry voice,
cried Hold; but Bradshaw, his large black eyes
flashing with indignation, sternly forbade the clerk
to notice the rude interruptions of the prisoner at
the bar, but to get on to his dutyand the
indictment
was read instantly, containing, in effect, that
he had been admitted King of England, and trusted
with a limited power to govern according to law;
and, by his oath and office, was obliged to use the
power committed to him for the good and benefit
of the people; but that he had, out of a wicked
design to erect himself an unlimited and tyrannical
power, and to overthrow the rights and liberties of
the people, traitorously levied war against the
present
parliament and the people therein represented.
It then enumerated the calamities which had
befallen
Englandthe free and noble blood which
had been shed like waterthe devastation of the
fair face of the land, the burning of its rich and
thriving cities, the slaughter of its bravest sons.
It pointed to the causesthe commissions signed
by his own hand for levying this domestic war
the raising of his standard in the town of
Nottingham
his
presence at Edgehill, and other battles
fought under his eye and at his instigationso many
flagrant proofs that he had been the author and
contriver of these unnatural, cruel, and bloody wars;
and was therein guilty of all the treasons,
murders
,
rapines, burnings, spoils, desolations,
damages
,
and mischief to the nation which had been
committed in the said wars, or been thereby
occastened
;
and that he was, therefore, now impeached
for the said crimes and treasons, on the behalf and
in the name of all the good people of England
As the clerk read these words, while all the vast
assemblage was hushed in the deep silence of
attention
and excitement, the same shrill voice which
had before proclaimed the absence of the
Lord-general
Fairfax again exclaimed, in tones so
thrilling
that they penetrated every portion of the
building
No!
nor one hundreth part of them. The
tumult which ensued was yet more wild and more
alarming than before; the whole crowd sprang to
their feet with a hoarse savage murmur, and a rush
and a rustling of their feet and garments that
might be heard to a considerable distance. One
officer, a grim hard-featured fanatic, leaped forward
from the ranks, and pointing with his sheathed
rapier
to that division of the galleries whence the
disturbance had proceeded, furiously shouted to his
men, bidding them Level their muskets and give
fire! A fearful scene ensuedthe heavy rattling
of the matchlocks, as they were thrown forward,
ready for instant use, by the fierce soldiery, was
almost drowned by the cries, shrieks, and
exclamations
of the spectators, many of whom were
females
,
all now in mortal terror at the prospect of
receiving an immediate volley, rushing in all
directions
to and fro, and some of them endeavouring
to drop down into the body of the hall. Before,
however, time was given for the men to fire, it
was announced to the lord-president that the
disturber
of the court was, in truth, no other or less
personage than the Lady Fairfax, who had taken
this extraordinary mode of testifying her dislike to
the proceedings, and had been now persuaded to
withdraw. On this announcement silence and
peace was once again restored, and after a few
moments the clerk went on with the arraignment,
repeating the offensive words more loudly than
before
On
the behalf and in the name of all the
good people of England, as a tyrant, traitor, and
murdererand an implacable and public enemy to
the commonwealth of England. Then, with
remarkable
and singular ill-taste, and as ill-judgment,
Charles, who had been continually gazing about
the court in different directions, as if entirely free
from interest of any sort in the proceedingsnow
lowering on the judges with cool contemptuous
haughtinessnow glaring with an eye of bitter
hatred
on the dark soldiery which kept the avenues
now gazing with an air of sad reproachful
gravity
,
not all unblent with pity, on the bulk of the
spectatorsactually burst out into a loud and
ringing
laugh as the word traitor was pronounced.
Bradshaw again arose majestically firm and
steadythough evidently moved to anger by the
open undisguised contempt of Charlesand with
strong emphasis, and evident determination to check
this disrespectful levity on the king's part, though
Vol. II.O
not without consideration for the high place and
natural displeasure of the prisoner at the
proceedings
of the court, rebuked him for the tone and air
he had adopteda tone and air becoming neither
his own dignityhis position at the present
moment
nor
the exaited duties and great power of
the court before whom he stood arraigned. With
the same air of unconcealed contempt which he
had hitherto displayed, Charles listened to the
president's address, and answered by a denial of
the existence of any authority whatever in the court
of any right pertaining unto them or to the
English people to hold their king to trialor of
any legal power at all vested in those before whom
he now stood. Little occurred worthy of farther
note during the three days of this singular and
all-important
ceremonial. The king, persisting in
denial
of the court's authority, refusing to plead to
the indictment under which he stood arraigned,
and constantly breaking in with frivolous and
uncivil
interruptions upon the business and
proceedings
of the trial, was, at the end of the first day,
remanded
,
and the commissioners adjourned to the
ensuing Monday, the twenty-second instant. Upon
this second day the prisoner's behaviour was the
same; and, after some considerable altercation, he
was again remanded, and led back under close
custody
to Sir Robert Cotton's house, where lodgings
were assigned to him during the hearing of his
cause. Again, on the next day, the twenty-third,
the court resumed, and, on the king's appearance
at the bar, the commonwealth's attorney instantly
craved judgment on him as contumacious; saying
that the innocent blood shed by him cried aloud
for justice. For the last time the prisoner was
commanded by the president to plead, and warned
that, by persisting in his present course, he would
but draw upon him an immediate judgment; but
Charles again refused to offer any answer or
defence
,
crying out that he valued not the charge a
rushthat he would not now violate the trust
his people had reposed in him, by owning a new
court of judicaturethat it was for their liberty
he stood, and, but for this, he would not here object
to giving satisfaction to the English people of the
clearness of his past proceedings. The clerk
accordingly
was ordered to record the prisoner's
default
and
the court once again adjourned until
the twenty-seventh, sitting throughout the interval
caused by the king's determination in the painted
chamber daily, and hearing witnesses to the fact
of his setting up the standard of his cause at
Nottingham
the
leading of his troops in armour at
Edgehill, Newbury, and Nasebythe issuing of
mandates and commissions to his officers for
prosecution
of the war!and seeking to establish proofs
with which they judged it needful to hold
themselves
provided, in case of the king's choosing at
the last to plead. After this pause they met as
previously, upon the twenty-seventh, in the great
hall at Westminster, and the cause was once more
resumed; but still the king refused to answer or
submit; and then the president informed him that
the court had considered and agreed upon a
judgment
,
but yetif he had any thing to say in
defence
of himself in respect to the matter charged
they were prepared to hear him. In reply, Charles
demanded to be heard before both houses of the
parliament, assembled in the painted chamber,
before
the passing of the sentence. This, after an
adjournment of the court for half an hour to
consider
on the king's proposition, was refused, as
being, in effect, but a new denial of their
jurisdiction
as now constituted, and a fresh contempt. On
the return of the commissioners he was at once
informed
that he had all too long delayed the court
already by his contempt and contumacy, and that
they were resolved unanimously to proceed to
judgment
and to punishment. Then, in a long speech,
eloquent and lucid, and replete with arguments
which might appear most fitting to excuse and
justify
such a proceeding, and to convince the world of
the right
moral
justice of a measure not certainly
in strict conformity with
legal
precedents,
Bradshaw
proceeded to pass sentence on the prisoner
and, toward the end of his oration, urged on the
king the scriptural example of David's late
repentance
for his imitation.
Unmoved and haughty, with his dark features
marked by no expression save a slight scornful
sneer, Charles rose, still covered, and strove once
again to interrupt himdemanding to be heard
concerning those great imputations thus laid to his
charge, but was again reminded that he had
refused
to own the court, and that too much delay
and liberty had been already granted to him. The
sentence was then readthe president affirming it
to be the sentence, judgment, and resolution of
the whole court, and all the members standing up
to testify their full concurrence with their speaker.
For the last time the royal culprit claimed to be
heard; but, at the president's direction, the guards
withdrew him, still exclaiming loudlythat, since
he was not suffered for to speak, he might expect
what sort of justice other men should have of them!
Various and wild were the expressions of disgust
and approbation among the multitude; some cried
God save the king! despite the angry scowls and
bitter menaces of the fanatical and furious guards
others, and far the most in numbers, shouted,
with inflamed visages and bitter tones, Justice!
and Vengeance! and Away with him!and
one, more brutal than the rest, offered to strike
him with his hand as he was led forth from the
hall, and actually spat upon his beard! The court
arose! the members dispersed to their homes! the
most unprecedented, singular, and solemn trial on
record in the anuals of the universe was endeda
trial, wherein a puissant nation was the plaintiffa
king, the son and grandson of a long line of mighty
and hereditary monarchs, the defendantand the
point at issue, the momentous question whether
the kings of England should be despots over
cringing
and soul-shackled slaves, or the first
magistrates
of an enlightened, wise, and free, and potent
people! Happily for England! happily for the
world! the judges of that wondrous court were
equal to the task. Their verdict was the fiat of
their country's freedomrational, moderate, and
stable! and to the world that verdict set forth an
example that has been followed, far and near, to
the establishment of liberty, and happiness, and
even-handed justice, in regions then obscured by
the thick night of tyranny and ignorance! By his
blood Charles Stuart sealed the charter of
England's
constitution; and, though for a short time
the people lapsed again beneath a sway as absolute
as his, it was but for a time!and the seeds sown
in that first revolution, moistened with noble blood,
and matured by the stormy breath of war, though
they lay dormant for a space, were not extinct, but
grew up to a fair and fertile crop, and so have
flourished sinceand may they flourish so for
ever! It may be that the death of Charles was
a great legal wrong!it may be that among his
judges many were actuated by insane and
senseless
feelings of overstrained religionthat many
were urged on by personal resentments!personal
O 2
hopes and fears!personal pride!and personal
ambition! But, not the less for these things, it
must be confessed that it was A GREAT MORAL
RIGHT! If Charles deserved to live, no tyrant ever
merited to die! If Charles
had
lived, England
had never been, what she now is, THE FREE! nor
would another land, the giant offspring of an
immortal
mother, have carried those same principles,
for which her parent bled before her, into effect
over a space a thousand times more mighty! The
good traits of
the man
such as they were, feeble
and faintly marked, and showing rather the
absence
of strong vice than the existence of
distinguishing
and vivid virtuemust neither hide nor
palliate the evil actions and worse motives of
the
king!
That it was his design to do away, so far
as in him lay, with England's constitution!to
reign uncurbed by parliamentsthe only salutary
check on regal sway!to wield the boundless
power of the nation's sword, and grasp with the
same hand the vast resources of the nation's purse!
to mould the church into an instrument and
weapon of his despotic government!to reign, in
short, an absolute and autocratic sovereign!none
can at this time doubt, unless they wilfully seal up
their minds against the truth! In desperate
diseases
,
means that at other times were desperate
and deadly must be applied to cure! and it may
be asserted, without much danger of disproof, that,
by the death of Charles, and by that
only
, could
the great principles of that immortal struggle have
been wrought out to their fulfilment. It was twice
needful!needful, that it might hold up a terrible
and salutary dread to future tyrantsthat it might
tear the roots of despotism from the soil they
would have rendered sterile!and doubly needful,
that, by conducting England through the fearful
ordeal of democratic anarchy, it might infuse a yet
more salutary dread into the people, of liberty
unregulated
and immoderatelicentiousness, not
freedom
!
These were, in part, the thoughts of
Andenne
as he subscribed his name to that strange
instrument which, next to Magna Charta, may be
looked upon in its results as the chief cause of
England's present greatness. Under her previous
sovereigns, ambitious, great, and wise as many of
them doubtless were, England was but, at best, a
secondary power. Under her first and sole
usurper
she blazed forth, on the instant, into a star of
almost solar magnitude; and, but for that
death-warrant
,
the navigation act had never given her
dominion
over the boundless seas, nor made her, as
the great commercial nation, one of the mightiest
springs and morers of the universe.
What were the real motives of that man, who, if
he did not absolutely bring about, might, beyond
question, absolutely have prevented, the execution
of the king, no human understanding may divine.
But the great probability is, that, like most human
motives; they were of mingled strainhalf fire and
half clay! Sir Edgar, in the course of the
proceedings
,
had been convinced, to his full
satisfaction
,
that the mind of Oliver was strangely and
unnaturally overwrought. His coarse and vulgar
jocularity at Ludlow's househis paleness and
unwonted
trepidation on the king's first appearance
the little share he took in any portion of the trial,
for, except one outbreaking of fierce temper when
Mr. Downes, during the last adjournment, most
pathetically
urged the members to grant his majesty's
demand of a joint conference of the three estates,
he had scarce taken any interest in what was
going forwardand, above all, his brutal and
half-frantic
jests during the same adjournment, when
he daubed Henry Martin's face with ink, and jeered
and laughed so as to move the wonder of all
present
all
these things, taken in connexion with the
state in which he found him when he visited his
chamber to beseech him after the sentence had
been passed, had proved to Ardenne, past all
doubt, that he was awfully perturbed in spirit. It
was late in the evening of the day following the
trial that Sir Edgar, who, though he had
concurred
in the sentence, wished its mitigation,
sought Cromwell's lodging at Whitehall, nor was
it without some urgency that he compelled the
soldiers
and domestics to admit him. The fortunate
commander was already in possession of the superb
apartments which had so lately called his fallen
rival master. In the first antechamber of that
gorgeous
suite, two privates of the ironsides were
sitting
by a blazing fire, its bright light flashing from
their steel armour and accoutrements in strong and
painful contrast to the luxurious decorations and
appliances of royal case among which they were
seated. The second and third rooms of the suite
were vacant, although dazzlingly illuminated by
many waxen lights; but, long before he reached
the door of the last room, Ardenne's attention was
aroused by the deep groans, mingled with broken
exclamationssnatches of fervent but disjointed
prayer, and bursts of passionate and painful
weeping
,
which fell upon his ear as he advanced. He
rapped against the panel, but his signal was
unheard
,
or, at the least, unheededthough the
sounds which he had heard had now ceased, saving
only the sullen echoes of heavy and irregular steps,
distinctly audible even as they fell on the soft
texture
of the three-plied Persian carpets.
Scrupulous
though he was, and jealous almost to excess
of undue familiarity, Sir Edgar was too much
excited
now to stand on points of form. He turned
the gilded handle, and almost noiselessly the door
revolved upon its hinges; and, in one of his most
dark moods, hypochondriac or conscience-stricken,
that wonderful man stood before him. The large
apartment sumptuously decked with furniture and
hangings of splendid crimson velvetthe
toilet-table
with its appurtenances of transparent crystal
and plate of solid goldthe royal arms of England
embroidered on the tester of the bed, piled high
with coverlets of down and satin, passed scarcely
seen before the eyes of the spectator engrossed in
observation of the strange being who now tenanted
the halls of England's sovereign. A single light,
and that obscure and waning, stood on the central
table of some rich eastern wood, and on the hearth
a few decaying brands, which had been suffered to
burn low, smouldered with more of smoke than
flame, casting a sickly and unnatural light about
the chamber. But HEthe tenant!with
blood-shot
eyes, and features ghastly wan and haggard
he strode to and fro with steps irregular and almost
staggeringnow waving his extended arm on high
now striking it upon his broad breast with a
violence
denoted plainly by the heavy and dull sound
of the oft-repeated blows. Tearscopious and
agonizing tearsthose which console not nor
relieve
,
but burn like vengeful firesflowed down
his hollow cheeksand his words, wild as his gait
and gestures, were now of bitter self-reproach, of
accusation, and remorsenow of sincere and
humble
penitenceand now of fierce ecstatic triumph!
but, in an instant, in the twinkling of the eye, as
he perceived that be was not alone, his air and
aspect
were, as if by magic transformation, utterly
changed and calm.
Ha! good Sir Edgar, he exclaimed, this is
a pleasure such as I have not long experienced
nor, though such friendly visitations were once
ordinary
things betwen us, of late days expected!
I have called on you, Ardenne gravely replied,
I have called on you now, lieutenant-general, not
for mere ordinary reasons, whether of friendship or
of ceremonialbut upon matters of great weight
and interest to England! To come to the point at
once, I have called here believingand hoping
likewisethat I shall find in you a real and
unselfish
patriotone that regards not
self-aggrandizement
,
or fame, or wealth, or power, when compared
to his country's weal. In this hopethis belief
I have come to implore you, as a friend and
faithful
counsellor, that you will interpose your
powerful
influence to shield this most unhappy king from
death. Justice required that he should be
condemned
justice
is satisfied! The great example
is set forth to England and the universe!all ends
are answered that his execution can attain! And
you, sir, who have won the brightest crown of
warlike
honour that has been witnessed in these later
days, beware! Beware, I say, lest present times,
ay! and posterity to boot, shall deem that, in
permitting Charles to perish by the headsman's
axe, you have looked rather to your own than to
your country's interests! Kill himfor, in
neglecting
to preserve, you actually kill no less than
if alone, and by a single mandate, you condemned
himkill him, and it may well be you shall reign
yourself as monarch over Englandbut, to gain a
precarious, short-lived, and unhappy eminence, you
shall lose present peace and future gloryyou
shall cast from you the esteem and love of those
who
have
bled and
would
die for youyou shall
stand high in solitary friendless statewithout the
lingering consolation of a self-approving spirit!
Spare himsave himand you shall be the first
for ever in the heart and judgment of every honest
Britenwhile England's name exists, yours shall
live in coeval glorythe title of the loftiest worth
the purest patriotismthe most disinterested
clemency that earth has witnessed since her young
surface bore the steps of giants and of angels!
Nay! you wax warm in eloquence! Oliver
answered, coldly. Surely your zeal doth eat you
up! yea, the desire of your heart doth rise up to
your brain, and cloud its better reason. I would
ay, of a surety I do profess to youI would lay
down not merely the poor honourthat vainest and
most fickle breath of human fantasywhich you
ascribe to me, to whom it is not due, but to the
Lord of Hosts!but my life evenmy existence
upon earth!my hope of seeing England the freest
and the first of European princedoms!that so
this bruised and bending reed might not be trodden
in the mirethis frail and half-cracked potsherd
might not be shivered into atoms! But, when the
Lord hath spoken, what mortal shall gainsay him?
Was it not borne into our heartsbranded with
characters
of living fire upon the inmost tablets of our
souls`Ye shall avenge my peoplefor their blood
and their children's blood, which he hath spilled
upon the ground that hath not drunk it up, calleth
aloud for vengeance!yea! ye shall slay the king.'
Is it not written that `ye shall not suffer one of
them to live!' and what are we that we should
contradict
Jehovali? I could not if I wouldI could
not if I wouldand that I would do so, as the
game stands, I say notnow save Charles Stuart
from the infliction of that righteous sentence which
you have aided to pass on him! The people have
arisen in their mightthe people's voice hath gone
forth to the utmost portions of the world, `The
king shall surely die!' the people's voice is God's
voice! Hear it and tremblehear it and obey!
At once the latest hope of Edgar vanished; the
firm determination, evinced not by words only, but
by the cold hard eye, the compressed lip, the
clinched hand, and the hard-set teeth through
which the low stern voice was sent out in a harsh
and hissing whisper, proved to him so distinctly,
as to banish even hope, that Charles had not a
possibility, much less a chance, of life at
Cromwell's
intercession! and from the lip of Cromwell
only could any intercession come that should
prevail
over the angry prejudices and morose
fanaticism
of the army! Seeing the fruitlessness of
effort
,
he desisted! With a sick heart and boding
spirit he departed from the presence of the arbiter,
whom even now he knew not whether to think an
over-zealous patriot or an ambitious hypocritical
adventurer, playing a deep game for a mighty
venture
,
and strode away to find in his lone lodging a
sleepless bed disturbed by ominous and sad
presagings
by
doubts, by sorrow, by remorse!for
he already had begun bitterly to repent the part
which he had borne in the great revolution now
about to terminate so tragically for the rulerso
disastrously, as his fears told him, for the ruled
and, above all, so fatally for England's permanent
and real peace. Scarcely had Edgar gone from
Cromwell's presence, before a new petitioner
arrived
,
and, with yet more of difficulty than the
former
had experienced gained access to the
presence
of his kinsman; for that petitioner was no
other than his cousin, Colonel John Cromwell, an
officer of the Dutch service, and commissioned as
his agent with the parliament by the Prince of
Wales, who at this time, resided at the Hague. In
the commencement of the interview the able and
accomplished soldier confined himself to solemn
and ceremonious remonstrances against the act in
contemplation; assuring his great relative of the
resentment, horror, and disgust which this
atrocious
crimefor so he hesitated not to call it
would kindle throughout every Christian land!
would kindle, not against England, nor the
parliament
,
nor armybut against him alone, who, as
the world well knew, could wind the reins of
government
just as he listed, pointing the councils of
the one and wielding the war-weapons of the other!
Tush! cousin, answered Oliver, tell me not
of atrocity and crime! 'Tis a great act of
sovereign
and solemn justice!but, were it as you say,
I have no power to alter it. It is the army, and
not I, who
will
inflict this justice on the king,
brooking not any let nor hindrance.
Remember you not, sir, exclaimed the other,
how, some twelve months ago, you did profess to
me, that `rather would you draw your sword in
the defence of Charles, than suffer these
republicans
to harm one hair upon his head!'have you
forgotten this and other such asseverations, or do
you wilfully and of aforethought violate your word?
Well, right well I remember it! Cromwell
replied, in tones of great asperity, and well you do
now to remember me of it; for so you remind
me of
his
base and lying insincerity, that drove the
faithful and brave army into such bitterness of
wrath as not even I could stem, either by force or
counsel! The times are changedthe times are
changed, and strangely! since I spoke so to you
and on his own head be his blood!for by his own
craft, his own ingrate and selfish subtlety, hath he
dragged down on him this ruin. If it be true, that
whom the gods have destined to destruction they
first deprive of reason, as the wise Ethnics did
believe
,
Vol. II.P
then hath the Lord of Hosts hardened the
heart of this man that he should die, not live!
You are determined, then, to do this deed of
infamy
and horror? the foreign officer demanded.
I am determined! Oliver answered, sternly,
I am determined not to interfere with England's
course of judgment. I have prayed for the king,
and fasted! yea, I have striven with the Lord
these many times that some way might be given
me to save himbut no return hath yet been made
to me, nor any sign, ner answer!
Then Colonel Cromwell rose up from his seat,
and walking with light steps toward the doorway,
cautiously looked out, and satisfied himself that no
one was within earshot; then turning the key with
a wary hand, and dropping a strong night-latch,
he returned, and drawing from his bosom an
emblazoned
parchment containing his credentials, and
a large sheet of vellum perfectly blank and vacant,
but signed at length and sealed, in his own name
and for his royal father, by Charles Stuart, prince
of Wales and heir apparent, he laid them on the
table under the eye of his bold kinsman.
Cousin, he said, it is no time to dally now
with mere words in this matter. Look here at
this carte blanche. It is in your sole power now
to makenot yourself onlybut your posterity,
and family, and kindred, happy, and great, and
honourable
through all ages! Else, as they changed
their name in bygone days from Williams unto
Cromwell, so now must they be forced to change
it once again; for this one fact will bring such
infamy
upon the name and the whole generation of
them, that no after ages will be able to wipe out
the shameful stain!
The general's features worked convulsively, and
his face flushed crimson, and paled, and flushed
again, as he heard this address; and his hand
dropped down to his dagger's hilt, and griped it
with such force as if he would have buried his
strong fingers in the ivory pommel; but, when his
guest had ended, he answered in a quiet voice,
though evidently guarded and constrained.
You have done! he said, you have done, sir,
and I have heard you out! I have been hitherto
calm!very calm, he continued, gradually
warming
,
as he spoke, into fierce ire; I have endured
to hear my motives questionedmy assertions
doubtedand the great cause, of which I am a
most unworthy, but a most sincere supporter,
scoffed at, and vilified, and held up as atrocious in
the world's eye, infamous, and shameful! Calmly
I have endured all this!nay, I have heard my
own good name traduced, my family dishonoured,
the name of Cromwell coupledcoupled, I say, as
if synonymouswith villany and its reward
disgrace
!
Calmly I have endured this also! But
you have dared to
bribe
me! presumed to fancy
that you could buy me, not like a fettered captive
in the body, but like a renegado and apostate in
the chainless mind. You! youa Cromwell
have ventured, face to face, to offer me the basest
of affrontsto tender to me gold, and rank, and
titles, to turn me from my righteous purposeto
seduce me from my conscience, my allegiance, and
my honour! Thank Godthank God!I say,
thank God, if you believe in himthat I am
regenerate
,
and you a Cromwellfor were
I
one jot
more a sinner than I amor
you
one tittle less
connected with my bloodthen had I sheathed
this daggerand, as he spoke, he drew and dashed
the weapon furiously upon the ground before his
feetdudgeon deep in your heart! Begone! you
have your answer!
Truly had Oliver said that the tempter was of
his own blood; for he rose firmly from his chair,
and, with an erect and unflinching carriage, looked
full in his enraged kinsman's eye till he ceased
speaking; and thenTush! cousin Oliver, he
said, I care not for your vagaries of passionI
am a soldier, man, and not a woman or a child,
that words can daunt me. But now you are
distempered
think
of this matter deeply; weigh it,
and ponder on it ere you answer. I shall await, at
my inn, your reply until to-morrow morning. Give
you good-night and better temper! and he
withdrew
,
believing in his heart that Oliver's rage was
but assumed, and that the golden bait would take.
But sadly was he destined to be deceived; for, at
about an hour after midnight, a messenger came to
him from Whitehall, and told him he might now
go to bed, for he must not expect any more
answer
than he had unto the prince; for that the
council of the officers had again been seeking God
and there was no hope for it, but the king must
die. Accordingly, upon the following morning, the
celebrated twenty-ninth of January, Charles, after
a mournful parting with his children, was led
through the palace-garden and park of St. James
to his own chamber at Whitehall, where he prayed
for a space with Bishop Juxon, who afterward
accompanied
him to the block; thence to the
banqueting-hall
,
and thence, through a passage broken
in the wall, unto the scaffold. There, after a short
speech, which he concluded by declaring that he
had a good causehe had a gracious Godand,
therefore, he would say no more, he laid down his
head on the block, and died, with such a perfect
dignity, such a serene and modest fearlessness,
unmixed
with any thing of boldness or parade, as to
justify the observation, applied originally to
another
,
that no action of his life became him like
the leaving of it!
CHAPTER VII.
Now there he lies,
With none so poor to do him reverence.
Julius Csar
.
Tot populis terrisque superbum
Regnatorem Asi. Jacet ingens litore truncus
A volsumque humeris caput, et sine nomine corpus.
neid
, II., 556.
Midnight
was on the mighty city. The happy
sleep had swept away the cares of thousands in
its still deathlike oblivion. The multitudes who
had assembled to sate themselves with gazing on
the sad yet exciting spectacle of the morning,
wearied and worn out with the unnatural tension
of their nerves during that day of horror, had passed
away to seek a contrast in the repose of their
domestic
chambers. The very guards were
slumbering
on their posts about the precincts of
Whitehall
,
and not a sound or breath disturbed the silence
of the night. Within the palace, in one of those
sublime apartments which he had loved so well
while living, upon a lofty bed, adorned with
crimson
curtains, and rich ostrich plumes, and the
gold-blazoned
arms of England, lay a plain oaken coffin,
half covered with a pall of sable velvet. Many
tall waxen torches blazed around the room in
candlesticks
of solid silver, six feet at least in height,
and their light glanced upon a narrow plate of
silver
decking the coffin's lid, whereon were these
few words, King Charles1648. No
mourning
crowds wept round the couch whereon the
hapless prince slept that cold sleep that knows no
P 2
earthly waking. No coroneted peers watched over
the embalmed remainsno flippant pages hushed
their accustomed merriment in reverence to the
ashes of their masterno guard of honour, with
trailed arms and downcast visages, stood sentinel
without the door; but, with their carbines loaded,
sheathed in their buff coats and bright armour, two
privates of the ironsides strode to and fro, passing
each other and repassing at brief intervalsthe
ringing of their heavy armature, and the loud sounds
of their spurred and booted footfalls, awakening
strange echoes in that apartment of the dead. The
night wore onward, and the stars began to wink in
the cold skies, and the first coming of the morn
was felt in the increasing chillness of the air;
hitherto
had the watch of those unusual mourners been
lonely and uninterrupted. The clock, however,
was just striking three, and its loud cadences were
vocal still through the long vacant halls and vast
saloons of the deserted palace, when a remote and
stealthy footstep broke upon the silence which was
succeeding fast to the loud chimes. The soldiers
interchanged alarmed and jealous glances, blew
their slow matches to a vivid flame, and, listening
with wary ears and ready weapons, resumed their
guarded walk. Nearer and nearer came the step,
firm, regular, and low, but evidently not desirous
of avoiding observationnow it was at the doorit
paused, and, bringing simultaneously their
weapons
to the level, the soldiers halted between the
body and the door, and challenged loudly, Stand,
ho! the word. Stand, or we shoot!
Justice and freedom! answered a harsh and
croaking voiceand, bearing in his right hand a
small waxen taper, and in his left a staff of ebony,
Oliver Cromwell entered. He was dressed
plainly
in a full suit of black cloth, with silken hose, and
a loose cloak of broadcloth faced with velvet, a
very light black-hilted rapier hanging from his
girdle
in lieu of the long heavy broadsword which he
so rarely laid aside; his face was very pale, but
perfectly composed and grave, with the mouth
firmly closed, and the eyes shining with a steady
and unaltered light.
Good watch, he cried, as he came in, you
keep good watch. Cold work, I trow, and
cheerless
.
What would ye say now to a flagon of
October
hey!
Stephenson, hey! Bowtell? So! so!
ye are on duty, ye would saywell, interrupt me
not for thatI will relieve ye for a brief space
but one at a timeone only! Stephenson, give
me thy carbine and the matchand now get thee
down to the buttery; tarry not over half an hour,
and return straightway to take bluff Bowtell's
place! The soldier grinned significantly, gave
up his weapon to his officer, and walked off greatly
pleased at this brief intermission of an unpleasant
duty. Cromwell looked after him as he departed,
and, when his footsteps had sunk into silence,
depositing
the carbine he had taken in a corner, he
walked up slowly to the coffin with a strong stately
step and unmoved aspect.
He
hath not broken on thy watch, then? he
demanded, with a grim smile, but evidently
speaking
thoughtfully and with emotion, although
wishing
to conceal his feelings by an assumption of
unfeeling
merriment; he hath not waked to scare
ye?
Now may the Lord forbid, returned the
superstitious
soldier, half alarmed at the words and
manner of his officer; what mean you, worthy
general?
Why, how now, simpleton? Cromwell replied;
you look, in truth, as if he had walked forth in
his untimely cerements to affright you. But fear
not, Bowtell, fear not!the king sleeps sound!
and shall sleep till the day when the great trumpet
of Jehovah shall call him to a mightier judgment,
and, it may well be, to a darker doom! Have they
screwed down the coffin? he continued; I fain
would look upon him; and he moved closer to the
bed, and, throwing back the pall of velvet, tried to
raise the lid; but, though not permanently fastened
down, it yet resisted the attempt, being held
tightly
by some two or three stout spikes. After a
moment's pause he thrust the ferrule of his staff into
the chink, and made an effort thus to draw the
nails out of their sockets; but they had been driven
in too firmly, and the staff creaked as though it
would have broken. Lend me thy rapier, he
exclaimed
;
its steel hilt will have strength enough;
and, with the word, he forced the pommel into the
aperture between the lid and side, and, leaning
heavily upon the weapon as a lever, wrenched up
the cover with an impetus so sudden that the
nails flew into the air, and struck against the
canopy
which overhung it. Then he stood fixed, and,
for a short time, speechless, regarding, with a
disturbed
and cloudy brow, the mangled body of his
victim. The body, which had been opened and
embalmed
,
was swathed in bandages of linen drawn
so tightly round the limbs, that, when the shroud
was lifted, the perfect form and the development
of all the muscles might be traced as plainly as
while he was in lifethe head, partially covered
by an embroidered napkin bound about the brows,
and a broad riband of white silk fastened beneath
the chin, was in its proper place; but a small
interval
,
that showed like a discoloured streak of dingy
red, marked its disseverment. The face was pale,
but scarcely more so than its wont, and far less
ashy in its hues than that of the undaunted warrior
who leaned over it. The lips retained their usual
and healthful colour, with something of a smile still
visible about them; the eyes were closed, but
naturally, and as if in sleep; the nose preserved
its wonted form, unsharpened as yet by the iron
hand of death. There was, indeed, no sign or
symptom of a painful and untimely dissolution on
those serene and comely lineamentssomething
there might be of a languor not characteristic of
the living man, of a placidity and peace more deep
than usual; but nothing which could have led any
one to fancy that the thread of life had been
snapped
violently, for him who slumbered there so
tranquilly, by the rude weapon of the executioner.
For a long time Cromwell spoke not a wordnor
moved a limbnor even winked an eyelid
steadfastly
,
solemnly gazing on the features of his fallen
foe and rival. He sleeps indeed!he sleeps,
how peacefully and well! That eye shall flash no
more with kingly pride; that lip be wreathed no
more into the calm but haughty sneer! The busy
brain, that plotted so much wo to Englandthe
indomitable
mind, that would not swerve one
hairbreadth
from its purpose, no, not to purchase life
are theseare these, too, in repose, like that cold
voiceless lip, that nerveless and inanimate right
hand? Is that sleep dreamless? Doth the soul,
plunged in a dark and senseless torpor, lie
paralyzed
and shorn of its pervading vigour in the abyss
of Hades?or hath it but awakened from this
trance, after the turmoil of mortality, to more
complete
perfectionto consciousness, and wisdom,
and unchanged immortality? Dost thou know,
thou cold formdost thou know now who stands
beside thee? He who continually strove against
the tyranny thou wouldst have set up in the land!
he who beat down thy banner in the field, and
swept thy gallant cavaliers like dust before the
whirlwind!he who brought down thy glory from
the throne, and paved thy path to that still hostelry
the grave? Dost thou know thisand yet not
start from out thy bloody cerements? I do but
dream, he went on, after a moment's pausethe
king is nothing! a mere clod in the valley! `Hell
from beneath is moved for thee, to meet thee at thy
coming: it stirreth up the dead for thee, even all
the chief ones of the earth; it hath raised up from
their thrones all the kings of the nations. All they
shall speak and say unto theeArt thou also
become
weak as we?art thou become like unto us?
Thy pomp is brought down to the grave, and the
noise of thy viols: the worm is spread under thee,
and the worms cover thee! How art thou fallen
from Heaven, oh Lucifer, son of the morning! how
art thou cut down, which didst weaken the nations!'
Thus was it written of a mightier one than thou
thus hath it been with thee! Thy place is empty
upon earththy country no more knows thee!
Verily thou art fallen asleepasleep for many a
thousand yearsuntil thou shalt be summoned to
make answer in the spirit for all thy deeds wrought
in the flesh. Yet then, even then, wilt thou have
nothing, fallen great one, nothing to witness against
me. But for thine own self-willthine own
tyrannical
and senseless follythine own oppressing of
the saints, and trampling under foot the delicate
and tender consciences of mennay, more than all
this, but for thine own false-dealing and foul
treachery
toward those who would have served thee truly
thou mightst have still sat in the high place
of thy forefathers!thou mightst have outshone
them, so far as the sovereign of a free and mighty
nation outshines the chieftain of an enslaved and
paltry tribe!thou mightst have been served by
hands and swords, through the Lord's help,
invincible
honoured
and loved by hearts loyal, sincere,
and single-minded!thou mightst have fulfilled
the number of thy days, dying in green old age
amid the tears and lamentations of thy people, and
bequeathing to thy sons that puissant and
time-honoured
sceptre which now shall never more be
wielded by thy race. Alas! alas! for man! Who
that looked on thee in thy fair and princely youth
would have presaged so sad an end to thy
bright-seeming
fortunes? Surely this frame of thine,
which mine own eyes have seen so proud-enthroned
upon thy charger's back, rallying thy followers
through the havoc and the terror of the battle
surely this frame of thine, so strongly knit, and
muscular, and manly, was formed to baffle
hardships
and to brave long years! Surely, but for
thine own insane and selfish folly, thou wast formed
to die old! Lo! and, as he thus spoke, he laid
the finger of his right hand in the gaping wound, and
with cool scrutiny examined the consistency and
texture of the muscles, lo! how sound is this
flesh, how wiry and elastic these dissevered sinews.
There is no symptom here of disease or debility!
no decayno corruption of the system! But
for the axe, he had lived yearsay! many and
long years! But, verily, all things are of the Lord
and had
He
not predestined him to die, then
had he hardened not his heart, nor raised up foes
against him, of whom it is a scripture that `none
shall be weary nor stumble among them; none
shall slumber nor sleep; neither shall the girdle of
their loins be loosed, nor the latchet of their shoes
be broken.' Whom the Lord listeth to destroy,
surely he striveth but in vain; for who shall find
strength in the sword, or refuge in the speed of
horses, against the Lord of Hosts? Then say not
that I slew thee, but the Lordfor how had I
defended
thee against the God of Battlesor how
had I acquitted whom
He
had judged to destroy?
He paused from the long wild declamation which
he had poured out in the perturbation of his spirit,
half conscious, and, perhaps, half self-convicted of
criminal ambition, and struggling to convince
himself
entirely of the truth of the dark creed he had
adopted, and thus to satisfy his restless spirit by a
halt voluntary self-deception. The sentinel,
meantime
,
had stood beside him, with his hand still
outstretched as when he first extended it to receive
again his sword, gazing partly in admiration, partly
in fear and awe, now on the calm and rigid
countenance
of the dead king, now on the varying
and agitated features of his almost remorseful
judge, but less astonished at the scene than would
have been expected, in consequence of the
prevailing
custom of his party to pray and preach,
with every species of whining cant or furious
raving
,
on all occasions anywise uncommon or
surprising
.
For several minutes' space Oliver gazed
again in silence on the body, and then replacing
the lid gently and almost tenderlyFarewell,
he said, farewell on earth for ever! Strangely
have we been linked together here below, and
wonderfully do we part! Hadst thou prevailed,
my fate had been more bitter! Farewell!
farewell
!
we meet no more, whether for good or evil,
until that final meeting when God must judge
between
us twotill then, sleep soundlyand then
awake
He
only knowsto what!
He then replaced the screws, and threw the
pall across the coffin as before, the soldier
Bowtell
holding a torch, which he had taken from the
nearest candelabrum, to assist him; this finished,
he withdrew a pace or two, wrapped his cloak
closely round him, and sat down upon a settle near
the bed. The soldier, having replaced the light,
stood for a little time in silence, and thenI pray
you tell me now, he said, heutenant-general,
what mode of government shall we now have?
The same as then was! he answered, in a
sharp decisive tone; and, instantly relapsing into
silence, sat in deep sullen thought, until the other
soldier came back from the buttery; then,
forgetting
quite or disregarding his first promise of
relieving
Bowtell in his turn, he took up the small
taper he had brought with him, and left the room
in his dark mood, speaking no word to either of the
sentinels.
CHAPTER VIII.
To hold you in perpetual amity,
To make you brothers, and to knit your hearts
With an unslipping knot, take Antony
Octavia to his wife. * *
* * * By this marriage
All little jealousies, which now seem great,
And all great fears, which now import their dangers,
Would then be nothing.
Antony and Cleopatra.
Some
months had passed after the death of
Charles, during which a new form of government
had been established. By a vote of the commons
the existence of the upper house was declared
dangerous
and useless, and, without more ado, it was
abolished. About the same time, by another vote,
monarchy was extinguished, and it was made high
treason to proclaim, or otherwise acknowledge,
Vol. II.Q
Charles Stuart, commonly called the Prince of
Wales, as king of England. A council of state
had been next composed, of forty-one members
among whom were Fairfax, Cromwell, Bradshaw,
with St. John and the younger Vaneon whom
devolved the duties of the executive, with a proviso
that they should resign their powers to the state
as soon as the republic should be settled on a per
manent and stable basis. Some disaffection of the
army, and tumults which, for a short time,
threatened
to be dangerous to the new government,
were put down and punished rigorously by the
zeal and energy of Cromwell, and all domestic
matters wore now a show of happier and fairer
promise than Ardenne had ever hoped to witness;
while the republic had already been acknowledged,
and received the greetings of manythe most
powerful potentates of Europe. Spring had grown
into early summer; but, while all things around him
gradually wore a fuller and more perfect beauty,
while buds expanded into full-blown blossoms, and
woods put on their freshest garniture of green, and
the rich fields gladdened the farmer's heart by their
broad promise, the hopes of Ardenne had been
blighted more and more, had faded into sorrows,
had been seared and dried up into absolute
despair
.
A very few days after the king's execution
he had been summoned to repair with speed to
Woodleigh, where Sibylhis beloved  his last
and only link to the cold worldwas dangerously, if
not desperately ill. He found heras his crushed
heart too truly had presagedalready dying. He
watched beside her couch, and day by day marked
the successive inroads of disease on that dear
form! He saw her hourly growiag weaker, paler,
and less earthly in her mortal frame; and hourly,
as he thought, more heavenly, more angelic in her
mind. Between them there was now no
estrangement
,
no distrust. Death, which to ordinary spirits
is a separationdeath was to them a bond of union.
Disguise was at endboth felt, both knew, and
both acknowledged that some wintry blight,
indeed
some casual indisposition, was the
immediate
cause of her decline, yet that a pined and
broken heart had sapped the corporeal energies, and
betrayed the fortress to the insidious spoiler.
Sorrow
,
regret, deep mourning, cast their dark
shadows
over them, but remorse came not near them
nor reproachnor any bitter feeling except the
sickening sense of hope deferred. Sad though it
was and pitiful, it was a lovely scenethat
deathbed
!
The bold and fearless soldier, unmanned
utterly, and sobbing like a sickly infant over the
wreck of her whom he felt that he now loved
better
when stricken, blighted, and cut off already
from communion with the sons of men, than when
she was the pride and admiration of all who chanced
to meet her. It has been said already that there
was no disguise between them; and now, when
every possibility of selfish motives was removed;
when there could be no more the slightest
misconstruction
;
when all asperities were, in truth,
softened
down by the approach of that great alchymist
of mortal deeds and mortal causesdeath! all that
had been before obscure and intricate was
rendered
plain as noonday. And Sibyl shamed not
to confess her sense of her own hapless error, an
error which had robbed her lover of all chance of
happiness on earthhad robbed herself of life!
and Ardenne, melted and tortured by contrition,
and half-repentant, as has been shown already, of
the part which he had played, and morbidly
dissatisfied
with the result of the experiment, sat
groaning
in the spirit by her pillow, and confessed, in very
liopelessness of heart, that he had cast away his
all for a mere visionfor a most vain and
senseless
fancy. But in these bitter moments it was
hers, as the true woman's part, still to enact the
comforterto point the real evils, which, while in
health and happiness, she scarce would have
admitted
such, that he had battled to put downand
the more real benefits which must spring up
hereafter
from the anarchy that had succeeded to the
fall of Charles, as darkness follows the decline of
day only to bring forth the more pure and mellow
moonshine. She diedand Ardenne was, indeed,
alonealone for ever!without one tie on earth
without one kindred creatore through whose
veins the pure blood of his fathers poured its
unmingled
currentwithout one selfish hope
without
one feeling left that could disturb or alienate
his absolute devotion to his country's weal! He
looked upon her cold corpse with a tearless eye
he saw the fresh green sod heaped over herand
felt that he had sacrificed his all, and sacrificed it
in chase of a phantom! He felt that England
was as far from rational and real liberty as at the
war's commencement, and how much farther from
the blessed calm of an established peace. A cold
and bitter mood of grief had fallen on him,
obscuring
all his brighter qualities, and overpowering the
energies of a mind once as elastic and pervading
as the tempered steel! It had changed his very
soul!it had made himeven more than all the
previous sorrows he had known, the previous
perils
he had faced, the previous disappointments he
had writhed in bearingan altereda new man!
The brilliant dreams and the warm hopes of youth
had faded long ago! The high and noble
purposes
of middle agethe pure ambition to be a
benefactor, not of his countrymen alone, but of the
universal human racethe steady longing after an
honest and clear famethe sacred fire of
patrioism
itself, were now, if not extinct, so chilled
and overwhelmed by the dull apathy of settled wo,
that it had needed much again to raise them into
luminous and active being. It was just when he
was the most absorbed in this sad stupor, some
three or four days only after the death of his lost
Sibyl, that an express arrived to rouse him from
his sullen musings among the shades of Woodleigh,
which had become once more his ownhe being
next of kin to his untimely-parted cousin. It was
an express from that great man, who, more than
ever, now, since the decease of Charles, swayed as
he chose the destinies of England, craving his
instant
presence to confer on matters of the highest
import both to themselves and to their country. It
is true that, long before this period, Sir Edgar
Ardenne
had ceased to feel that deep respect and
almost veneration which he once had entertained
for Cromwell. He had long found his suspicions
growing daily and hourly more strongdaily and
hourly more confirmed by overt actions. Still, with
such wondrous skill and subtlety had the
arch-schemer
wound along his path, onward, still
onward
!
that it was quite impossible to say at what
point of his ascent, or if indeed at all, he had
passed the confines of sincerity and patriotism, to
enter the stern regions of ambition. That
Cromwell
at this time enjoyed a power eminently great,
and at the same time dangerous, Ardenne could
not denythat he had attained to that power by
his own energy was self-apparentbut whether
he had framed the course which had exalted him
according to the dictates of religion and of
conscience
,
and so found his own high fortunes while
seeking but for England's weal; or whether he
Q 2
had struggled forward to his own grandeur as his
only goal, he could not even now decide. One
thing he clearly saw, that the experiment had for
the present failed!that, by the death of Charles,
tyranny was indeed put down!but put down
only to be followed by anarchyor by a tyranny
more mighty than the former! But, seeing this,
he saw no present way of extrication save through
the medium of the very man whom he suspected,
whom he feared, the most. He therefore judged
it most advisable not to permit the alienation
which had been growing up between them to
become
total; but, keeping a shrewd watch on all his
motions, to discover, if possible, what might be his
ulterior views, and, so far as his own influence
might avail, to keep him in the path of honesty
and honour. He
can
do more for England than
any living man, he muttered to himself, as, in
obedience
to the unexpected summons, he shook off
his lethargy and set his foot in the stirruphe
can
, beyond all question; and let us hope he
will
.
He
had
high virtues once no less than
wondrous
talents; and, certainly, I know not why I
should assume it as a fact that they are now
extinct
.
And
I
since I have lost all elsesince I
have worn away the flower of my yearswasted
the sweetness of my whole existence in
struggling
for my country, why should I hesitate to
pour out the dregs of an unprized and wearisome
existence; why should I doubt to cast away life
itself
alsoa life which only separates me from her
if that my life can profit England? I willI will,
as I have begun, so persevere! Consistency and
honour now alone are left to me, and never will I
disobey their dictates! A name which, though I
never shall transmit to others, I, at least, its last
owner, never, never will disgrace! He took his
solitary way to London, and, if not the less sad,
was at the least less bitterly absorbed by sorrow;
he mingled, with a grave aspect, certainly, and a
subdued demeanour, in the chance society of men,
and struggled, not all unsuccessfully, to shake off
a melancholy which, though it was a luxury to
indulge
,
he felt it was a duty to repress. The third
day toward nightfall found him already in the
heart of the metropolis, which, under its new
masters
,
wore a composed and steady aspect of society,
not, indeed, very gay or pleasing, yet praiseworthy
at least for the entire absence of rude revelry or
riot in the crowded streets. Ardenne found
Cromwell
,
as when he last had visited him, occupying
the royal chambers of Whitehall, but with far
more of pomp and show than he had as yet
witnessed
about the person of the independent leader.
Two or three officers, richly attired, waited in the
anterooms, and a page, sumptuously though not
gayly dressed, opened the door of his apartment to
the gallant baronet with deep and silent reverence.
The cordial warmth which Oliver exhibited would
in itself have called forth something of suspicion
from the mind of Sir Edgar; for, latterly, although
not absolutely estranged from each other, there
had been a passing coldness, a want of frank and
cheerful confidence between them, which caused
the present alteration of the general's air and
manner
to be very obvious. But, to confirm his fears,
after a short discourse on various matters
connected
with state policy and questions of the day
You have not heard, I trow, Sir Edgar,
Cromwell
began abruptly, after a little pause, you have
not heard of the new trust the parliament hath now
of late conferred on me?even the Lord
Lieutenancy
of Ireland, with command of the forces
needful to crush the embers of this accursed
rebellion
that yet devours the land!
I have not, answered Ardenne. Have you
accepted it?
Surely I have, returned the general; for,
of a truth, the commons' house, ay! and the
councit
of state also, were very urgent! yea! unto the
taking no denial! for, at the first, I would have
fain denied it. Truly my soul is sick of war and
tumult, and would retire to the privacy of humble
and domestic life. But, as I say, they would take
no denial! and, moreover, after a while, diligently
searching the Lord's will, praying myself with
earnest zeal, and profiting, too, by the prayers of
better men, I have been convinced that my
repugnance
to this duty was not of the Lordbut a
back-sliding
rather, and a fainting of the flesh; a
yielding
to the vain temptations of the world and the
devil! It is not for me to draw my hand from off
the handle of the plough, when
He
hath manifestly
fixed on me the task of turning up the hard and
stubborn glebe.
A powerful army, doubtless, is assigned to
you, said Ardenne, half musing, half inquiring.
Doubtless! Twelve thousand horse and foot
the picked men of the host, that hath so
gloriously
worked out the freedom of the landthe
regiments and their commanders subject to my
own choice! One hundred thousand pounds of
sterling silver in the military chest, and all things
corresponding! Verily, by the Lord's help, soon
shall we have peace as settled in the wildest bog of
Ireland as in the heart of London!
It is a great trust! Ardenne again answered,
coldly, the
greatest
for a subject! When set
you forth?
Speedily, Cromwell replied, right speedily!
but, ere I go, I have yet one thing to perform
the parliament, as not content with these high
honours
it hath done me, commands me to appoint all
the chief officers. The master of the horse is a high
postimportant, onerous, and of great weight!
Now, Edgar Ardenne, though we have differed
somewhat lately, I do know you able, valiant,
honest, and trustysuch are the attributes
needful
for this great officego with meit is yours!
I thank you, Edgar replied, perfectly
unmoved
.
Think me not ignorant of the honour,
nor yet ungrateful when I decline that honour. In
truth, I am sick of bloodblood of my
countrymen
!
I would to God no drop of it had been shed
here in Englandfor I do fear me very much it
hath been shed in vain.
Oliver was evidently discomposed; he rose
abruptly
,
and took many turns about the room,
muttering
to himself; then, stopping suddenlyMark
me! he said. I love you, Edgar Ardenne, I have
loved you ever!yea, since that first night when
we met nigh RoystenI have felt ever that in you
there is an honesty different from that of men.
You preach not, neither do you pray much in
public
,
yet I do well believe you have more true
religion
than half the saints of the land. You can
fight, too, with the foremostand counsel better
than the wisest! You must go with me! you
must strike on my side! Surely the Lord shall
yet do greater things for this regenerate land than
he hath done alreadythough wondrous are his
works and great his loving-kindness  and it is
graven in my heart within me, that by me shall
he do them!although I be but a rough
instrument
,
a blunt and edgeless tool, for his omnipotent
right hand! Go with me, now, go with meand
I say not that I will make you greatfor, of a
truth, it is not for a grovelling worm upon the
earth to speak of
making
earthworms great!
creation is the Lord's, and the Lord's only!but I
do say that my fortunes shall be thy fortunes also!
and my hopes thine! Lo! you, I have a
daughter
one
yet a maidcomely, too, in the flesh
discreet
,
and virtuous, and sageeven my youngest
Frances! Again! I say not that I will give
her to thee in the bonds of wedlock; for, truly,
hearts cannot be given and transferred like golden
dressneither do I esteem it wise or lawful for
a parent to do any force to those most strong and
inward inclinations! But this I will sayfor it is
a truth, I do profess to you, a very truth!that I
believe the maid hath looked not hitherto on any
man to love himand that, rather than any man on
earth, would I see thee my son-in-law! Thine own
high qualities, so that the Lord look down upon
this work, will do the rest! Give me thine hand;
say that thou wilt go with me! surely thou shalt
be next in power unto myselfnext in the glory
of the deeds we shall accomplish in the Lord's
qause and England's. Thou shalt see yet, and
share in very mighty changes
I were dishonest, Sir Edgar interrupted him,
with vehemence, I were dishonest! a base traitor
to my cause, my conscience, and my country, did
I pretend to doubt your meaning! I read you,
sir, I read
you
as you were an open book before
mebut
me
you know not, nor can comprehend
at all! Neithergreat as you are, and greater as
you wish to becan you tempt me one inch from
the straight path! My heart, General Cromwell,
is in the grave!in the grave with that peerless
woman who once, at your hands, saved me from a
father's madness! Notnot to be a queen'san
angel's
husband, would I forego the memory of her
on earththe hope of her in Heaven! As for
what you call greatness, I care not for itnay, I
do loathe it!for it is villanydishonourshame!
Farewell! I leave you, sir, in sorrowin strong
and bitter sorrow! Fairly I tell you to your face.
I do suspect you very deeplyand if it be as I
suspect, I will oppose you to the death! Pause!
pauseand oh! consider!it is a little thing to be
a king!a tyrant!a usurper! It is the
mightiest
of all things to have the power to be so, and
the virtue to decline that power! Be, as you may,
your country's friend, its guardian, and its father!
Beware! I say, beware how you attempt to be its
ruler! Better is a pure conscience than a golden
bawble! He who cannot err hath said, `What
shall it avail a man to gain the whole world and
lose his own soul!' You say you love meI did
once lovehonouresteemay! venerate you
you, Oliver Cromwell! and rather would I hew off
the best limb of my body than see you play the part
which I do fear you meditate! Answer me not,
sir! no profession can convince me. Actions
actions
,
siractions only can prove to me your truth.
Sincerely I pray God that I may be in error
sincerely I pray God you may be strengthened
to cast temptation far behind youto be the great,
the glorious, the immortal benefactor of your land,
you may be if you will! Go, then, to Irelandgo
do
your
duty; I will adhere to mine. My sword
is in its scabbard, never to come forth more unless
my country shall require it against a foreign foe!
ora domestic tyrant! Farewell! may Heaven
give you strengthfarewell!
Do we part friends? asked Oliver, whose
strong nerves were greatly shaken, and whose
mind, wholly impassable at ordinary moments to
such feelings, was penetrated by a sense of
absolute
humiliation, and overpowered by the sublime
and genuine force of real virtue; do we part
friends?
And shall, I trust,
meet
friends! Edgar
replied
,
clasping his hand with fervour, while a tear
stood in his dark eye. You have no truer friend!
no more sincere admirerbe but yourself
within
the four seas that gird Britain! May Heaven
protect you, and preserve youas I have thought
youas I would think you evernoble!
Again he grasped his hand, wrung it hard,
turned
,
and left the room.
Can it be so? cried Cromwell, in a low
thoughtful tone, can it be so?and hath he read
my inward soulread it more truly than myself?
He strode across the room with a loud step and a
kingly port. Not kingbut the first man in
England! Ha! but again his proud glance sank,
his firm step faltered, and he struck his bosom
with the eager violence of passionate repentance.
Avaunt!avaunt!get thee behind me!no!
no! he erred!he erred!yet had he wellnigh
made me deem myself a villain! `Not king, but
the first man in England!' Well, first in virtue!
first in sincere god-seeking piety!first, it may
be, in good reportwhich men call fame!in the
Lord's favour, and the people's love! But not
not first in power, or wealth, or rank! Not first, as
that bold Ardenne said, in villany! No! no!
he
erred, and
I
am sound at heartmy breast is proof
to thy devices! Avaunt, thou crafty devil! I am
strongstrongstrong in virtue!
He saw not Ardenne any more for many a year
of peril and successof labour and of sinand of
the world's arch phantomglory! But six days
afterward Edgar beheld
him
, seated in his coach
of state, dragged by six stately horses, tossing their
plumed heads and shaking their superb caparisons
as proudly as though they were conscious of the
freight they drew along the crowded streets. He
marked the quiet air of exultation and of triumph
that sat on his firm lip and glanced from his deep
eye! He noted the unwonted splendour!the
gorgeous dresses and accoutrements of his
lifeguard
eighty
young men  majors and colonels
of the army, mounted more splendidly than the
pretorian band of any king in Europe; sheathed in
bright steel, with waving plumes, and floating
scarfs, and all the bravery of the cavaliers! He
saw the haughty bearing of his son Henryhis
lieutenant and master of the horse!he saw the
soldiery, in their magnificent array, trooping along,
with their proud banners flaunting in the summer
sunshine, and the triumphant clangour of their
military music waking the merriest echoes behind
their adored leader!and, above all, he heard the
thundering acclamations of the multitude as that
pomp swept along!and, with a heavy sigh, he
turned from that sight in all other eyes so glorious
and majestica sigh for Cromwell's fame!a sigh
for England's peace!
CROMWELL.
BOOK IV.
Now could I, Casca,
Name to thee a man most like this night,
That thunders, lightens, opens graves, and roars
As doth the lion in the Capitol;
A man no mightier than thyself, or me.
In personal action; yet prodigious grown,
And fearful, as these strange eruptions are.
Casca
. 'Tis Csar that you mean: is it not, Cassius?
Shakspeare
Julius Csar
,
CHAPTER I.
And Dunbar field resounds thy praises loud.
Milton's
Sonnets
.
The stubborn spearmen still made good
Their dark impenetrable wood,
Each stepping where his comrade stood,
The instant that he fell.
No thought was there of dastard flight;
Linked in the serried phalanx tight,
Groom fought like noble, squire like knight,
As fearlessly and well.
Marmion
.
Once
more upon the charger's back! once more
among the trumpets!
A year had passed since Cromwell, invested
with his new dignity of lord-lieutenant, landed
in Dublin Baya year  during the course of
which his arms, attended everywhere by victory,
and edged by deadly vengeance, had swept like
a tornado over devoted Ireland. Her strongest
holds were levelled to the dust, piles of
fire-blackened
stones quenched with the life-blood of
their massacred defendants. It was a year of
merciless destruction  of unsparing,
indiscriminating
slaughtera year which cast a deep stain
on the name of Cromwell, never before attainted
by the dark charge of crueltya year the miseries
of which were such that they have branded that
name on the memories of the Irish with such
imperishable
hate, that, even to this day, their direst
malediction is, the curse of Cromwell be upon
you. From his career of victory and havoc
Oliver was recalled, in the earlier months of '50,
to return to England and oppose the Prince of
Wales, who, having landed in the north, had been
proclaimed and crowned the King of Scots, and,
at the head of a large army, was preparing to
assert his rights. With his accustomed energy,
he instantly appointed Ireton his lord deputy and
Ludlow his lieutenant of the horse, delegating all
his powers to them, and leaving them to finish
what he had so effectually set in motion; and in a
very short space was in London to receive the
parliament's instructions. Here he was welcomed
with the highest honours and rewards; and, after
some delay, owing to the refusal of Lord Fairfax,
who was himself of that persuasion, to command
against the Scottish Presbyteriansa refusal which,
with much urgency, and, it would seem, with real
and unfeigned sincerity, Oliver strove to combat
set forth, invested with the supreme command of
the land forces of the parliament, to crush, as was
expected, at a single blow, the power of the
Scottish
royalists, and lead the second Charles in
triumph
to the footstool of the proud republicans, or
to expel him from the kingdom of his fathers a
despairing fagitive.
In this their overweening confidence, however,
the English government were for a time
disappointed
;
for, having crossed the Tweed, and
advanced
almost to the walls of Edinburgh before
the last days of July, their general was so far from
gaining any real or definitive advantage, that, after
two or three smartly-contested skirmishes, and
much manuvring against the veteran Lesley, who
resolutely declined a general action, he was
compelled
,
R 2
by want of forage and provisions, to reship
five hundred of his men from Musselburgh for
Berwick, and with the remnantdescribed by one
of his best officers as a poor, shattered, hungry
and discouraged armyto fall back in some
confusion
on Dunbar, where he might be supported by
his fleet and storeships. Having been pressed so
closely by the Scottish horse on his retreat from
Musselburgh to Haddington that he was at one
time in much dangerhis rear-guard, which had
been outstripped by the centre and advance, being
exposed for a short time to the chance of an attack
from the whole power of the Scotsby favour of a
misty night he arrived within a few miles of
Dunbar
late in the evening of the first day of
September
.
On the morning of the second, Oliver's army
lying in a low swampy plain, with an exhausted
country in their rear, a mountainous ridge held by
a superior force in front, a stormy and tempestuous
sea upon their right, and the weather such as to
prevent any communication with the fleet, scarce
any situation can be fancied more desperate and
appalling
than that of the invaders. Throughout that
morning he saw the host of Lesley holding the hill
with resolute determination, in a position of such
formidable strength that he himself has mentioned
it as one wherein `ten men were better to hinder
than a hundred to make way.' Below this hill was
a small narrow plain, running down on the right
hand to the sea, between the ridge then occupied
by Lesley and a deep cleugh or dell, through
which a rapid and impetuous stream found its way
to the German Ocean, into which it falls at
Broxmouth
Park. But, toward evening, he perceived a
movement in the hostile lines, and, shortly
afterward
,
a mighty shout rang on his ears.
Immediately
he leaped upon his horse, and, galloping forth
with a handful of his chosen guard, rode to the
brink of the ravine, from which he might behold
the Scottish ranks pouring tumultuously down from
their commanding station into that narrow strip
whereon their very numbers would but operate
against themselves, vociferously calling on their
officers to lead them down to Ramoth Gilead
that they might slay the foeeven the
blasphemous
accursed Philistine! For a while he gazed
steadily upon them without speaking; and, by the
curl upon his lip, and the deep sneer of his
expressive
nostril, many of those around him fancied that
he saw and detected some deep purpose in the
hostile movement; but when band after band came
rushing down, column on column of dark
pikemen
brigade
after brigade of gunsand, finally,
the horse and the reserve, with Scotland's royal
banner
,
shouting, The sword of the Lord and of
Gideon
their
favourite war-crythe gloom which
had sat upon his brow for many days passed
suddenly
and was succeeded by a wild gleam of joy.
The Lord, he cried, flinging his arm aloft, and
giving the spur to his charger till he plunged and
bolted from the earththe Lord of Hostshe
hath delivered them into mine hands! andwhile
the numbers of the Scottish, vastly superior to his
own, and ten times more than could be marshalled
fittingly upon that battle-ground, were drawing up,
as best they might, their crowded and disordered
ranks where they had neither room to fight, nor
any way by which to fly if routedhe coolly
reconnoitred
the ravine, passable only at one point, and
that, though pervious even to artillery, a rugged ford,
between steep banks, shadowed with timber-trees,
and domineered by earthy mounds scarped naturally
by the wintry floods. Having determined
instantly
,
in his own mind, on an attack
en masse
upon the
morrow, he ordered an advanced guard of horse and
foot to occupy this all-important stationselected
nine of his best regiments to force the passage at the
earliest dawn of dayand then, announcing his
design
to his assembled officers in council, and
ordering
all things to be in preparation for the attack
with the first glimmering of the east, threw
himself
down on his camp bed without removing any
part of his attire, and slept so soundly that his
attendants
had no easy task to rouse him from his
dreamless and untroubled slumbers when the
appointed
hour had arrived. Ere he was in the
saddle
day had dawned fully; and then, having relied
on Lambert for the due execution of the orders on
which his plan depended, he galloped to the front,
expecting to find all in readiness, and wondering
that his artillery was not yet heard, covering the
passage of his troops. He reached the advanced
lines, and all was in confusion. During the night,
Lesley, aware of the importance of that point, had
utterly cut off the guard detached for the defence
of the ravineso utterly, indeed, that not a soldier
had escaped to bear the tidings of defeat to his
superiors
and
occupied it with a force equal at least
to that which Cromwell had appointed to oppose
him. The sky was gray already, but the
approach
of morning was delayed, or, at the least,
obscured by a thick mist arising from the seaboard,
and spreading over the flat land on which both
armies had slept upon their weapons in grim
preparation
for the coming strife. A powerful
horse-regiment
,
which had been chosen to advance the
foremost, was in the very act of passingsome
having crossed the stream, and now laboriously
struggling up the banks on the Scotch side, and
the rest even now battling with the heavy current,
when a tremendous fire of musketry and ordnance
was poured upon them while in confusion; and
when, despite this fearful obstacle, they forced the
pass, they were charged instantly, and thrown into
disorder by a brigade of cuirassiers appointed for
this duty by the veteran Lesley. While they were
fighting with a desperate obstinacy, that, had they
been relieved or re-enforced, would even yet have
rendered them victorious, the infantry, who, in
advancing
to support them, had suffered terribly by
the well-served artillery of the Presbyterians, were
in their turn charged, broken, and pushed back
across the clough by the pike-regiments, which
then, as in all former periods, composed the pride
and strength of the Scotch host. Just at this
moment
Cromwell reached a small eminence that
overlooked the scenehe saw his scheme
well-nigh
frustrated; one of his best brigades of horse
almost annihilatedhis infantry repulsedhis
attack
not merely disappointed, but on the very point
of being turned against himselfand all this time
Lambert, his major-general, had not brought up a
single gun, much less attempted to assist the
charge or cover the retreat of his defeated
squadrons
.
A dark red flush rose to his cheek, his
brow!his eye flashed lurid fireas he dashed
up to the artillerists, fiercely commanding them,
with a voice tremulous and hoarse from ireTo
shoot sharply and upon the instant, or, as the Lord
Jehovah liveth, ye shall swing from these oaks ere
the sun rises. Awed by his threats and
stimulated
by his presence, they struggled nobly to
redeem
their errorgun after gun belched forth its
cloud of smoke and flame, and the shot plunged,
with accurate aim and awful execution, into the
serried masses of the Scotch, enabling the
discomfited
and shattered cavalry to draw off and
repass
the stream. Ride for your life, cried
Oliver
to one, the nearest, of his staff, and bring up
my pike-regimentmine own, I sayunder the
trusty Goff! and Jepherson's horse-squadrons, and
Lumley's musketeers! Rideride, I tell thee, on
the spur! And thou, he added, away to
Lambert
,
Kingsland; let him bring up more gunsmore
guns! and, too impatient to await the execution
of his orders in quiet inactivity, he galloped
furiously
,
attended only by a slender staff and
captain's
guard of cuirassiers, down to the steep banks
of the ford. There he stood, coolly gazing on the
advancing ranks of Lesley, a mark for the
artillery
,
and even for the small arms of the Scottish;
the balls from which shivered the trees and tore
the ground about him, but harmed not, strange to
say, either himself or any of the little group
behind
.
It was, indeed, a critical conjuncturea
stout division of field-guns was whirled up, at the
speed of powerful and active horses, to the brink
opposite the very spot where Cromwell stood!
and now they were unlimbered!and now, with
matches lighted, the cannoneers were busily
engaged
directing them toward him! Then, from
the dark and wooded gorge beneath, a prolonged
flourish of their trumpets announced the presence
of the enemy; who now, the independents having
been forced back bodily from their position, were
crowding down, in numbers almost irresistible, in
their turn to attempt the passage. The eye of
Cromwell for the first time grew anxious, and his
lip quivered visibly, as with the blast the heavy
tramp of the advancing pikemen was heard above
the ripple of the water, and the bright heads of
their long weapons were seen glimmering above
the mistwreaths which partially obscured the ranks
that bore them. A mounted officer dashed up to
him, spoke a few hurried words, and, ere the
gloom had cleared from Cromwell's brow, the
steady march of his own regiment fell joyously
upon his ear! They halted, as the heads of their
long files came up, abreast of their commander;
while, with their matches ready lighted, six
hundred
musketeers, under the gallant Lumley,
hastened
to line the hither verge, availing themselves
of every crag or stunted bush whereby to hide
themselves, and whence to pour their unseen
volleys
on the host below. With a few words, fiery,
and terse, and full of that enthusiastic confidence
which had so wonderfully gained the hearts of all
that followed him, Oliver now addressed his chosen
veterans. In deep, and, as it might seem, sullen
silence, they attended while he spoke; but, as he
ended, such a shout arose as startled Lesley's host
and roused them from their dreams of victory.
Oliver! Oliver! hurrah! and, with the words,
they rushed down headlong on the spears of the
advancing foe, shouting their cryThe Lord!
the Lord of Hosts! Meanwhile the musketry
of Lumley was not silent!bright, bright, and
quick it flashed from every gray stone  every
bracken bushand every tuft of broom that fringed
those broken banks!and, to increase the din, ten
guns, which Lambert, wakened at length to energy,
wheeled up at the full gallop, opened their fire upon
the feebler ordnance of the Scottish, killing the
cannoneers
,
dismounting their light pieces, and
silencing
,
after a single ill-directed volley, their fruitless
effort. Taken thus absolutely by surprise, the
Presbyterian squadrons reeled in their turnand
louder from the depths of the ravine arose that
awful shout, The Lord! the Lord of Hosts! as,
through the waters, whose dark currentdark with
human goreflowed feebly now, choked and
obstructed
with the bodies of the dead and dying, that
irresistible and never-conquered band charged
onward
,
bearing the felics of the enemy before them,
with shrick, and yell, and execration, up! up! at
the pike's point! up to the level ground whence,
flushed with hope of easy triumph, they had but
now descendedand still the well-aimed shot of
Lumley's skirmishers fell thick among the flyers.
With half a glance Cromwell perceivedand with
him to perceive was instantly to profit by the
moment
of advantage. Putting himself at the head
of Jepherson's brigade of ironsides, which came up
at a rapid trot just as Goff's pikemen were
appearing
on the farther brow, brandishing high in air his
formidable rapier, and pointing with a grim smile
to the strife raging and reeling opposite, he spurred
his charger down the bank! Two bounds bore
him across the chasm, and, with a louder clang of
corslet, spur, and scabbard than had resounded yet
that day, down rushed those zealot horsemen!
The morning hitherto had been dull, gloomy,
and dispiriting; but, as the leader of the ironsides
spurred his black charger up the steep ascent, and
paused an instant therea breathing statue, bolder,
and nobler, and more massively majestic than any
sculpture from the inspired chisel of the Greek!
contemplating the features of the already
half-gained
battlefor from their right wing to their
centre the whole army of the covenanters, crowded
together and unable to manuvre, was reeling to
and fro in most tumultuous disarrayjust at that
instant the mist bodily soared upward, and the
broad glorious sunlight streamed out rejoicingly,
kindling up all the field of battle and the rich
valley
to the right, and the superb expanse of the wide
German Ocean, now calm and cradling on its azure
bosom the friendly vessels of the commonwealth,
that loomed like floating castles through the
dispersing
fog. It was a wonderfula spirit-stirring
changeand he who witnessed its effects the first,
inspired by the sublimity of what he looked upon,
struck by a thought no less sublime, cried out,
flinging his arm aloft in proud anticipation of his
coming triumphLet God arise, and let his
enemies
be scattered! The aspect of the man,
rising
,
as it were, suddenly from out the bowels of the
earththe stern composure of his haltthe
simultaneous
outburst of the sunbeamsand, above
all, the wonderful quotation, delivered in a voice
so loud as to be heard by hundreds of both hosts,
and yet so passionless and clear as to strike every
heart with something of that awe which would
attach
to aught miraculouscompleted what the
ordinary
means of warfare had so well commenced.
Their broadswords flashing in the newly-risen
beams, and their united voices pealing forth, as it
were by inspiration, the apt words of their leader,
the ironsides swept onward to the charge!and,
without pause or hesitation, catching enthusiasm
from the cries of those who went beforeregiment
after regiment of the invaders poured unopposed
over the perilous chasm; and, forming as they
reached the level ground, plunged in with shot of
arquebuss and push of pike upon the wavering
masses, that could now offer only an inert
resistance
to their impetuous onset.
For a short time the native valour of the Scots
supported them after their flank was turned, and
their whole line confused and shaken beyond all
hope of restoration!for a short time they stood
firm with their serried spearsshoulder to
shoulder
foot
to foot-when one man fell, another
stepping
instantly into his placeand only ceasing to
resist when all had ceased to live. But, charged
front, flank, and rear, by horse and foot, pell-mell,
Vol. II.S
the cannon-shot making huge gaps in their dense
columns, it was impossible that they, or any,
should hold out. They brokethey scattered
they retreated not, but fledin wild and
irretrievable
dismaypursued, cut down, and slaughtered
by the fresh cavalry of Cromwell, who for eight
miles had execution of the flyers!while the
triumphant
general, calling a halt when he perceived
the battle won, sang, with his zealot legions
swelling
the stormy chorus, the hundred and
seventeenth
Psalm, in honour of that Lord who, as he
said, after the first repulse, had given up his
enemies
as stubble to the strong arms and the
victorious
weapons of his own elected people.
CHAPTER II.
And Worcester's laureate wreath.
Milton's
Sonnets
.
No blame be to you, sir; for all was lost.
* * * The king himself
Of his wings destitute, the army broken,
And but the backs of Britons seen, all flying
Through a strait lane; the enemy full-hearted,
Lolling the tongue with slaughtering.
Cymbeline
.
For
several months after the battle of Dunbar
both parties rested in comparative inaction.
Edinburgh
castle, after a brief siege, was surrendered
by Dundas, without, indeed, if the assertions of the
royalists are to be credited, any sufficient reason.
During the winter Oliver remained in the
metropolis
of Scotland, engaged, for the most part, in
disputations
with the Presbyterian clergy, who hated
him with bitter and incessant rancour; and here
he was attacked by a sharp fit of ague, threatening
to undermine his constitution, and actually
reducing
him so low that it was early in July before
he was prepared to take the field. Meanwhile,
Charles had been crowned at Perth, on the first
day of January, '51, King of Great Britain, France,
and Ireland, most of the nobles being present in
their robes of state and coronetshad sworn both
to the National Covenant and to the League
and Covenanthad levied a strong army under
command of the stout veteran Lesleyand had
taken post, meaning to act on the defensive, on
strong ground in the neighbourhood of Torwood.
Here for some days the hostile armies faced each
other, manuvring to gain, if possible, advantages
that might ensure successOliver continually
desiring
,
Lesley as obstinately shunning, any contact
that might lead to a general action. Skirmishes
occurred almost every day between the cavalry
and outposts  but none of much importance,
whether from loss sustained or permanent results
on the campaign; till, at last, wearied by a game in
which he had sagacity to see that he in the long
run must be the loser, Cromwell transported his
whole army into Fife, besieging and in two days
making himself the master of the town of Perth.
His object in this bold manuvre was to draw
down the Scottish army from its ground of
vantage
,
and in this he succeeded fully, though not,
perhaps, exactly in the manner he had
contemplated
;
for, breaking up his camp at Torwood on
the thirty-first, Charles turned his face toward the
border, loading some twelve or fourteen thousand
men, with the intent of concentrating his powers at
Carlisle, where he expected to be re-enforced by
a great rising of the royalists
en masse
from all the
northern counties. The consternation throughout
England at the news of this advance was general
and excessivethe parliament were in extremity
of terror and suspicionBradshaw himself,
stout-hearted
as he was in public, privately owned his
fears, and more than half suspected the good faith
of Cromwell. Their terrors grew more and more
real daily, when it was told in London that the
cavaliers of Lancashire were gathering head under
Lord Derby, and the Presbyterians threatening to
make common cause with them under their
Major-general
Massey; and, in good sooth, had it not
been for the insane fanaticism of the Scottish
clergy
who,
with a fierce intolerance that ruined their
own cause, would suffer none to join the standard
of the king without subscribing to the covenant
the forces of the royalists would have been truly
formidable, and might have, not improbably,
succeeded
in restoring Charles to his ancestral throne.
But, happily for England, hundreds of gallant
cavaliers
and hundreds of stout-hearted English
Presbyterians
were refused the miserable boon of
sacrificing
life and fortune in behalf of the least
grateful
prince of an ungrateful line, because, forsooth,
they would not sacrifice the interests also of their
native land to the intolerant and selfish policy of
Scotland. Still, though his ranks swelled not as
rapidly as, under a more prudent system, they
would assuredly have done, Charles marched with
little opposition, and still less real loss, as far into
his southern kingdom as the fair town of
Worcester
.
Lilburne, indeed, with a small independent
party, surprised and utterly defeated, at Wigan-lane,
in Lancashire, three or four hundred gentlemen
commanded by the Earl of Derby; who, himself
desperately wounded, escaped with difficulty from
falling into the hands of his rude conquerors!
Lambert and Harrison attempted, with inferior
forces, to dispute the passage of the Mersey with
the king; but, after a few ineffectual charges, and
offering Charles an opportunity of bringing on a
general action, were forced to draw off, and permit
the enemy to enter Worcester unmolested. Here
he was instantly proclaimed, amid the acclamations
of the mob and the good wishes, faint though
faithful
,
of the loyal gentlemen assembled in that city.
While tarrying here it became visible to Charles
and his advisers that succour came not in by any
means so rapidly as they had hoped; that the
Welsh cavaliers, who had been most severely
handled in their last insurrections, were not
disposed
to risk a general rising; and that there was
but little hope of any common or extensive
movement
of the royalists until some such advantage
should be gained as would, at least, be a
justification
to their daring. In this predicament it
was decided that they should await Cromwell's
arrival from the north, and give him battle there
beneath the walls of Worcester. Nor, indeed, had
they long to tarry; for, with his wonted energy of
mind and motion, that able leader had pursued the
footsteps of his enemy, so that, within a very few
days of the king's arrival, the various detachments
of the pursuing army concentrated on the Severn,
and on the twenty-eighth of August Oliver joined
in person, and found at his disposal not less than
thirty thousand soldiers of all arms, regular troops
and militia both enumerated. No sooner were the
hostile armies face to face than skirmishes, in
which there was much desperate fighting and much
loss on both sides, commenced and were continued
daily. Lambert, after a well-disputed contest,
carried
the bridge at Upton, and established his
position
,
Massey having been wounded so severely as
S 2
to be wellnigh hors de combat. The Scots, on the
first day of September, destroyed two bridges on
the Team about three miles from Worcester, and
the second was consumed in preparations for
reestablishing
the communication. Late on that
evening
Oliver dismounted from his charger at
headquarters
,
and issued his directions, brief, luminous,
and rapid, for the morrowwhich, he reminded his
high-spirited but superstitious officers, was his
peculiar
day of gloryA day whereon, from his
childhood, by the Lord's wondrous grace, up to
that present time, he never had attempted aught
but he had therefrom reaped a golden harvest.
Wherefore, he said, let us fall on more boldly
mindful of the last anniversary which saw the
glorious
blessing at Dunbarand putting trust in our
own stout right arms, and in the aid of that Lord
who is all in alltrusting, I say, that this shall
prove a final and decisive end to our laboursyea!
and a crowning mercy! Fleetwood was then
commanded to force the passage of the Team at
noon, when they supposed the cavaliers would have
abandoned any thoughts of a decisive action for
that day, while Cromwell should himself establish
a bridge of boats across the Severn at Bunshill.
The morning of the third broke gloriously and
bright. The independent forces were full of
ardour
for the onset, inflamed even beyond their
wont by the prophetic exhortations of their leader,
who, himself kindling like a warhorse to the
trumpets
,
proclaimed to them, no longer darkly nor in
doubtful hints, but in wild glowing eloquence, that
they should now ride forth to glory!that their
right hands should teach them terrible thingsthat
they should smite the sons of Zeruiah utterly, and
suffer not a man of them to live. At the appointed
hour Fleetwood attacked in force, and, after a most
furious cannonade, carried the passage of the
Team, and was already strengthening his position,
when Charles, alarmed by the incessant firing,
despatched strong re-enforcements to support his
friends, with orders at all hazards to prevent a
bridge from being formed. Again the action
became
hot and doubtfuland now the independents
were forced back, although fighting foot by foot,
before the masses of the royalists; but just when
these imagined their success decisive, Fleetwood
in turn was re-enforced, and, acting with a fiery
daring, that was well seconded by his stout
veterans
,
charged instantly along his whole line, and
repulsed the Scots. Those sturdy troops,
however
,
rallied instantly, thus hoping to afford their
countrymen a chance of breaking Cromwell's
regiments
on the other side of the Severn. The
ground on which they fought, though for the most
part level, was intersected everywhere by thick
strong fences of old thorn, with banks and ditches;
and each of these positions was lined with
musketry
,
and was defended with an obstinate and
dogged courage that cost the independents
hundreds
on hundreds of their bravest soldiers. One
by one they were forced, however, at the pike's
point; and still, as Fleetwood's men advanced, the
Scotch pike-regiments rushed on, charging with
more of spirit than they had displayed throughout
the whole course of the war; and still, when forced
to give way, leisurely and in perfect order falling
back to the next fence, which was by this time
glancing with the sharp volleys of their
musketeers
.
But, notwithstanding all their efforts, ere
nightfall they were driven from their every line
with unexampled lossbeaten at every pointand
forced to seek for refuge in the walls of
Worcester
.
On the other side the river the battle raged
with equal fury and almost equal doubtfulness
during
five hours at the least. Cromwell, who had,
from a flying battery of heavy guns, commenced a
cannonade upon the fort built to defend the main
gate of the town, and brought up all his forces in
two lines to assault the place, was charged at all
points by a general sally of the whole infantry of
the king's army, who, issuing simultaneously from
several gates, firing and cheering till the welkin
rang as they came on, burst on the newly-levied
regiments and the militia with such enthusiastic
valour, that they drove them back in absolute
confusion
,
took Cromwell's battering guns, and turned
them with effect on his disordered squadrons. But
at this juncture Charles was unequal to the great
part which he had to play; had he brought out his
cavalry, and charged again while the militia of the
independents were forced pell-mell into the ranks
of the reserve, he hardly could have failed of
gaining
a complete victory. But his horse, save one
squadron, were within the cityhe saw his error
when it was too late, for the keen eye of
Cromwell
saw it likewise, and gave him not a second's
space even to struggle to redeem it. Leading his
cavalryhis own invinciblesat a quick trot, in
squadrons, through the intervals of the defeated
regiments, he set up one of his triumphant hymns,
and, sweeping on like a springtide, with full five
thousand horse, he beat the victors backregained
the cannon, sabring the artillerists over their guns
--and, while his cavalry reformed, brought up the
whole of his reservethe conquerors of Marston,
Naseby, and Dunbarcolumn on columnwith a
succession of tremendous charges that no troops
then in the world could have resisted! Scarce
had his musketry and pikemen shattered the
Scottish
masses ere he again came thundering down
on them with his unrivalled horse. And back!
back! they were borne, hopelessly, irretrievably
defeated. Still they had steadiness enough to
retreat
corps by corps, facing and firing till all were
within the walls who had the power to crawl into
that too precarious place of refuge. The last
beams of the setting sun glanced red and lurid on
the weapons of the last band that filed into the
gatesa feeble cheer arose! and then a heavy
cannonade ensued from the whole line of
battlements
,
compelling Oliver to draw his forces off for
a short space of relaxation and repose. Short
space it was, however; for twilight was yet
lingering
upon that fatal plain when Cromwell's
trumpets
summoned the fortress to surrender. The
summons was refused, and instantly a dozen
rockets
rushed up to the darkening skythe batteries
opened for ten minutes space more furiously than
everand then, with Cromwell personally leading
them on sword in hand, with an apalling shout,
the forlorn hope rushed forwardwith ladders, and
fascines, and boarding-axe, and pike, and every
instrument most fearfully destructive, they hurried
to the walls, which now, from every porthole,
battlement
,
and embrasure, poured forth the ringing
volleys of the ordnance. Scarcely ten minutes
passed, however, before the cannon again ceased
and the loud roar of thousands, blent with the
maddened
shrieks of women, and all the horrid noises
of a captured city, announced that all was over.
The gates were instantly thrown open, and in
poured the furious zealots; throughout the livelong
night the din, and rage, and agony, and sacrilege
continued; full fifteen hundred men were
slaughtered
in the streets; the thoroughfares were choked
with corpses, the kennels ran knee-deep with
human
gore.
The morning of the fourth arose, like that of
the preceding day, serene and glorious. The
massacre
was checked, peace was restored, and, at
the least, comparative tranquillity; the king was
a despairing fugitive, with scarce a hope
remaining
even of personal escape; his army was
annihilated
his
party was no more  his friends
slaughtered or hopeless captives  his kingdom
numbered, weighed, divided, and apportioned!
and with a steady countenance, lighted by no fiery
exultation, the winner returned praises to the
Giver
of all goodness for this HIS CROWNING MERCY!
CHAPTER III.
Thou, who with thy frown
Annihilated senates.
Childe Horold
.
Can tyrants but by tyrants conquer'd be,
And freedom find no champion and no child
Such as Columbia saw arise, when she
Sprung forth a Pallas, armed and undefiled?
Ibid.
By
that one blow the empire of the parliament
was confirmed through every corner of Great
Britain
the
last hope of the Stuarts was in the dust,
never, as it seemed, more to riseand he, the
conqueror, was received in the metropolis as no
scion of a royal stock had ever yet been greeted!
Congratulations, not of tongue-loyalty, but of
sincere
and grateful love, were showered upon him,
as he drove into London in a gorgeous carriage,
escorted by the speaker and the leading members
of the commonsthe mayor and sheriffs of the
cityand an enormous multitude of every age and
sex, who had gone out to Acton to show their
gratitude
and reverence to one whom many thought it
no flattery to term the father and the saviour of his
country. A lodging was assigned to him in the
late residence of England's monarch!a solemn
vote of thanks was tendered to him, all the
members
standing, when he resumed his seat!
petitions
,
couched in humbler language and decked
with loftier adulation than any sovereign since
Elizabeth had received from his subjects, were
sent up to him daily!his praises were hymned
forth by a lyre, whose melody shall never be
forgotten
while England's language lives upon the
earththe lyre of the immortal Milton! Although
no king, Cromwell was, truly, the first man in
England
.
Modestly, however, and decorously, and
without any symptom of disorganizing or
misproud
ambition, did he bear his high honours.
Wisdom and mercy marked his elevation in no
less degree than energy and valour signalized his
rise. His first act in the senate of the regenerated
land was to obtain the passing of a general
amnesty
in the behalf of all who had engaged in the
late war, with the exception only of some two or
three, so obstinately and incurably devoted to the
exiled family and hostile to the commonwealth,
that public safety rendered their public punishment
a measure not of cruelty or vengeance, but of
necessity
.
His next was to procure a vote for
taking
speedily into consideration the expediency of
fixing a time for their own dissolution. The period
named accordingly for the abdication of their
immense
,
and, thus far, well-exerted powers, was
the third day of November, 1654a distance of
three yearsa distance neither justified by any
rule or precedent of the constitution, nor anywise
desirable or necessarybut proving merely that
having, by their exertions in past time, put down
the tyranny established on the abuse of
prerogative
,
they were determined now to build another
on the more popular but scarce less perilous abuse
of privilege. Having originally met in the year
`40, they had already held the reins of government
for a far longer time than any former parliament
than would have been endured in times less
turbulent
than
was, in short, consistent with the
rules of sound and equitable policy. Having
originally
been composed of the best, the wisest, the
most independent men of England, they had been
gradually, but continually, reduced by death,
desertion
,
and proscription, to a mere knot of party
politicians, possessing nothing of a parliament
except
the name, desirous solely of their own
emolument
and power, and as entirely different from that
magnificent assembly which had resisted the first
Charles in all the terrors of his puissant
sovereigaty
,
as it is possible for one deliberative body
to be different from another. This, then, was the
house which now passed a vote securing to
themselves
the supreme power of the realm for three
more years at least, in absolute defiance to the
wishes of the people, of the army, and of the
wisest patriots of the kingdom. Scotland,
meantime
,
subdued completely by the arms of
Cromwell
,
wielded by Monk, his able deputy, was in
a state of orderly and calm tranquillity widely at
variance with the confused and hopeless anarchy
in which it had been plunged for centuries by the
fierce and continual rivalry of its dogmatic and
intolerant
sectarians. These had been now, at length,
by the wise energy of Oliver, compelled to endure
one another peacefully, and to forbear the angry
disputations that had incessantly convulsed the
country since the first era of the reformation.
Ireland
,
unhappy Ireland, desolated by the fierce
vengeance
of the independent conquerors, was
perforce
quiet; and England, united, free, and wealthy,
required only a short interval of time, under a firm
and liberal government, to recover from the
injuries
which intestine discord must bring upon a
state, how great soever may have been the
benefits
acquired by the means of the keen remedy,
which is to nations as amputation to the human
frame. Abroad, her navies rode the ocean in
triumphant
,
if not undisputed, mastery; baffling at
every fresh encounter, and subduing the brave and
dogged Hollanders, who had so lately ploughed the
narrow seas with brooms at their mastheads, as
though they would have swept their island foemen
from their path like worthless dust!bringing in
unresisted rich and gallant prizes of the volatile
and fiery Frenchman, who dared not, so had the
genius of the proud republic overcrowed the spirit
of that valiant nation, offer resistance to that
people
now, which they had set at naught while
governed
by a king!winning respect from the cold
and haughty Spaniard!making her fame as
universal
,
and her flag as widely known, as winds
could blow or billows bear!and justifying the
high boast of Oliver, which he had uttered years
before to Ardenne, while yet an undistinguished
member in the great council of the kingdom, that
the time should come wherein the quality of
Englishmen
should be as widely and as greatly
honoured
as ever was the name of antique Roman.
It was, then, evident that there was now no cause
of fear which should in any degree sanction the
continued
usurpation
, for such indeed it was, of
the parliamentarian party, who seemed at this time
to have again determined on trying the same line
Vol. II.T
of measures which had failed so signally before
the death of the first Charles. Yet the
commencement
of the year 1652 found them still
struggling to maintain the sway in absolute
despite
of their constituents. At this time
England
had been, for nearly four years, under the
nominal form of a republic. The merit of
successive
parliaments and unbiased representation was
on all sides acknowledged, yet was no step taken
or even contemplated toward the establishment of
such forms, or to the self-dissolution of the present
house. Month after month matters continued thus,
until another year had wellnigh joined its
predecessor
in that great catacomb  the past!the
country was dissatisfied!the army waxed
indignant
,
the rather so thatas before, in the year '49
foreseeing the determined opposition of the
soldiery
to their unlawful measures, the commons
once again began to agitate the subjects of
retrenchment
of expenses and the disbanding of one
half the standing forces. Thus things went on,
all prosperous abroad, all turbulent at home and
dubious, until the month of August in the second
year after the defeat of Worcester. At this time
the leaders of the army, which had now reached
the very winter of their discontent, presented a
petition of the host, by means of a deputation of
six officers, the devoted friends of Cromwell, the
boldest and most uncompromising favourers of
universal
freedom in elections and universal
toleration
papistry
alone excludedin religious
matters
.
A council had been held some days before
at Lenthall's house of all the most important
personages
of the land, civil and military; whereat it
was debated gravely, whether it would be better
to perpetuate the commonwealth on terms to be
fixed now immutably, or to establish once again
the government as vested in a limited mixed
monarchy
.
The officers in general were adverse to all
form of royalty, as holding the name king, alone
and in itself, subversive of true freedom! The
lawyers, on the other hand, with the sage
Whitelocke
at their head, maintained that the
time-honoured
constitution of the land, as comprehending
commons, lords, and king, was suited better, both
for stability and safety to the feelings and the
principles
of Englishmen, than a new form of
democratic
sway. Cromwell, during this council as
before
,
held himself much aloof; but, at the last,
when urged for his opinion, admitted that he, so
far as he had thought upon so grave and onerous
a question, inclined his judgment rather to the last
expressed position, could it be any wise decided
what person might be called advisedly to fill the
vacant throne; since, of a truth, he thought not any
of the idolatrous and heaven-condemned scions of
the late man admissible to dwell amongmuch
less to governthis regenerate and
freedom-seeking
people.
By some most underhanded means the tidings
of this meeting, and the opinions held therein, were
treasonably carried to the parliament, and they
proceeded instantly to force a bill for their own
dissolution through the house, encumbered with
provisions wholly at variance with the freedom of
election, and obnoxious to the great bulk of the
people. It was in vain that Harrison conjured
them, with most moving eloquence, to pause in
their career of reckless and unprincipled ambition!
it was in vain!they were that instant on the
point of voting that a new election should be
holden
for four fifths of the members of the commons,
the one fifth remaining to hold their seats for a yet
farther time, and to possess the right of
sanctioning
or disallowing the admission of the
newly-chosen
delegates, as they might deem them honest
and worthy vessels, or unsuited to the work in hand.
At a late hour Oliver, who was waiting at
White-hall
in his own private chambers, was advertised
of these strange and unjust proceedings; and,
instantly
commanding a company of soldiers to
repair
to the house, entered and took his seat among
the members. He was more plainlynay, even
slovenly attired, than when he had appeared in
public at any time for several years. His dress
was of plain and coarse cloth, all blackdoublet,
and cloak, and hose! with stockings of gray
worsted
rolled up to his mid-thigh. While the debate
continued he sat immersed, apparently, in thought,
and listening most attentively to the opinions of the
different orators. The speaker at length rose, as
if to put the questionthen beckoning to
Harrison
,
who sat opposite him, he stood up calmly, and,
as that officer approached himNow is the
time! he said; now I must do it! and
forthwith
he put off his hat, and began speaking in a
mild tone, and more to the point than usual in his
harangues, expressing his disapprobation, although
moderately and in measured terms, of the motion
before the house. But gradually, as he kindled
with his subject, his speech became more
vehement
and fieryhis words rolled forth in one
unbroken
stream of bitter and severe invective,
scorching
and blighting as the electric flashhis
features
were inflamed and writhen with tremendous
passionhis eyes lightenedand his whole frame
expanded with a most perfect majesty of wrathful
indignation. He rebuked them for their
self-seeking
and profaneness!their oftentimes denial of
true justice!their oppression, their inordinate
and selfish love of power!their neglect of the
brave and honest army!their idolizing of the
lawyers!their trampling under foot the valiant
men who had bled for them in the field!their
tampering with the false and time-serving
Presbyterians
!
And for what, he cried, with loud and
vehement tones, for what all this? What but to
perpetuate your own ill-gotten powerto replenish
your own empty pursesempty through riot, and
debauchery, and bribery, and every kind of ill
which it befits not
you
to perpetrateand which it
were to
me
degrading even to mention or to think
of! But now, I say, he went on, stamping
fiercely
on the ground, your time hath come! The
Lord he hath disowned you! The God of
Abraham
,
and of Isaac, and of Jacob hath done with
you! He hath no need of you any more! Lo, he
hath judged you, and cast you forth, and chosen
fitter instruments to him, to execute that work in
which you have dishonoured him
Order! exclaimed one of the bolder of the
members; order! I rise to ordernever have I
yet heard any language so unparliamentary! so
insolent
!the
rather that it cometh from our own
servantone whom we have too fondly cherished
one whom, by raising to this unprecedented and
undue elevation, we have endued with the daring
and the power thus to brave us!
For a few moments Cromwell glared on the
bold speaker, as though astonishment at the excess
of his audacity had robbed him of the faculty of
speechthen casting his hat on his disordered
locks, he pulled it doggedly down upon his brows,
and with a stamp that made the whole house echo,
advancing on the gentleman who was yet
speaking
Come,
sir, he said, in a low hissing voice
through his set teeth, griping the while his
dagger's
hilt as though he would have stabbed him on
T 2
the spot, come, come, sir, I will put an end to
your loud prating! then turning his back suddenly
on him whom he addressed, he paced to and fro
the hall, his whole face black with the blood which
rushed to it as violently as though it would have
burst from every pore and veinhis broad breast
panting and heaving with emotionand his entire
aspect displaying the most ungovernable and
tremendous
passionsYou are no parliament, I
say, he shouted at the pitch of his stentorian voice
you are no parliament! Ho! bring them in!
without there!bring them in! There was a
sudden pause  a moment of unutterable terror!
for such was the expression painted upon the faces
of the craven members of the long parliament.
When, years before, a king had dared to violate, in
a far less degree, the privileges of that high
assemblage
,
their own undaunted valour, fired by a sense
of righta proud uncompromising feeling of their
own inborn worthhad wellnigh armed those
patriots
for
such
they
wereto battle with such
weapons as chance afforded them against the
licensed
cut-throats of the sovereignbut, as the
door flew open, and Colonel Worseley entered
with a guard of twenty musketeers, blank and base
apprehension sat on the pallid brows of three
fourths of those present; nor did one man of the
whole number offer to make the least resistance,
to draw a sword, to raise a hand, or even to
exchange
a look with the strange person who, from
so lately being their servant, or, at best, their equal,
had thus, by one bold effort, rendered himself their
mastertheir unquestioned, undisputed master!
This is not honest! cried Sir Henry Vane, at
length, when he had rallied from the first surprise.
It is against morality and common honesty!
Words cannot picture, language of man cannot
describe the change that flashed across the
speaking
lineaments of Oliver. An instanta short
instant
only, ere Vane addressed him, all had been
virulent and active fury, lashed, as it were, by its
own goadings into a state purely animal and
uncontrollable
.
Now the fierce glare of anger instantly
subsided, leaving the face, for the moment,
passionless
and vacant as an infant's; but, ere there
was timenot for words, but for thoughtthe
deepest sneer of scorn, of loathing, and
unutterable
,
undisguised contempt succeeded. Sir Harry
Vane! he replied, in a low stern whisper, which
drove the blood back curdling through the veins of
him on whose mind he had pounced, eagle-like,
with ayenging talonsoh, Sir Harry Vane! The
Lord deliver me from Sir Harry Vane! Honesty,
and Sir Harry Vane! Morality, and Harry Vane!
who, if he so had pleased, might have prevented
this!who is a jugglera mere hypocriteand
hath not common
honesty himself!
A parliament!
I do profess, a precious parliament!of
drunkards
!knaves!extortioners!adulterers!
Lo,
there, he added, pointing to Challoner, there
sits a noted wine-bibbera very glutton and a
drunkard! There! casting his eyes toward
Henry
Marten and Sir Peter Wentworth, there two
most foul adulterers! Then turning on his heel,
as if he had already said enough, he waved his
hand toward the soldiers, and in a voice as quiet
and unruffled as if he had not been in anywise
excited
,
commanded them to clear the house!
I, exclaimed Lenthall, boldlyfor, seeing that
no violence was offered, he had recovered his
scared spirits
I
am the speaker of this house,
lawfully by its members chosen, and, save by vote
of those same members or by actual force, I never
quit its precinets while in life!
Then Harrison stepped slowly up the body of
the long hall to the chair, attended by two
musketeers
;
he laid his hand on Lenthall's shoulder, and
prayed him to descend; and, without farther words,
he came down from his seat, and putting on his
hat, departed from the house all crestfallen and
astounded. Algernon Sidney followed him at once,
though with a statelier mien and bolder bearing,
eighty more of the members moving with him
toward
the door. While there had seemed to be
the slightest chance of any opposition to his will,
Cromwell had stood in silence, with his arms folded
on his breast, facing the speaker's chair, with a
dark scowl upon his brow and his lips rigidly
compressed
;
but now, when he perceived that all,
without more words, were skulking away from the
house, he once again addressed them. It is
you, he exclaimed, it is you who have thrust this
on me. Night and day have I prayed the Lord
that he would slay me rather than put me on the
doing of this work.
Then wherefore do it, asked Allen, bluntly,
ere he left the house, if that it be so grievous to
you? There is yet time enough to undo that
which is already doneand, as your conscience
tells you,
ill
done, my Lord of Cromwell!
Conscience! Ha! conscience! Alderman,
retorted Oliver, and what did
thine
tell
thee
when
thou, as treasurer of the army, didst embezzle
much more than one hundred thousand pounds to
thine own uses? What sayest thou to that, good
alderman! Ho! ho! methinks I have thee there.
Guards, apprehend this peculator! Away with
him! away with him! I say, and he stamped
angrily
upon the floor as to enforce his words,
until
he answers for his deep misdoings!
Sullen, humiliated, and unpitied, for they had
lost already the respect of honest men of all
denominations
,
the members of that parliament, which
had dethroned and slain a powerful monarch
destroyed
the constitution, and disenthralled the
people
of a mighty nationvanquished all foreign foes,
and raised their country from a secondary to a
firstrate power in Europe, now sneaked away to
find a miserable refuge in the despised obscurity
of private lifedeserted by the people in their
turn, whom they had first deserted at the dictates
of a depraved and poor ambition. When all had
gone forth from the hall, the worker of this mighty
revolution fixed his eyes on the mace which lay
upon the board before the speaker's chairWhat
shall we do, he said, with this fool's bawble?
Here, carry it away! and, at the word, a private
of the guard bore off that ancient emblem of the
people's delegated poweron which, not to
preserve
his soul, Charles Stuart would have dared lay
a finger of offenceat the first bidding of the
simple
citizen of a small English borough, raised by
his own strange sagacity and the interminable
firmness
of his single will to a far loftier station than
the proudest despotism of the East! He snatched
the instrument of dissolution from the trembling
fingers of the clerk; ordered the great doors to be
locked; and, girt by his devoted guard, returned
to his own palace at Whitehall, in all, save name,
a king. The same day saw the dissolution of the
council; and, ere the members were forgotten,
little
time as elapsed before they were so, the army
and the navy sent their addresses up to the
lord-general
,
declaring that they were content to live or
die in the support of these his measures; and every
corner of the island resounded with the loud hymns
of the fanatics, exulting that the great and
long-desired
reformation was now near the birth!
Blessing
the God of Heaven, who had called Cromwell
forth and led him on, not only in the high places
of the field, but alsoamong those mighty ones
whom God hath leftto the dissolving of the late
parliament!rejoicing that the fifth monarchy,
the kingdom of Messiah was at hand, and that the
promised reignthe grand millennium of the saints
was now to be established in the renovated
commonwealth
!
And hethe self-deceiverthe fool of fancied
destinywaked through the watches of the night
to seek the Lord in prayer!to read the oracles of
the fates in the unquiet workings of his own
restless
spirit!to detect, in the success of his
ambitious
projectsprojects unknown or disguised to
his inmost soulthe wonderful fulfilment of the
prophecies of old!to cry aloud in the dark
solitude
of his nocturnal chamber. True! true! It
was
true that the spirit thundered at midnight in
mine ears! Lo! the accomplishment is here!
Am I notam I not the first in Englandthough
I be not as yet called king?
CHAPTER IV.
Cyriack, this three years' day these eyes though clear,
To outward view, of blemish or of spot,
Bereft of light, their seeing have forgot;
Nor to their idle orbs doth sight appear
Of sun, or moon, or star throughout the year,
Or man or woman. Yet I argue not
Against Heaven's hand or will, nor bate a jot
Of heart or hope; but still bear up and steer
Right onward. What supports me, dost thou ask?
The conscience, friend, to have lost them overplied
In liberty's defence, my noble task,
Of which all Europe rings from side to side.
Milton's
Sonnets
.
In
the old parlour, still decorated, although years
had flown, with the same faded hangingsmore
faded nowof dark green serge, before his desk of
ebony, and near a seacoal fire, which threw a
brilliant
care-dispelling light upon the features still
comely and unwrinkled, upon the soft hair scarcely
streaked with any tinge of gray, and the bright eye
still clear and vivid as though it were not robbed
of its intelligence, sat that far greater and more
holy poet who, as himself has told us, did not
Sometimes forget
Those other two equalled with
him
in fate,
So were
he
equalled with them in renown,
Blind Thamyris and blind Munides;
but to whose blameless spirit, fraught as it was
with knowledge of his own mighty genius, it was
not given to know that he should no less
supersede
in fame, in immortality of praise, the objects
of his emulation, than he exceeded them in the
solemnity, the fervour, and the cultivation of his
unrivalled intellect. He sat not now, however, as
before, alonefor two young females, not, perhaps,
to speak strictly, beautiful, but still attractive, and
bearing in their pale features undoubted tokens of
nature's richest dowerhigh intellectwere
seated
in the same small apartment. One, placed before
the organ, had just ceased drawing from its vocal
tubes that flood of rich religious harmony which
ever was the strongest source of inspiration to the
soul of her benighted parent. The other, who had
just received a packet from a servitor who was
now passing from the parlour, was in the act of
opening it, speaking the while in a voice which,
though more feminine, and, at the same time, very
similar in its peculiar sweetness, was still less
musically
soft than her father's tones of unmixed
melody.
If I err not, she said, this should be from
the hand of your much valued friend, Sir Edgar
Ardenne.
Indeed! is it, indeed? cried Milton, eagerly.
Dear, spirit wounded friendfain would I hear
of him. Quick! quick, my girl. Truly my soul
thirsts for his tidings, as thirsts the panting hart for
the cool water-brooks! Is it a foreign letter?
Not foreign, sir, she answered, but surely
from your friend. It hath for date`The
commonwealth's
ship Jael, now off Spithead, June
29.' I will proceed to show you the contents;
and, without farther words, she read it out in a
clear fluent voice, her father listening all the time
with a most earnest and unwavering attention
depicted
on his pregnant and expressive features.
How shall I offer to console you, my most
honoured
and beloved friend, thus ran the letter,
under the grievous dispensation with which it
has seemed good to
Him
who cannot err to make
yet farther trial of your excellence. If I should
set down aught, it would but be, I know, as weak
and whispering sounds when brought beside the
powerful and all-assuaging harmonies which your
own tutored mind, mature in wisdom, and superior
no less far in fervid piety to mine than in the gifts
of science, hath poured forth, in a never-ceasing
stream, to lull the pains and minister to the
repinings
of the flesh. Condolence, therefore, I nor
offernor would you, I think, receive!nothing
except a conscience such as yours can bear the
body up beneath so sad a deprivationand such
a one
can
do much more, and
doth
. Moreover, if
in such circumstance any thing can be termed
happy
,
happy it is that your enjoyments are for the
most part of that spiritual and internal nature, which
change of day or nightof noontide splendour or
of everlasting darknesscan nothing take away nor
yet deteriorate. Truly you have laid up for
yourself
treasures `where the moth and the rust do not
corrupt, nor thieves break through and steal.' I
have read through your task, in leisure moments
of my perilous and weary watchesyour defence
of the English peopleand IT IS A DEFENCE! If
you had written never any thing before, this should
prove you both patriot and poetshould win you
what, I fancy, you, no more than I, esteem at an
inordinate
or priceless valuethe vain world's voice
of praiseand greater far than this, the approbation
of all good and wise men now, and the eternal
reverence
and gratitude of ages that shall be
hereafter
.
But of this enough! No words of mine, alas!
can remedy or sooth those griefs, if there be any,
which your own high philosophy have not removed
alreadyand, to assure you of my real sympathy,
they are, I know, even more needless. Of that you
can want no assurance! I would that we could
hold more intimate communionfor I have many
Vol. II.U
things to say to you which I love not to trust to
paperthe rather that that paper
must
now pass
under eyes not yours before its sense can be
transmitted
to your ears. But since we cannot converse
freely face to face, as in more happy days of old
days which, to both of us, are now but a delightful
memory of things that never can returnwhy we
must even interchange our sentiments as best we
may; setting down what we may in prudence and
with safety, and supplyingeach from his own
knowledge of the others' wonted train of thought and
feelingthat which must be omitted. This, for my
own part, I will entreat you to assay to do, bearing
in mind the last important conversation which took
place between uswith my own fears concerning
things and persons of no small weight in England,
and your assurances that those my fears were
fruitless
and ill-grounded. We have learned, here in
the fleet, but a few months ago, how the
lord-general
hath dissolved the parliament by actual and
armed violenceand now we further hear that he
doth exercise in person all the prerogatives and
duties of an absolute uncontrolled monarch
making
,
at his own pleasure, peace and warsigning
and ratifying treaties with foreign potentates
excluding
or admitting whom he will to the great
council of the nation; bearing himself, in short, as
if he were legitimately and of right the master of
the liberties and lives of freeborn, but, alas! no
more free, Englishmen. I may not here disguise
from you that, shortly after the intelligence of his
first usurpationfor such I, for one, hold the
dissolution
of the parliament, as I may say at the
pike's point, how worthless or inadequate soever
it might bea general council held by delegates
from every vessel of our victorious fleet voted an
address to the general, approving of the measure
which I reprobate, and promising to live or die in
his support. Nor, I imagine, have I any need to
state to you, that neither I, nor a far more important
person, to wit, our great commander, Blake, had
any share or portion in this vote or addressboth
of us, for the time, holding ourselves content to do
our duty to our country against her foreign foes,
whatever the complexion of her internal policy.
The flag of England must not float less superbly
now than when it overcanopied the crowns of our
immortal sovereigns of old. But now I will entreat
you, ere I lay down my penwhich I must do
somewhat
the more in haste that the last signal from our
admiral is to weigh anchors and stand out to sea
in chase of a Dutch squadronto inform me at
your leisure of the more intricate and hidden
motives
of late matters in the state. Whether this
man hath indeed, by his own daring only, and at
the prompting of insatiate ambition, compassed an
usurpation so beyond all exception flagrant and
audacious
,
that I comprehend not how even his
sagacity
can cloak it in the eyes of men with a fair
semblanceor whether the times be indeed so
much out of joint that these most marvellous
aggressions
on the privileges and the liberty of
parliament
can be in anywise required or justified on
grounds of hindering greater anarchy and detriment
to England than shall arise from this invasion of
time-honoured usages. Our anchor is apeake
already
;
and some of our light brigantines, having
slipped their cables, are, as we well believefor we
may hear their cannon although it is so hazy that we
can see scarce a league to seawardeven now
engaged
with Van Trump's rearmost vessels. I send
this with the pilot, who shall despatch it by express
to London. I pray you once again write to me, as
to one secluded from intelligence of all those things
which are most dear to him. We shall, 'tis very
like, put back to Portsmouth after action, should it
seem fit to the great Moderator of the universe to
grant us victory, to which our endeavours shall be
in nowise wanting. To Him I now commend you.
Valeas, igitur, haud immemor observantissimi tui.
Edgar Ardenne
.
Several times during the space occupied by the
recitation of this letter had Milton interrupted it by
comments to his gentle secretaries on its style, its
language, and, above all, the noble sentiments which
breathed in every line of it. At moments he was
affected almost to the point of tears, and again, at
others, a bright benignant smile would kindle his
whole aspect into sunny animation. After his
daughter had ceased reading, Kind heart, he
saidkind heart, and generous, as kind. We
must forthwith reply to him. He knoweth not,
moreover, how dear and intimate a secretary and
attendant is vouchsafed to us in our diurnal gloom.
Hast thou thy vellum ready, girl, and pens? I will
dictate forthwith, for lo! his letter hath been long
delayed upon its route, and he hath anxiously, I
doubt not, looked for an answer to his queries.
Having received an affirmative reply from her who
had been playing on the organ, and who now placed
herself beside him at the desk, he commenced
dictating
in his wonted voice of slow and silvery music.
TO THE MOST NOBLE GENTLEMAN, THE MUCH
ESTEEMED SIR EDGAR ARDENNE.
The letter which you sent to me, my true and
honoured friend, addressed from Spithead hither,
previously to the renowned and memorable victory
of July, wherein not only was the indefeisible and
ancient right of England to be the queen and
mistress
of the ocean waves permanently and
triumphantly
established by the tried arms of our stout
seamen, but that most brave and dangerous foe
during whose lifetime never had the sturdy
Hollanders
yielded to us the palmVan Trump was
laid at rest from troubling us now any morehath
but now reached me, although frore winter is
already
treading hard on the retiring footsteps of his
more lusty predecessor. Grateful, indeed, and
pleasing to my spirit are the kind sympathizings
which you have therein displayed with my
infirmities
great,
truly, is the loss of lightthe shutting
out of wisdom from one of its most easy and
familiar
entrancesthe quenching of the finest, the most
delicate, and subtile of the senses. But surely,
under this affliction mighty and manifold, all glory
be to Him who to the shorn lamb tempereth the wind,
are still my consolations, andtruly I can use the
word in its full sensemy joys! First, do I feel
this proud conviction, that, ere mine eyes were
sealed in night, they had performed their task, not
negligently, nor with a niggard and reluctant labour,
but with such ample execution, such overflowing
measure of success, that not alone the cause which
I have laboured to uphold, even to the self-sacrifice
of God's first gift of light, hath been admitted true
in every land of Christendom, and I, its author, robed
in a vestment of such high repute as might
compensate
for any loss less grievous, but more the
ill-advised
and senseless wretch who dared to strive
against me in the arena of the schools hath paid for
his temerity, not only by the utter deprivation of
all renown which might before have been conceded
him, but by his own deceaseperishing of the
rankling
hatred and mean jealousy which follows ever
on defeat when sustained by a poor, base spirit.
These things, then, are to me a great and wondrous
U 2
consolationfirst, that I, in my degree, have done
my duty to my beloved countrysecondly, that to
her the sacrifice hath not been profitless nor the
devotion unacceptableand, thirdly, that to me it
hath brought that best boon of the world's giving
that boon to pant for which is, of a truth, `the last
infirmity of noble minds'a high, and, though
myself
I say it, not an unmerited renown. Nor fancy,
my kind friend, that, in my blindness, I am deserted
quite and robbed of natural enjoymentsno! by
the gracious mercy of that Lord who never casts
us into peril, or temptation, or adversity, but
likewise
he finds for us a way of escape from the
same; I am so piously attended by the affectionate
and loving cares of my two daughters, my
organists
,
my secretaries, nurses, and companions, that
less acutely do I feel the greatness of my loss than
it were easy for you to imagine. Besides, long
since have I looked forward to this consummation
of my daily and nocturnal labours, as to a certain
unavoidable resultand poor, indeed, were the
resources
and the energies of him who, having long
foreseen a coming evil, should lack the power to
reconcile himself to its endurance, when it seemed
good unto the Lord to send it in his own appointed
time.
Now, with regard to what you say touching the
difficulty or the danger of intimate communion
between
us by epistlerelieve yourself from any
terror
it
is a child's tongue which conveys the sense
of all the letters he receives to her blind parent's
earit is a child's hand which commits to writing
each syllable that flows from her blind parent's
mouth. Wherefore, whatever you would say to
me, write now, and ever, with all fearlessness and
freedom, as I will answer to your queries. Surely
the matters which have caused so much of grieving
and anxiety to your most noble mind have likewise
been a stumbling-block to many. Needful it was for
England's weal, for her salvation I might say, that
the self-seeking carnal-minded juntowho
arrogated
to themselves the rights and titles of a
parliament
,
and who, having once liberated, were now
striving to enslave their countryshould be cast
forth from the high places of their usurpation.
And by whom could they be cast forth save by the
excellent and most wise person whom I am grieved
to see that you do still mistrust? Deeply, most
deeply was he movedand fervently, with tears
and prayers continually, and supplications earnest
and importunate, did he beseech the Ruler of all
mortal councils that this cup should pass from him
but it might not be granted. Truly, had
Cromwell
been ambitious, would he at once have yielded
up the power which he for a short time assumed,
to a new chosen parliament, assembled at the
earliest
?
Truly, had he so willed, he might have
then been kingbut no! he laboured for his
country's
weal, and he has won it! And again, if he be
now protector of the land, wielding the sword of
execution
,
and weighing with the balances of justice
I pray you, how was he so eminently raised
above his fellows? Did he so elevate himself,
carving his way through patriotic opposition to that
thorny seat of power? Doth he sit now upon
unruly
and unwilling necks of subjugated and
rebellious
citizens? Oh no! But by the resignation of
the free elected parliamentwhich succeeded that
base remnant over whose fall not one man shed a
tear in Englandof all their delegated powers
powers which they soon learned they could not
profitably wieldinto the hands of him whom they
sawand saw trulyto be the only person
capable
of holding England's helm aright amid the
turbulent
and stormy seas of foreign warfare and
domestic
anarchy. Remember you how we
discoursed
one time touching the possibility of the
existence of republics? And how I, dazzled by the
immortal glare of classic stories, caught by the light
which I then deemed a stara living star of glory
but now have ascertained to be a false delusive
meteorhow I contended that, as Rome and Greece
were free and mighty once, so England should be
likewise when modelled to a form of pure
democracy
?
Do you remember thisand your own
arguments
against me? Now, I confess it, you have
conqueredand I, wise as I held myself, was
groping
like a benighted traveller amid the ruined
labyrinths
and fallen shrines of false divinities. Truly
there is
no
tyranny like to the tyranny of
multitudes
.
Till the majority of men shall be, as you
then said, wise and unselfish, virtuous, honest, and
enlightened, till then it is in vain to hope for good
from any government administered by that majority
that hundred-headed, fickle-willed, false-hearted
monster which is called the people.
England was tottering on the brink of ruin in
the years that preceded the all-glorious '49, and
Oliver stepped in and rescued her from lying the
dishonourable victim of
one
tyrant. England again
was falling headlongheadlong into an abyss of
anarchy and vice, and misery and follyand now
again has the same guardian of his countrythe
same great Oliver stepped in, and saved her from
becoming the most miserable slave and harlot of
ten millions
, fiercer each one and more tyrannical
than he who paid the forfeit of his crimes upon the
scaffold of Whitehall. Never, in any former day,
were all men's liberties so well defined, so jealously
secured, so strictly and so punctually guarded, as
they now arenever was justice yet so equally
administered without respect of persons or estates.
Each man of England can, indeed, sit now under
his own vine and his own fig-tree, fearless,
content
,
and free. Happy, and virtuous, and rich at
homehonoured and feared abroadsuccouring
the oppressed in every foreign climeriding the
ocean in secure and undisputed mastery
shielding
her sons, in whatsoever quarter of the wide
world they may be wandering, by the mere
shadow
of her name. This is the lot of England
now! When was it so before? And now that it
has once been won for herwon by her Great
Protectorwho shall e'er wrest it from her?
when shall it cease to be? But I grow warm
enthusiasticalas who would not, that knows him
as he should be known, in praise of this most
wondrous man? I have a boon to ask of youa
boon which I beseech youby the memory of those
pleasant days when we two wandered by the
classic
waters of the Tiber and Ilissus, when we two
mused among the ruins of the Coliseum and the
palace-tombs
of the dead Csarsgrant to me. It is
the first I ever asked of you, and you will not refuse
it. Peace is concluded with the sturdy
Hollanders
;
our fleets may float from the white cliffs of
Albion
beyond the pillars of the Grecian herobeyond
the far Symplegadesbeyond the islands of the
blessedover the vanished Atalantis, even to the
free forest-shores of that great western land named
of our virgin queenand find no flag to brave them.
Sheath, then, your sword. England hath need of
you at home. Return, return, and you shall own
me right in my opinion and Cromwell clear in his
great office; else will I be content that you shall
call me now no longer
Your most affectionate friend and admirer,
John Milton
.
Westminster
,
this
14
th day of January
, 1654.
CROMWELL.
BOOK V.
The third of the same moon, whose former course
Had all but crowned him, on the selfsame day
Deposed him gently from his throne of force,
And laid him with the earth's preceding clay.
And showed not fortune thus how fame and sway,
And all we deem delightful, and consume
Our souls to compass through each arduous way,
Are in her eyes less happy than the tomb?
Were they but so in man's, how different were his doom!
Childe Harold
.
CHAPTER I.
A more than earthly crown
The dictatorial wreath.
He who surpasses or subdues mankind
Must look down on the hate of those below
Though high above the sun of glory glow,
And far beneath the earth and ocean spread,
Round him are icy rocks, and loudly blow
Contending tempests on his naked head,
And thus reward the toils which to those summits led.
Childe Harold
.
It
was on the evening of the twenty-sixth of
June, some five years later than the date of Milton's
letter, urging upon Sir Edgar Ardenne the
propriety
of his return to Englandyet, since he had
dictated
it, the poet had received no line or token from
his friend. After the peace which closed the long
and hard-fought struggle with the Hollanders, and
decided the supremacy of England on the seas,
throwing up his commission, Ardenne had left the
navy; nor, since that day, had any tidings been
received
of one who had, a little time before, so
occupied
the general mouth, and played a part so
eminent in that great dramathe World's History.
Such is renown!such popular applause!such
human gratitude! The man who had preserved
the life of Oliver on Winsley field!who had
secured
his victory on Marston Moor!who had, to
the abandonment of all that could have rendered
his own life happy, laboured as the most strenuous
and faithful of that great being's followers, so long
as he believed him trueto Englandand to
himself
!who,
with a yet harder sacrifice, quitted his
side the very moment he perceived the dawning
symptoms of ambition in one whom he had loved
and honouredas men but rarely love and honour!
This man was now forgottenforgotten by the
land for which he had so deeply suffered
forgotten
by the friend he had so deeply served!
The past anniversary of this day had been a day
of splendour and rejoicingthe night had been one
of joy, festivity, and mirth. From every steeple in
the huge metropolis the merry bells had chimed
with their most jovial notesfrom park and tower
the loud voice of the cannon thundered in noisy
concertfrom every casement tapers, and lamps,
and torches sent forth unwonted radianceand
from each court and square huge bonfires streamed
heavenward, while by their light the multitude sat
feasting and carousing, to the health of the
Protector
.
The past anniversary of this day had
witnessed
the superb and solemn ceremonial of his
installation
to that office which he had filled with so
much dignity and honour to himself, with so much
profit and advancement to his country, during the
four preceding years. With all the glorious
preparation
,
the pride, and pomp, and circumstance
which decks the coronation of a monarch, with
proclamation
of the kings at arms, and homage of
bareheaded
lords, and acclamations of the multitude,
and addresses from the delegates of foreign
potentates
,
Oliver had been decorated with a robe of
purple
more splendidly elaborate than the attire of any
former king; he had been girded with the rich
sword of state; he had received a sceptre, massive
with solid gold, with which to sway the destinies
Vol. II.X
of England; a noble copy of the Holy Writ,
whereby
to wield that sceptre rightly. Generals had
borne his train; the parliament had sanctioned his
investiture as performed by its speaker; the people
had assented! In all but name, that feather in
the hat, which adds not any thing to him who wears
itthat toy and bawble, which he had oftentimes
rejected, partly in politic accordance to the
prejudices
of his more fanatical advisers, partly in
superstitious
,
although unconfessed, obedience to the
prophetic voice which had forewarned him of his
coming greatnessthe citizen of Huntingdon was
now the
King of England
!
Great, powerful, triumphant, unresisted! His
every project splendidly successful! His every
wish fulfilled! His love of glorythirst of power
ambition to be
First
all satisfied, if not, indeed,
insatiate! His boast, that he would make the name
of Englishman as potent and as far revered as ever
was the style of antique Roman, completed to the
letter! The country, which he governed, raised
from the deepest degradation to the loftiest fame!
His navies irresistible  his armies everywhere
victorioushis alliance courtedand his enmity
most humbly deprecated by dynasties which, but
one century beforeand that, too, when the most
mighty of her former sovereigns, the
manly-minded
virgin queen, had filled her throneregarded
England as a mere speck on the bosom of the sea;
hard, it is true, of access, and difficult to conquer;
but powerless abroad, and exercising scarce a
shadow
either of influence or power among the mightier
royalties of Europe! Was Cromwell happy?
In a high chamber of his more than royal
residence
,
while all without was rife with
demonstrations
of respect for his affeered and legal dignity,
Oliver sat alone. Sumptuously, though still plainly
clad, in an entire suit of sable velvet, the jewelled
sword of state which had been, on that same day of
the foregoing year, buckled to his side, lying upon
the board before him, and bearing in his altered
mienaltered most strangely, and adapted to his
altered stationthat grave majestic dignity which
had replaced the bluntness of his soldier-bearing
musing in solitude and silence, the greatest man in
England passed the first anniversary of his assured
and titled greatness. There was, however, now no
glow of exultation on that pale cheek and careworn
browno curl of triumph on the lipno flash of
gratified ambition in the downcast eye! Lines
deeper and sterner than the wrinkles of advancing
age were seared into that massive foreheada
shadow gloomy and sad had veiled that hollow eye
exhaustion, weariness of heart, sickness of spirit,
were written visibly in the pale caverns of that
haggard
cheek! There was a trifling sounda casual
rustling in the large apartment, a thousand such as
which each hour brings to unsuspicious earshe
started to his feet!he thrust his hand into his
bosom!he bent a searching and disquiet eye into
each corner of the room, which was so strongly
lighted
that not a shadow could be seen in its most
distant
angle!he listened as the condemned prisoner
listens for the foot of the law's last minister. The
sound came not againand he resumed his seat;
but, as he did so, a sharp and jingling clash told
that beneath the civic garb there lurked a shirt
of steel; and the light glittered on the butt of a
concealed pistol, just rendered visible by the
derangement
of his doublet. The soldier of a
hundred
fieldsthe vanquisher and scorner of a
thousand
perilshe who had ridden to the fray as to
the banquethe who had stood all dauntless and
unflinching among a storm of bullets, that cut down
all around himwore hidden armourshook at an
empty sound! A pile of papers lay before him on
the tablethreats from anonymous assassins
hints from concealed and faithfull spies, dwellers
at every court in Europedespatches intercepted
private correspondence opened and searched
and, on the top of all, a pamphlet, fresh from the
press, with the leaves partly cut, and a broad-bladed
dagger, which he had used to open them, lying
upon it, as if to mark the place! It bore the
ominous
and fearful title,
Killing no Murder
!
After a long pause, during which, though seated,
he still watched with an acute and anxious ear for
a recurrence of the sound that had disturbed him,
he again took up the pamphlet, and with a painful
and intense fixedness of study, that marked the
harrowing
interest he took in its minutest arguments,
perused its closely-printed pages. Midnight had
long passed ere he finished itwith a deep sigh he
closed and laid it down againa sigh not of regret,
but of relieved suspense, such as men heave when
the catastrophe of some exciting tragedy is over!
The villain! he exclaimed; the perilous and
subtle villain! Damnable arguments! Accursed
perversion of the talents and the intellect, which
God giveth unto man for good! He rose, and
paced the apartment to and fro, with steps now
faltering and slow, now hurried, short, and rapid!
`And my own muster-roll'he says`contains
the names of those who burn to emulate the glory
of the younger Brutuswho do aspire to the
honour
of delivering their country'and by what
what but my secret murder?his brow became
more gloomy than before; and yet again, after a
little space, it kindled with its ancient animation.
A lie! he cried, aloud, and in a tone of triumph;
I do believe, a lie!a wicked and malignant
lie! framed but to break my rest! It cannot be
it cannotthat my brave fellowsmy own
ironsides
my
followers in a hundred battles can be but
true and loyal! and yethe went on, the
momentary
gleam of spirit fadingand yet it doth crave
wary walking!ay! and, as Milton would say in
his classic tongue,
fas est et ab hoste doceri!
But
I will watchyea! watch with my sword drawn
and my light burningsurely the Lord of Hosts
will shield his servant from the midnight dagger
as from the open-smiting sword! I will trust no
man!no! not one! Harrison hath looked cold
on me of late, and prated much of Ehud and of
Saul! and Fleetwood thwarts me! Hacker, who
was my friend, is now my bitter foe! And they
have dared to liken me to Ahab, and to cry `Ha!
ha! Hast thou slain, and dost thou take
possession
?'
And Ormond hath come over, as I learn
today
another
Syndercombe and Sexby business!
The snares are setare set, I say, on every side!
pitfalls are digged for my feet, and arrows whetted
privily against me! And wherefore? They
cannot
say that I have wronged one man in England
that I have wrung one penny from their purses,
or shed one drop of blood, save in due course of
law. They cannot charge me with bloodthirstiness,
for I have been long-suffering and mercifulay!
even to a fault!but I will be so now no longer
Slingsby must come to trial, ay, and Hewetand,
if condemned, as the Lord liveth, they shall die!
die as murderers and common stabbersdie, I say,
soul and body! They cannot say that England is
not free, and powerful, and happy as never was she
heretofore!and yet they hate me!ay, and take
counsel for my deatlr!and poison all hearts
even of my own friendsagainst me! `and I shall
perish,' this base fellow prophesieth, `like dung
X 2
from off the earthand they that look upon my
greatness shall ask of me, `Where is he?'  He
paused in his distempered walk, and, falling on his
knees, burst into a passion of loud sobs and tears
My God, he criedmy God, why hast thou
thus forsaken me? Oh yield not up thy servant to
the power of the ungodly, nor suffer the blashemers
to prevail against him. For surely it is thou
thou, Lordwho hast thrust on me this undesired
greatness; who hast compelled me, though
reluctant
and rebellious, to wear these trappings of
authority
when,
as thou knowesteven
thou
, who
knowest all thingsfar rather I had dwelt by a
woodside and tended sheep, than been the ruler of
this stiff-necked and ungrateful generation. But
thou hast done this violence to my affections, thou
hast disposed of thy servant for the best in thine
own sight, as from the beginning it was written
downyea! thou didst send thy minister to warn
him of thy pleasure when but a child, foolish and
unregenerate, and a slave to sin! Thou didst redeem
him from the power of Satan, and sure he was in
graceand he that is in thy grace once can never
more relapse! Lo! by my hand thou didst strike
down the man Charles Stuart, putting it nightly
and by day into my soul, `thou shalt not suffer him
to live'and thou hast set me up, not for my own
pleasure nor at my request, but at thine own singular
especial choice, for the advancement of thy cause,
the welfare and the safety of thy church!and
thou hast made me, as thou promisedst of yore,
though not a king, THE
First in England
! And
yet thou dost abandon now thy servantthou dost
yield up thy true and faithful onewho, for thy
cause, hath yielded up his allto the delusions of
the enemythe power of the Evil One! I ask not,
in this merciful?but is this just, O Lord? Thou
knowest well how I have served thee, neither
grudgingly nor with eye servicebut in all purity
and truth of spiritand now, even now, Lord,
when thou hast, as it seems, forgotten me, I turn to
thee alone for aid, to thee for succour and for justice!
Let me not perish utterlylet not my blood, which
has flowed ever at thy bidding freely, be spilled by
a base stabber!let me not be cast forth from the
high place whereon thou hast seated me, as a thing
worthless and despised; but let me die, when thou
hast done with me, in fulness of my fame, either
upon my deathbed, thence passing peaceably into
thy presence, or gallantly upon my charger's back
amid the blare of trumpets
A step was heard withouta low tap at the door
instantly he rose from his knee, holding the
Bible
,
which he had opened as he commenced his
wild and almost impious prayer, in one hand, while
with the other he grasped the hilt of the short
massy sword beside himEnter! he said, in a
stern calm voice; and, at the word, one of his
bodyguards
stepped in, announcing that a stranger was
below, craving to speak privately on matters of
great import with his highness.
What like is he? Oliver asked, sharplya
stranger, ha! Is he a tall pale man, with a deep
scar on his right cheeka mantle of blue broad
cloth with a red cape, a slouched hat and red
feather?
Even so, please your highness, replied the
soldier.
And doth he wear his right hand gloved,
resting
upon the hilt of a long tuck, and three rings on
the fingers of his left?
Of a truth I observed not, the messenger
began
.
Begone then, instantlydemand his namenot
that it mattersbut mark his hands, I tell thee
they should be as I tell thee. On the forefinger
of the left a plain gold hoop, and a large seal-ring
of cornelian, with a small guard of jet upon the
second. If it be so, say to him I will go now no
farther in that matter, but will send one to confer
with him at three hours past noon to-morrow, at
the place which he wots of. If it be
not
as I say
to you, secure him on the peril of your life, and
have him away forthwith to the Gatehouse!but
in neither case trouble me any more this night.
Begone! and, as the soldier left the room, he
muttered something to himself inaudiblydrew
out no fewer than three pistols from different parts
of his attire, looked closely to the flints and priming,
extinguished all the lights save one, locked, double
locked, and barred the outer doorthen raised the
tapestry in a corner of the room, opened a panel
in the wainscoting, and, gliding through it into a
devious
passage in the thickness of the wall, stole
like a guilty thing to a remote bedchamber,
different
from that in which he had slept the preceding
night, known only to one old and trusted servitor.
CHAPTER II.
Perchance she-died in youth: it may be bowed
With woes far heavier than the ponderous tomb
That weighed upon her gentle dust, a cloud
Might gather o'er her beauty, and a gloom
In her dark eye, prophetic of the doom
Heaven gives its favouritesearly death.
Childe Harold
.
The
power, the wealth, and the prosperity of
England daily and almost hourly increased!the
ravages of war had long since disappeared from her
deep velvet pastures and her happy homes! Every
religion was endured except when its professors
intermeddled in state mattersall parties, whether
cavalier, or Presbyterian, or fifth-monarchist, shared
equally the law's protection, alike relied on the
protector's
evenhanded justice! The arts and sciences
were more encouraged; learned and polished
scholars
were esteemed at the court of Oliver in higher
and more just repute; morality was more
rewarded
,
licentiousness and vice more frowned down
than ever they had been before. Nor, though the
court was rigid almost to excess in morals, was its
decorum chilled by any touch of jealous puritanical
moroseness! All innocent amusements were
admitted
and enjoyed freely, Cromwell himself
keeping
a stud of race-horses, and labouring to promote
in all things lawfulnot the mere welfare, but the
happiness and comfort of his meanest subject! No
Christian sect was hindered in its worship or
observances
;
even the trampled and scorned Israelite
finding an advocate and friend in that great man,
who went so infinitely far in toleration, beyond,
not his own age alone, but the most liberal usages
of the most tolerant of modern nations. Still did
his
cares, his griefs, and his perplexities but
multiply
!no
success was enough to pleaseno general
prosperity enough to satiate the peoplecraving
eternally the something newlosing the tangible
realities of present in the dim longings after future
happinessforgetting benefits conferred
ungrateful
for past meritslightheaded, fickle, and
false-hearted
.
Day after day new plots broke out; and
though they burst all harmlesslythe veteran
bearing
still, as it would seem, a charmed lifeevery
detected scheme, punished or pardoned, left its deep
sting behind. Cromwell's existence was no longer
healthfulhis spirit was no longer, as of yore,
elastic
and storm-riding as the eagle's pinion! His
days were spent in bitter, because thankless,
labours
his
nights in agonizing apprehensions. It
was not that he trembledit was not that a vile
and dastard fear of death shook his soul from its
eminenceit was not that he would have doubted
any more to hurl himself in open strife upon the
deadliest hazard now, when the monarch of the
land, than when he fought a simple colonel of the
ironsidesa theme of dread to othershimself
dreading nothing! But it was the suspensethe
doubtthe inability to harbour trust or confidence
in any of those nearest to his person. The
gnawing
heart-consuming sense of being undervalued,
dealt with ungratefully, wronged, hated, and
betrayed
.
Still in the prime of intellectual manhood,
his strong form was bowed and feeble; his hair,
once sable as the raven's wing, thin, weak, and
gray; his piercing eye downcast and veiled, and
his whole aspect that of a man worn out, even by
his own success, spiritless and heartbroken.
Parliament
after parliament, convoked to settle the
provisions
of the nation, rebelled against his power,
running, as had their predecessors, wild on abstruse
religious doctrines, and anxious to plunge all things
once more into anarchy, by striving to work out
their frantic phantasies of perfect and unchangeable
republics. Each after each he was compelled, not
for his own sake merely, but for England's, which
else they would assuredly have hurled again into
the abyss of civil discord, to break up and dissolve
them. Nothing could crush the tameless hardihood
with which he bore up, nerved by their very
pressure
,
against burdens to a slighter intellect wholly
unbearableconspiracies of enemies,
false-heartedness
of friends!treasons and anarchy at home,
insults and wars abroad! All yielded to the active
vigour with which he sprang to grapple them, but
by that very vigour was his own mighty spirit, like
a bow overstrained by too long tension, despoiled
of its own strength, its pliability, its power of
renewed
exertion. The capture of the rich West
Indian islesthe persecutions of the Vaudois,
remitted
at the first hint of his potential voicethe
all-important port of Dunkirk, so long the secret
aim of England's politic ambition, ceded to his
victorious
armscast a bright gleam, indeed, on his
declining years; but it was like the last gleam of
the wintry sunshine, that gilds, but leaves no
impress
of its glory on the snow-mantled earth. A
nearer sorrow, a more domestic grief, was destined
to wear through the last link of the corroding chain
a mere affliction, such as befalls each father of a
family many times in a life, and, for the most,
leaves but slight traces even on minds less firmly
moulded, annihilated the gigantic energies of that
great master spirit which had, throughout its
mortal
course, met nothing that could cope with it,
nothing
that had not been subdued, enslaved, and
overwhelmed by its indomitable will. Elizabeth,
his best beloved daughter, a woman of invaluable
worthmodest, and delicate, and feminine, and
gentle; yet of a character the most decisivea
principle the most undeviatinga permanence and
rectitude of purpose the most immoveableand,
above all, an influence on her father the most
peculiar
and impressivelay wasting on a bed of
mortal sickness. Throughout the whole of his
broad realmsthose realms wherein the sweet
calm home affections have ever flourished the most
greenlythere lived not any father more kind,
solicitous
,
forbearing, and devoted in his paternal love
than the unconquered victorthe merciless avenger
the stern judgethe regicidethe ruler! Hard
as he was abroad, cold and unbending in all outward
show, in his domestic hours none were more warm
than he, more playful, or affectionate. Thus
constituted
toward all his children, the dearest to his
feelings, as the most prized and valued in his
judgment
,
was Elizabeth, who now, consumed by an
unnatural and mortal malady, was waning hourly
before his eyes. She was the only one of all his
familythe only one of all his friendssave only
Edgar Ardenne, who had dared ever to remonstrate
with him during the upward course of his ambition.
She had confronted many a time his sophistry with
that most sound of all philosophies, the pure creed
of the Christianshe had rebuked his zealous and
fanatic superstitions with regulated and sincere
religion
she
had accused him of that restless and
insatiate ambition, which she perceived, or fancied
she perceived, to be the instigator and the planner,
it might be unsuspected even by himself, of all his
darker actions. She had rebuked him during the
trialshe had besought him, on her bended knees
before the execution of the kingto spare, not
his crowned victim only, but his own deathless
famehis own immortal soul! Her wishes set at
naught, her prayers unheeded, she had not once
no, not for one brief momentcomplained, or
murmured
,
or revolted! She had not once reproached
him with that which it was now too late to remedy,
but she had ever been the soother of his disquiet
mind, when fits of his accustomed hypochondriasm
had overcome him with remorse, and terror, and,
visions ominous of woshe had ever been his calm
monitress, inculcating a milder and a holier creed
exhorting him to penitence, as the sole path to
pardon and to peace. And it was strange that now,
in his most lordly plenitude of power, the two
sympathies
which he most keenly felt were toward the
only two of human beings who had seen through
perceived the earliest, and opposed the latest, the
most darling objects of his soul. Abandoned now
by allthe leader, revered, but loved not by his
followers
the
monarch, self-upheld above rebellious
subjectsthe master, flattered, and courted, and,
perhaps, betrayedhe clung with a sharp painful
yearning, as to the only feelings of his heart
entirely
pure and unmixed with aught worldly, to his
affection for Elizabeth and his regret for Ardenne!
Never, since he had fixed his firm seat on the
bloody throne of Charles, had his most cherished
daughter been what she was in his more innocent
and humbler days. Her smile was as sweet, yet
it was now no longer joyous; and her cheek lost
its roses, and her form its roundness; a glassy film
veiled her soft eye; and hethe fathersaw it,
and knew, yet could not reconcile himself to the
approaching wo; and felt himself to be
unutterable
anguishthe slayer of his chosen child. And
seeing, knowing, feeling all this, it was his lot to
deal the last blow to her gentle being, to launch
Vol. II.Y
the last shaft that should ever rankle in her bosom
with the envenomed barbs of mortal sorrow. Hewet,
who, with Sir Henry Slingsby, had, on most positive,
unquestionable proof, been condemned for
conspiracy
against the power and life of Oliverwhom
party prejudice cannot deny to have been guilty of
the intent to killan intent hindered only by
premature
discovery of their plotnor the most jealous
scrutiny discover to have been otherwise than justly
executedhad been the preacher on whose
ministry
she had for many years attended; had united
her to Claypole by the service of the church; had
been her friend, her comforter, her teacher; and,
looking on him only in these amiable and endearing
lights, Elizabeth forgot to view him as the intended
murderer of her fatherargued in his behalf, half
justified his crime under the plea of loyalty to his
true king, prayed zealously and piteously for the
remission of his punishment, and, finding all her
supplications vain, mourned over him with so
intense
and terrible a storm of grief, that it half
overcome
her intellects, and quite wore out her frail
and fading body. With a dull apathy Oliver heard
at first that her life was despaired ofno sign of
sorrow was displayed, scarcely of sense or feeling
but after a short space came the revulsion, the
breaking up of all the vain restraints of pride, and
stoicism, and man's affected hardihoodthe loosing
of the floodgates of the soulthe awful, vehement
outpourings of a strong man's despair! From that
day forth he left not her bedside, neither by day nor
yet by night, tending her with all a woman's care,
and, more than all, a woman's love. Soothing her
every phantasyfeigning to be, or, it may be,
persuading
himself also that he would be, all she could
wish himpraying and weeping with her.
Nothing
could be more beautiful, more pious, or
more touching than the conduct of that gray-haired
usurper, mourning as one that had no hope beyond
her grave, beside his daughter's deathbed. But
wretched as the consolation would have been, to
have caught on his lips her last expiring sigh, to
have felt reflected on his own the last glance of her
glazing eyesthat wretched consolation was denied
to him; for, as the body of his sweet child wasted,
so did her mind wane likewise; and for many days
before the termination of her sufferings she would
at times burst into fits of the most frantic and
insane
delirium. These, as the time of her decease
drew nearer, became more and more vehement and
frightful; and it was strange that she, whose pains
had ever seemed less bitter, or, at the least, more
easily endured when her hand rested in her father's
now, at the sight of him she loved so dearly, nay,
at the mere tones of his voice, or his suppressed
and cautious footstep, started at once into the most
furious paroxysms. Blood! blood! she would
shriek, till the whole pile of Hampton court rang
with her awful ravingsI float, I smother in a
seaa sea of human blood! Who comes? who
comes? red with the gore of monarchsred with
the slaughter of the saints? Father?
not
father
nonooh, not
my
father! and then again
she would take up the cry, Blood! blood!
struggling and wrestling on her couch as if amid
the weltering waves, till those who watched about
her were wellnigh distraught with terror, and till the
boldest of her medical attendants, in the most
positive
terms, insisted on the absence of the despairing
father from the sick chamber of his child. He
withdrew silently, and with a quiet patience, that
perfectly astonished those acquainted with the
imperiousness
of Cromwell's willbut he withdrew
only from her deathbed to lie down upon his own.
Shattered before by the incessant cares which
he for many months had undergone, the whole
weight of the government resting upon his single
shouldersrelaxed by nervousness, suspicion,
superstition
,
and remorsethis last blow broke him
down. His old complaint, the aguewhich had
attacked him first in Scotland, and shaken, if it had
not actually undermined, his constitutionreturned
upon him with redoubled violence, and, in a few
days, brought him down to the very threshold of
that dark housethe grave. But it was not, in
truth, the ailment only of the corporeal shellit
was the intolerable burden of that perilous stuff
that weighs upon the heart!had the mind been
at ease, the sickness of the body had been of small
account! The sorrows written on the brain
were not to be razed out, nor the stuffed bosom
cleansed!the scabbard, fretted long ago, was
now, at length, worn out by the keen weapon that
lay hid within itthe earthen jar was burst by the
inscrutable workings of the liquor it contained
the pharos was consumed by the same fire which
had for many a year been the sole agent of its
glory!
CHAPTER III.
Then happy low lie down!
Uneasy lies the head that wears a crown!
King Henry IV. Part II
.
The garlands wither on your brow,
Then boast no more your mighty deeds;
Upon death's purple altar now
See where the victor victim bleeds.
All hands must come
To the cold tomb;
Only the actions of the just
Smell sweet, and blossom in the dust.
Shirley
.
It
was already twilight on a sweet August
evening
,
and the streets were fast growing thin, as the
many-tongued and busy crowd, that had chafed and
fretted throughout the day, like waves, in every
channel of the great metropolis, gradually passed
away, to seek for relaxation in their peaceful homes
from all the cares, anxieties, and sorrows which
had increased to them the heat and burden of their
daily labours. A few, however, might be still seen
studding in scattered groups the shadowy
thoroughfares
,
some hurrying, as belated men, with hasty
footsteps homeward, some loitering aimlessly along,
as if to catch the pleasant coolness of the evening
breeze. Among these groups was one, if it could
properly be termed so, consisting of two persons;
the one a man perhaps a little past the middle age,
with soft and pensive features, and long light brown
hair, waving in loose and scattered curls over the
collar of his plain gray doubletthe other a boy,
richly attired, as might beseem the page of a high
family, upon whose shoulder the elder person leaned
Y 2
somewhat heavily with his left hand, while with
the right he moved a staff of ebony before him, as
if to feel his way, for he was blind, although no
scrutiny could have discovered any speck or blemish
in the clear but cold gray eyes which, seeming to
see all things, were, in truth, sealed up in rayless
night. No words were interchanged between the
pair as they passed onward to Whitehall at a pace
suitable to the infirmity of the chief personage; but,
when they reached the palace gate, the page spoke
shortly in a low voice to the sentinel on dutywho
was engaged in parleying with a gentleman on
horseback, of military air and noble bearingand
was already passing in, when suddenly the stranger,
who, it seemed, had been refused admittance, cast
his eye on the boy's companion, and instantly
addressed
him.
Well metand in good season, he exclaimed;
if my eyes play me not a trick, my excellent
friend Milton! The blind man's countenance
flashed with a joyous light as he repliedWell
met, indeed! well met, and welcome, after long
years of absence; for sure I am mine ears deceive
me not, though it be one whose accents I but little
counted should ever greet them moreSir Edgar
Ardenne!
It is, indeed! answered the horseman.
After
long years of wandering in the transatlantic
wilds, I have at length turned my feet homeward;
I landed only three days since at Portsmouth, and,
riding with all diligence, have but this hour arrived
in London. Right glad am I to see one of the two
sole persons with whom I have now any ties on
earth, so early, and, if I may judge from
appearances
,
so well in health.
I thank you! answered the poet, grasping
affectionately
his friend's hand; I thank you
heartily
;
by His great mercy, and beside my one
infirmity
,
I am sound, as I trust, both mind and body!
But, tell mefor, in that I see you here, I judge
who is the other person with whom you still esteem
yourself unitedcan I do aught for you? I am,
you know,
his
secretary?
I would, if it were possible, Sir Edgar
answered
,
see the protectorI owe him some
amends, and would fain tell him how highly I
esteem
the fruits of his good government at home
and his wise policy abroad. The soldier here on
duty tells me that he is ill at ease, and has denied
me entrance. I trust he is not seriously diseased.
The Latin secretary shook his head, and the
expression
of his countenance, so joyful at the
recognition
of his friend, altered perceptibly. He is,
indeed, much ailingwe trust not mortally; but
his old ague hath returned on him, and what with
that, and deep anxiety for Lady Claypole's health,
and over-labouring in the service of the state, he is
reduced so greatly that his physicians
fear
. Yet
is he marvellously held up by faith in the Lord;
and all his chaplains have assurance strongly
impressed
upon their hearts that he shall live, not
die! I doubt not he will see you, and forthwith;
for often hath he spoken of you recently, and as of
one whom he once cherished greatly, and greatly
regrets alway.
And, without farther words, he bade the page
send some one straightway to lead hence Sir
Edgar's
horse, and to desire the chamberlain acquaint
his highness that John Milton was below, with an
old friend and comrade, even Sir Edgar Ardenne.
After a few minutes, which the friends consumed
pleasantly in slight though interesting conversation,
a private of the guard relieved Sir Edgar of his
horse, and shortly afterward an officer of the
protector's
household made his appearance, and,
informing
them that his highness was engaged at
present in his meditations with worthy Master
Peters and others of his chaplains, but that he
shortly would find leisure to receive them, ushered
them with no little courtesy into an antechamber,
as Milton whispered to his friend, of the same suite
which Oliver at present occupied. Nearly an hour
passed away'before they received any farther word;
but each of those congenial spirits had so much to
hear and narrate to the other, that the moments
did not lag, and it was with a feeling nearly akin to
wonder that they heard the clocks striking ten just
as the chamberlain announced to them the wish of
the protector to see them in his chamber.
They entered; and, propped up by cushions on
his feverish bed, careworn, and hollow-cheeked,
and heavy-eyed, and with a wild expression of
anxiety
and pain on his thin features, there lay the
mighty being from whom Sir Edgar had last parted
in the pride of manhood, in the plenitude of power,
in the indomitable confidence of his own unresisted
faculties. On one side of his pillow sat Hugh
Peters, his familiar chaplain, a stern and
gloomy-looking
fanatic, intently occupied, as it would seem,
in studying his pocket Bible; and on the other
his wife, a lady of majestic bearing, although
wanting
somewhat in the easy dignity which is acquired
only by residence from childhood upward in courtly
circles, and two of her daughters, the ladies
Falconbridge
and Rich, who had been summoned from
their sister's deathbed by an express, bearing
tidings
of their father's dangerous seizure. An air
of deep gloom pervaded the apartment, and
melancholy
sat like a cloud upon the comely faces of
the younger ladies, his wife repressing all outward
demonstrations of disquiet in obedience to the wish
of Oliver, who pertinaciously maintained that full
assurance had been vouchsafed him from on high
that he should yet be spared, until his usefulness
should be completed to the Lord and to the people
whom he had been placed in trust to govern for
their good. Calm as he was, and self-restrained at
all times, Ardenne could not so far command his
voice as to prevent it trembling as he addressed
his old commander, and a large tear rolled slowly
down his cheek as he beheld the ravages which grief,
and time, and terror had wrought on his expressive
features and Herculean form. But Cromwell saw
not the tear nor noticed the unusual tone of
Edgar's
salutation. As he perceived his chosen officer,
a mighty gleam of exultation flashed over his worn
lineaments, and his pale lip was curled with honest
triumph. He well remembered, and had often
pondered on the last words he had heard from the
sincere and conscientious man who stood beside
him; he knew his former doubts; he had
interpreted
aright his silence, his protracted absence; and
now, that he had sought him out unsummoned, he
felt the proud conviction that this man's mind was
alteredthat this late visit was a confession of his
errora token of his approbation and good-will.
All this rushed on the dying sovereign's soul at
onceand in the midst of pain, and doubt, and
peril, he exulted! Exulted, that the only man in
his whole realm whose disapproval he had
dreaded
,
and whose applause he valued, had, by this
long-delayed approach to reconciliation, sealed his
avowal, that, in ruling England,
he
had ruled, not for
his own aggrandizement, but for his people's
welfare
.
Ha! Edgar Ardenne! he cried, in tones
resembling
more his ancient voice of power than any
which, for many a mournful day, he had sent forth.
Though late, I greet theeI rejoice to see thee
yea, as a trusty frienda valued and long-lost
companion! Varily hath it relieved me of
well-nigh
half my ailment to grasp this honest hand of
thine, to hear once more the accents of a voice
which no man ever heard to utter aught save words
of truth and honour. I thank thee, good John
Milton
,
that thou hast brought to me thisI had
well-nigh
saidthis
son
. Surely, though not a prodigal,
for him shall there be slain a fatted calf, and that
right early.
Again Ardenne was much affected,
so
much that
Oliver perceived it; and pressing Edgar's hand,
which he had still retained in his own burning
grasp, Think not, he said, so gravely of this
matter. 'Tis but a little sicknessa paltry fever.
Surely we two have ridden on such real perils, and
ridden, though I say it, with an unblenching heart
and a calm brow, that it is not for us to quake and
tremble in the soul if that a petty ague shake these
our mortal sinews. I tell thee, man, the Lord hath
heard our prayermine, and these holy men's
He
hath yet need of me in mine appointed place on
earthnor will he yet yield up his servant into the
jaws of death. I tell thee,
years
are yet before us
years full of usefulness, and happiness, and glory
and we will part no more. Thou wilt not leave
me any more, Sir Edgar?
Not on this side the grave, Ardenne replied.
When last we parted, I wasI own itblinded!
blinded by wrongful and unmerited suspicion. I
thought you selfish and ambitiousI foresaw that
you
must
be the ruler of this land, and I fancied
that to be so had been the aim and object of your
life! that you had wrested circumstance to your
advantagemade time and tide your slaves. I own
I was in errorand, with me, to own is to repair.
The elder Charles was, I confess, unfit to reign,
unfit to
live!
for, had he lived, we must have warred
with him for ever. He deadthere was no choice
save between you and a republic! and pardon me
that I believed it your intent to seize the reins of
government at once on the king's death; and that,
believing so, I deemed your agency in that great
trial as mere deceit and fraud. Justly, however
honestlyyou suffered the experiment to work;
and had the people beenas in my poor opinion
never people were nor will be while this universe
existscapable of self-government, fit to elect their
rulers, or willing to submit to laws of their own
making, they had been still self-governed, and, as
they term it, free! I thank God that they are so
no longer. Better, far betterif it must be so
one
tyrant than ten thousand. But you, sir, are no
tyrant; but the sagest, boldest, and most
prosperous
monarch that ever yet has governed Britons.
Dreaded abroad, honoured at home, you have
indeed
,
as you did prophecy to me long years ago
you have indeed caused the mere name of
Englishman
to be as greatly and as widely honoured as
ever was the style of antique Roman. You know
that I nor flatter nor deceive, but always speak
straight onward. I owed you reparation for unjust
suspicion, and I have made it. So far, then, we
are quits! Now, then, as to the man who has made
England mightier, freer, happier than ever she has
been beforeas to the undisputed and only fitting
ruler of the soil, I tender you my service and
allegiance
!
True friend! true friend! cried Cromwell.
You, and you only, have judged of me, and have
judged arightthe boldness of your former censure
confirms the frankness of your present praise!
You only dared upbraid me with ambitionyou
only envy not the greatness which has been thrust
upon me. Surely, could England have been free,
and tranquil, and at peace, never had I sat on this
thorny eminence; but the Lord willed it so; and,
as he wills, it must be. I thank you, and most
cordially
do I accept your service, and frankly do I tell
you it will avail me muchfor you I
may
trust, and,
save only you and excellent John Milton, I know
not any other. The heathen have come round
about me, and digged pits, and wove snares on every
side!traitors are in my guard!false prophets in
my chamber!spies and assassins everywhere!
daggers around my pillow!and ratsbane in my
cup! Yet, by the Lord's help, have I set them all
at naught; and confident am I that he will not
abandon me. Truly, of all his mercies, none do I
esteem more wonderful than this, that he hath given
me once more in you a friend after mine own heart
and a faithful coadjutor! The veteran's eye
kindled
as he spoke, and his cheek wore a healthful
colour, and his voice sounded with all its wonted
firmness; it was, indeed, as he himself had worded
it, as if one half his ailment had been banished
by this most opportune and unexpected visit from
the man whom, perhaps
alone
, he truly loved and
honoured.
There is no truth more certain, than that those
most practised in deceit themselves most sensibly
perceive and fully honour the absence of deceit in
others; and it may be that Cromwell, who was
unquestionably
,
in some sort, though, for the most part,
self-deceived, a deceiver of the world, admired
Ardenne
for that very frankness of bold honour which
he himself possessed not. It may be, also, that,
misguided by his wild fanatical opinions, he at one
time, believing himself the object of immediate
inspiration
,
looked on his own worst actions as his
brightest deeds; and at another, when the dark fit
succeeded to the fancied vision, brooded
despairingly
over his own misdoings, till he conceived
himself
entirely reprobate and outcast. Doubtful and
wavering, then, in his own sense of right in his
own conscience, how natural that he should draw
deep comfort to his unquiet soul from the assurance
that a man, whom he knew to have perused his
heart more narrowly than any living being, and to
have judged of him at one time with such
harshness
as to abandon him, now looked on his career
with an approving eyenow bade him hail as the
protector of his country's honournow tendered his
allegiance, and professed his willingness to follow
wherever he should lead. How natural that he
should feel this as a confirmation of that which he
would fain believeas a proof to himself of his
own half-suspected honesty. Such were, it is
most probable, the causes of the almost
supernatural
effect produced on Oliver by the return of
Ardenne; and, truly, it was wellnigh supernatural!
Till a late hour of the night he kept him by his
side, conversing cheerfully, nay, almost joyously, on
his own future prospects, on the advancement of
his country's interest abroad, on the diffusion of
intelligence
and of religion, which is philosophy, at
home! And Ardenne, whofeeling that he had
wronged Cromwell in his first suspicion, when he
expected him to seize the sceptre immediately upon
the death of Charles; convinced that, when he
had
usurped that sceptre, he was entirely justified
in wresting it from the vile faction which was
plunging England into misery and madness;
perceiving
that he had in all things used his acquired
power with wisdom, justice, and moderation, for
the present welfare and the future glory of his
people
had
rushed, perhaps, too hastily to the
conclusion
Vol. II.Z
that he had acted in all things, and from the first,
on motives purely patrioticArdenne responded to
his cheerful mood; and amid pleasant memories of
those past evils, which it is often pleasurable to
contemplate when we are safe and happy, and
high anticipations for the future, the hours wore
onward, and midnight was announced from many
a steeple, and yet that friendly conclave thought
not of separation.
At that dead hour of the night a guarded step
was heard without the door, and an attendant,
entering
,
called out the Lady Cromwell; and she,
after
an absence of some small duration, returned
far paler than before, and with the traces of fresh
tears upon her cheek, and whispered Lady
Falconbridge
,
who, in turn, left the chamber for a while,
and, coming back, again called out her sister. It
was most strange that this dumb show continued
for so long a time, that Ardenne, and even the blind
poet, perceived that something must be seriously
amiss, ere Cromwell noticed it. He was, however,
so much reinvigorated, his spirits had so
wondrously
regained their elasticity, that he talked on,
and smiled, and even jested, until so deep a gloom
had fallen on his auditors, infected by the evident
and hopeless sorrow engraved in characters so
legible upon the wo-begone and pallid face of Lady
Cromwell, that he could not continue longer in his
happy ignorance.
Ha! What is this? he cried, looking around
from face to face in blank bewilderment. What
is to do? Speak out, I say, he gasped; his voice,
which had but lately been so strong, now scarcely
audibleArdenne, speak out
you
never have
deceived
me; and then, before he could receive an
answer, had it been possible for Edgar to have
answered, as his eye met his wife's, I see, he
said, I see, in tones resigned, but inexpressibly
sad and heartbroken. Elizabeth is dead! my
daughter, oh my daughter! Gradually he sank
down from the pillows, upon which he had been
raised in a half-sitting posture, and, though he
struggled hard still to maintain his wonted and
severe
composure, the effort was too great for his
enfeebled
frame. For a few seconds' space he was
successful; then stretching out his wasted arms
while his teeth chattered in his head, and all his
limbs shook as if palsied, and the large scalding
tears poured down his hollow cheeksMy God,
he cried, my Godwhywhy hast thou
forsaken
me! He pulled the coverlet about his
temples
,
turned his face to the wall, and burst into an
agony of sobs, and groans, and fierce convulsions,
that haunted Edgar's ears long after he had left the
apartment of the bereaved and dying parent.
CHAPTER IV.
Beneath
His fate the moral lurks of destiny;
His day of double victory and death
Beheld him win two realms, and happier yield his breath.
Childe Harold
.
It
was the third day of Septemberthe
anniversary
of Worcester, of Dunbarthe lucky day
of Cromwellthe day marked out, as he believed, by
planetary influencethe day whereon he never yet
had undertaken aught but he therefrom had reaped
a golden harvest! and it would have appeared,
indeed
,
to any who beheld the conflict of the
elements
that day, that something of great import to
the nations was portended. For, at the earliest
dawn, the skies were overspread with a deep lurid
crimson, and the sun rose, although there was no
mist on the horizon, like a huge ball of heated
metal, dim, rayless, and discoloured; and, as he
rose, the unchained winds went forth, raving and
howling through the skies with such strange fury,
as not the oldest men could liken or compare to
aught they had themselves beheld or heard of from
their fathers. The largest trees were uptorn from
their earthfast roots, and hurled like straws before
the whirlwind; chimneys and turrets toppled and
crashed incessantly; cattle were killed in open
fields by the mere force of the elements; the seas
were strewn with wrecks; the lands were heaped
with ruin. Nor did these prodigies occur in one
realm only, or in one degree of latitude; from
north to south, from east to west, the same strange
tempest swept over every shore of Europe, and at
the selfsame hour, marking its path with
desolation
.
The same blast dashed the vessels of the
hardy Norsemen against their steril rocks, and
plunged Italian argosies into the vexed depths of
the Adriatic!the same blast shivered the
pine-tree
on the Dofrafells, and the cypress by the blue
waves of the Bosphorus!
Thunder, and rain, and hail, and the contending
fury of the winds, shifting and veering momently
from point to point round the whole compass, and
the incessant streams of fire from heaven, united
to make up a scene of horror such as the Christian
world had never perhaps beheld either before or
since; and, amid that strange din and warfare, the
parting soul of him who had so swayed the
mightier
influence of human passions to his will, who
had so ridden fearlessly through the more
murderous
,
if less appalling, strife of human warfare, was
struggling to take wingto flee away and be at
rest!
On the preceding night all his physicians had
pronounced his cure impossiblehis dissolution
speedy and certain; for, since the death of his
beloved
daughter, he had not closed an eye by night,
or enjoyed any intermission from the recurring fits
of ague and of feveryet still his preachers buoyed
him up with their insane and impious blasphemies,
asserting that the Lord, even the Lord who cannot
lie, had promised them that this his servant should
recoverand even when the mortal pains had
yielded to the weakness of approaching death, they
still forbade him to fear aught or to make any
preparation. On the preceding evening, seeing the
tribulation and alarm depicted on the anxious
features
of his wife, he took her kindly by the hand,
and said, Fear not for me, my love, nor think that
I shall die; I am sure of the contrary.
Oh, sir, said Ardenne, in reply, who, since their
reconciliation, had scarcely left his pillow for a
moment
,
oh, sir, believe it notthey are no friends
to you who would deceive you any longeryour
trust must be on High, for you have wellnigh done
with earth. Not one of your physicians believes
you can outlive to-morrow. They that would tell
you otherwise have lost their reason.
Say not, he instantly replied, that I have
lost my reason; I tell you the plain truth. I know
it from authority far better than any you can have
from Galen or Hippocrates. It is the answer of
the Lord himself to our prayers; not to mine only,
but to those of othersothers who have an interest
with
Him
more close and intimate than I have.
Go on, then, cheerfully, and, banishing all sorrow
from your looks, deal with me as with a
serving
man. Ye may have skill in the nature of
Z 2
things, yet nature can do more than all
physicians
put together; and God is far more above
nature
!
It was in vain that Edgar, who could not endure
that he should go hence in this wild and terrible
delusion, argued with him, professing his sincerity
with tears, and urging on him the necessity of
immediate
preparation, unless he would rush headlong
into his Maker's presence, unhouselled and
unshriven
!
It was in vain that he remonstrated with
the fanatical and blinded monitors, who, to the last,
assured their victim of speedy restoration. By
Peters, Sterry, and the rest, he was rebuked as an
unthinking carnal-minded person, setting at naught
the intimations of the Holy One, a scoffer, and
blasphemer
!and
Cromwell was admonished to put
from him one whose presence in his chamber
might well draw down upn its inmate some dread
maifestation of Divine displeasure; but to this
Oliver
objected so decidedly that they dared urge it
no farther.
He is sincere, he answered to their
exhortations
;
sincere, but in much error! The Lord
hath not vouchsafed to
him
the light which guides
our
footstepsyet he is most sincere, and pure
according
to his lights, and soalthough those lights
be darkenedmore justified, it may well be, than
we
,
who have more opportunities of grace and less
excuse
for sin! He shall not leave me. Tush!
Tell me notI say he
shall
not! Begone, all ye
he
shall alone be near me! His will was
instantly
obeyed, and through the livelong night
Sir Edgar watched beside his bed; and on that
night, for the first time since Lady Claypole's
death, did sleep visit his weary eyesbut sleep
how terriblenot the soft nurse of nature, but
its convulsion! As his eyes closed in slumber
the delusions which he cherished while awake
forsook
him, and death, in all its terrors, glared on him
face to face! His features, bold still and firm,
though pallid and emaciate, were frightfully
distorted
by the agonies of terror and despairthe sweat
stood in dark beaded bubbles on his brow, and his
thin hair seemed, to the sight of the excited
watcher
,
to bristle on his headhis hands were cast
abroad like those of a man drowning, and the whole
bed was shaken by the convulsive shivering of his
limbs. Keep them away! he cried, in words
painfully clear and thrilling, keep them away!
What would they with me? No! no! I am not
readyI will
not
do they not hear me say, I
will
not
die? and he ground his teeth violently,
and struggled as with persons striving to drag
him down. Appalled beyond expression, Sir
Edgar
touched him gently, and he awoke; but, still
unconscious and bewildered, he continued for a
moment to resist and utter, Avaunt! Get thee
behind me! for what have I to do with thee, thou
Evil One? Then, recognising Ardenne, he forced
a feeble smile, and muttering something of a
fearful
dream, composed himself again to rest, and,
after a few moments, was again asleep. But
instantly
again the vision came upon him; and this
time his eyes were opened wide, and stared abroad
as if awake. Away with it, he gasped; away
with that bloodstained and headless trunk! Why
dost thou glare on me, thou discrowned spirit; thou
canst not say I judged thee? King! king!there
be
no
kings in Englandthe
man
, the
man
Charles
Stuart! Beseech me not, I say
I
cannot save
thee! It falls! it falls! that deadly-gleaming axe!
Ha! ha! said I not sothere be no kings in
England
?
Again he woke, and once again, after a little
time, sunk into a perturbed and restless slumber,
which lasted, although fitful and uneasy, until the
morning cocks had crown. Then, with a start that
raised him from his pillow, Devil! he muttered,
through his clinched teeth; ha, devil, was it thou?
thou that didst break my childish sleep, telling me
I should be the First in England? thou that didst
plunge my stainless soul in bloodoceans of blood?
my king'smy people'smy own child's? Blood!
blood! he shrieked aloud, and once more Edgar
touched him; but, as he was aroused, unwilling to
encounter or abash him, he feigned himself to sleep,
and heard him say, Happy! Oh! how innocent
and happy! Lo! how serene he slumbers. But
it was a dreama foul dream only. For a time
he kept silence, but once or twice groaned deeply:
and, after a little while, Ardenne beheld him through
his half shut lids raise himself on his knees, and, with
clasped hands, pour forth a prayer befitting rather,
as Ludlow afterward observed when it was found
transcribed among his papers, a mediator's than a
sinner's deathbed! Lord, he exclaimed,
although
I am a wretched and a miserable creature, I
am in convenant with thee through grace; and I may,
I
will
come unto thee for thy people. Thou hast
made me a mean instrument to do
them
some good
and
thee
service; and many of them have set too
high a value on me, though others wish and would
be glad of my death. But, Lord, however thou dost
dispose of me, continue to go on to do good for
them. Give them consistency of judgment, one
heart, and mutual love; and go on to deliver them,
and with the work of reformation, and make the
name of Christ glorious throughout the world.
Teach those who look too much upon thy
instruments
to depend more upon thyself. Pardon such
as desire to trample upon the dust of a poor worm,
for they are thy people too; and pardon the folly
of this short prayer, for Jesus Christ his sake, and
give us a good night if it be thy pleasure.
Having
,
to the unspeakable astonishment of Ardenne
who, when he saw him rise, expected a confession
of his crimes and an appeal for pardonpoured forth
these strange ejaculations, he laid him down, and
slept a calm, and, as it seemed, refreshing sleep,
until the first beams of the lurid sun shone into
the apartment; then, starting up again, Hell!'
he shrieked out; hell hath gat hold upon me;
the pains of hell have compassed me! and would
have leaped out of bed upon the floor if Edgar had
not caught him in his arms. At the same moment
the awful uproar of the tempest burst suddenly and
without warning upon the terrified and reeling world.
But the storm fell unheeded on the ears of Oliver
and of his sole attendant; both were too deeply
moved, the one by the remembrance of his
tremendous
dreams, the other by compassion, pity, and
dismay, to think of any thing external. In a short
time, however, Oliver regained his wonted
calmness
;
and, making no allusion to the occurrences
of the past night, Edgar disturbed him not by
speaking of them. As the day now advanced, his
wife, his children, some of his officers, and all his
chaplains crowded into his chamber; he spoke to
all kindly and cheerfully; but Edgar saw that all
the overweening confidence of the preceding day
had left him; and though the fanatics continued to
rave in his ears, promising present health and future
glory, he listened with indifference, and his eye no
longer flashed at their bold prophecies, nor did he
answer any thing, nor prophesy at all himself, though
called on frequently throughout the day by Peters
to say something to the Lord, and to make
intercession
.
For the most part he lay still upon his
back, with his hands folded on his breast, and his
face perfectly composed and calm; but twice or
thrice a short quick spasm twitched the muscles of
his mouthand once he wrung his hands, perhaps
unconsciously. He spoke but seldom, and then
only in short sentences, evidently growing weaker
every moment. Once he remarked upon the day
his
anniversarybut, strange to tell, he noticed
not at all the furious tempest which shook the very
palace-roof above him, and, saving in its lulls,
drowned every sound of voice or motion. Toward
noon he dozed a little while, and on his waking
called to Peters.
Tell me, he said, I pray youand, on your
life here and hereafter, I charge you tell me truly
for, look you, 'tis a grievous thing to lie unto a
man situate like to mecan one who hath been
once in grace fall off by any means, and ever
become
reprobate thereafter, so as to peril his
salvation
?
Surely he cannot! answered the fanatic.
He that is
once
in grace can never more
back-slide
,
nor fall, nor even falter! All that he doth
thereafter is of grace, and, therefore, holy!his life
is precioushis salvation certain!
Soh! answered the dying man; I then am
safefor sure I am that
once
I was in grace!
Shocked beyond all expression, Edgar would fain
have once again renewed his exhortations; but, just
as he began, Cromwell asked for his family;
embraced
them one by one, and almost instantly sank
into a state of lethargic stupor, from which no
efforts
of his now alarmed attendants could rouse him.
At length, just as the clock was striking three, a
louder crash of thunder than any of the claps which
had rolled almost incessantly throughout the day
broke on the melancholy silence! Cannon! he
muttered, faintly, as he woke, the sound
commingling
with his recollections of the day. Lambert,
bring up the cannon! Charge therecharge with
your pikes, valiant and trusty Goff!
His mind is at Dunbar, whispered one of the
military men to Ardenne; but, lo! wherefore do
they torment him?
The question was produced by a late effort on
the part of some about his person to induce the
dying ruler to declare who should succeed him.
To a direct straightforward question he gave no
answer; then he was asked, should Richard be the
next protector, and a faint motion of his head
casual, as it seemed to Ardenne, and unmeaning
was construed to imply assent. A little longer he
gasped feebly, without speaking. Another crash
of thunder appeared to split the very firmament,
and the blue flickering lightning fearfully glanced
upon the dying soldier's pale stern features. They
kindled in the glare, and the eye flashed, and the
hand was waved aloft. Oh! he exclaimed;
on, Ironsides! Down with the sons of
Zeruiah
!
Then, in a feebler tone, Ha! he continued,
have at thee! What, again? Dismounted
oh! dismounted! Ho! rescuehelphelp!
Ardenne
lost!
lost!Ardenne!help!resc
The sharp death-rattle cut short the unfinished
wordthe eyeballs glazedthe lifted hand sank
nervelessthe jaw dropped! The strife was over.
Ambition, energy, sagacity, and valour won for the
great usurper naught but a broken heart and an
untimely
grave!
There was a deep hush in the chamber, awfully
solemn and impressive! A woman's sob first broke
the spelland then the voice of his first follower
last friend! There passed the spirit of the
greatest man England has ever seen! Peace to
his soul! His faults die with him! but never
never, while the round world endures, shall his
fame be forgotten, or the good he hath done his
country pass away! Weep, England, weepyour
benefactor is no moreand I foresee much strife,
much anarchy, much blood!but he who hath
gone hence hath sown the seedthe seed of thy
prosperity, thy freedom, and thy gloryand thou
shalt reap the harvest, thou and thy sons, for many
a deathless age, when he who now is nothingand
I who mourn above himshall be dust unto dust,
and ashes unto ashes!
THE END.Dearest and best Marie
I have received your kind and most consoling
letter of July from the tried friend who bore it.
The wisdom of your counsels I acknowledge, and,
so far as in
me
lies, will follow them. But, trust
me, girl, better and brighter days are yet in store
for us. I do assure you I am even now more
king
more powerful and freethan ere I raised my
standard; so that I doubt not, with a little patience
and a small share of
finesse
, all shall be yet as we
would have it. I am now courted by all parties
English and ScottishPresbyterians, Independents
parliament and armyall prostrate at my feet
all rivals for my favour, and balanced, too, so
equally, that whom I join soever carries the day.
In truth, chiefly do I incline toward the Scots,
but, for the present, seem, for my own purposes,
to favour more the army. In the end, whosoe
bids the highest has me. You disapprove, you
tell me, my `promising so much to those two
villains
,
Ireton and Cromwell.' Now, I beseech you,
be not alarmed nor troubled; but leave
me
to
manage
,
who am informed far better of all
circumstances
than you by any means can be; and on this
head rest altogether easy, for in due season I shall
know how to deal with these rogues,
who, for a
silken garter, shall be fitted with a hempen rope!
This by a mode that can by no chance fail; where,
fore, though brieflyas my space compelsI yet
write plainly. If all things prosper with me, as I
have now good cause to deem they willfor all the
factions, themselves cozened, look on the others as
outwittedI shall once more embrace the
well-beloved
queen and mistress of my heart, greater
and far more powerful than ever, ere many months
shall pass, in our own palace of Whitehall.
Until the Lord, in his good time, shall bring
which things to pass,
Your loving husband and idolater,
C. R.